HIGHWAY,  MOTOR  CARRIER,  AND  HAZARDOUS 
MATERIALS  TRANSPORTATION  SAFETY,  AND 
TRANSPORTATION  OF  HOUSEHOLD  GOODS

S.  HRG.  109–196

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION 

AND MERCHANT MARINE

OF THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

APRIL  5,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

23–943 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2005

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SURFACE  TRANSPORTATION  AND  MERCHANT 

MARINE 

TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi,  Chairman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Ranking 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 5, 2005 ................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye ..................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg ..........................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lott ......................................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens ................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Gerard,  Stacey  L.,  Acting  Assistant  Administrator/Chief  Safety  Officer,
Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration (PHMSA) ..............
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Mead, Hon. Kenneth M., Inspector General, Department of Transportation .....
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Runge,  Hon.  Jeffrey  W.,  M.D.,  Administrator,  National  Highway  Traffic
Safety Administration ..........................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Sandberg,  Hon.  Annette,  Administrator,  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety
Administration .....................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Burns, Hon. Conrad, U.S. Senator from Montana, prepared statement .............
Eisenhart,  Earl,  Executive  Director,  Corporate  Transportation  Coalition,
letter, dated April 4, 2005 to Senators Stevens, Inouye, and Lott ..................
Hilton,  Cynthia,  Executive  Vice  President,  Institute  of  Makers  of  Explosives, 
prepared statement with attachments ...............................................................
Letter  to  Hon.  Ted  Stevens,  dated  April  5,  2005  from  various  leaders  of 
public health, safety, child advocacy groups, and medical organizations ........
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye  to
Stacey L. Gerard ..................................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Frank  Lautenberg  to
Hon. Annette Sandberg .......................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted to Hon. Jeffrey W. Runge by: 

Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg ...............................................................................
Hon. Ted Stevens ..............................................................................................

Page 
1
2
2
40
40
1
37
3
3

24
25
4
7

11
13

18
20

47

62

48

64

66

65

69
67

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

HIGHWAY, 

MOTOR 

AND
HAZARDOUS  MATERIALS  TRANSPORTATION 
SAFETY, 
OF
HOUSEHOLD  GOODS 

TRANSPORTATION 

CARRIER, 

AND 

TUESDAY,  APRIL  5,  2005

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION AND 
MERCHANT MARINE, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10:05 a.m. in room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Trent  Lott,
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TRENT LOTT,

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSISSIPPI 

Senator LOTT. The Subcommittee will come to order. 
We will have some Senators that will be joining us momentarily, 
but  I  thought  we  could  go  ahead  and  have  the  opening  statement 
and begin our testimony, because this is an important hearing. We 
need to get the witnesses’ testimony, and we need to complete this 
section  of  the  highway  bill  that  we’ll  be  moving  later  on  this 
month, I hope. 

The  hearing  today  will  be  to  receive  testimony  on  truck  and  bus 
safety, highway and vehicle safety, hazardous materials safety, and 
recommendations  for  their  reauthorization,  including  the  Adminis-
tration’s legislative proposals. Most of the programs were last reau-
thorized in TEA–21. 

The  Subcommittee  also  will  hear  testimony  about  fraud  in  the 
transportation  of  household  goods  and  the  recommendations  for 
better  consumer  protection.  These  programs  should  have  been  re-
authorized  almost  2  years  ago,  but,  unfortunately,  due  to  disputes 
about funding related to the highway construction and transit pro-
grams, these programs have simply been extended for short periods 
of time. 

I hope that the Committee can mark up and report legislation by 
the middle of April, and that Congress can finalize a conference re-
port  by  the  end  of  May,  when  the  current  extension  expires.  The 
indication has been, from the Chairman of the full Committee, that 
we  will  have  a  mark-up  on  this  section  of  that  transportation  bill 
next week—I believe, the 14th. 

In  the  interest  of  moving  the  hearing  along,  I  would  call  on  the 
Ranking  Member  of  the  full  Committee  for  his  opening  statement, 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

2

and  then  other  statements  of  the  Senators,  as  they  arrive,  will  be 
included in the record, at this point in the record. 

I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  today’s  witnesses  and  working 

with the Members of the Subcommittee during this Congress. 

Senator  Inouye,  thank  you  for  being  here  this  morning,  and  I’d 
like  to  call  on  you  for  any  opening  statement  you  would  like  to 
make. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE,

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator  INOUYE.  I  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  have 
a  prepared  statement.  I  ask  for  your  concurrence  that  it  be  made 
part of the record. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Good morning. I want to welcome our witnesses and thank Chairman Lott for fo-
cusing  our  attention  on  the  reauthorization  of  the  highway  programs  under  this 
Committee’s jurisdiction. 

We have a lot of work ahead of us and we need to work together as we craft our 

portion of the highway bill, and work to reduce accidents and improve safety. 

Last year, the Senate passed a bipartisan version of the highway bill, SAFETEA, 
but  no  bill  was  enacted  because  of  disagreements  over  overall  funding  levels.  We 
are using the Senate bill as our starting point and will improve upon it where pos-
sible. 

I  wish  to  note  that  while  traffic  fatalities  declined  dramatically  during  the  1980s 
and  early  1990s  due  to  states  enacting  and  enforcing  tougher  seat  belt  and  drunk 
driving  laws,  we  still  had  approximately  42,000  people  killed  on  our  highways  in 
2003.  Further,  the  trend  line  for  reducing  traffic  fatalities  has  flattened  during  the 
past  several  years,  which  means  new  safety  strategies  must  be  employed.  This 
year’s highway bill presents an opportunity to adjust our safety programs for great-
er impact. 

As we prepare for the upcoming debate, it would be helpful to hear from the wit-

nesses about a number of key issues, including:

create a better medical review program for commercial drivers?

Program (MCSAP), border safety enforcement, and new entrant safety?

• What is the appropriate level of funding for the Motor Carrier Safety Assistance 
• How  can  we  improve  the  process  for  issuing  Commercial  Drivers  Licenses  and 
• What are the appropriate hours of service for truck drivers?
• What action should we take to encourage increased use of seat belts, and reduce 
• How can we reduce hazardous materials incidences and accidents?
I look forward to hearing from the witnesses about these important issues.

alcohol-related fatalities?

Senator  INOUYE.  I’d  just  like  to  point  out,  Mr.  Chairman,  that 
the  subjects  covered  at  this  hearing  will  demonstrate  the  great 
range  of  activities  and  responsibilities  held  by  this  Committee.  In 
fact, what we will hear today are major areas of jurisdiction for us. 
And let me reassure you of my full cooperation. 

Senator LOTT. Thank you very much, Senator Inouye. 
Senator Stevens, I was already speaking in your behalf that this 
is the hearing on highway, motor carrier, and hazardous materials 
transportation  safety,  and  transportation  of  household  goods  and 
any  recommendations  for  this  portion  that  would  go  into  the  high-
way bill that hopefully will come to the Senate later on this month, 
and  that  your  intent,  at  this  time,  is  to  mark  this  portion  of  the 
bill  up  by  the  middle  of  this  month.  So  I  hope  that  is  what  you, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

3

in  fact,  plan.  I’d  like  to  call  on  you  for  any  statement  you’d  like  to 
make at this time. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Senator Lott. That is our 
plan.  And  I’m  delighted  to  work  with  my  Co-Chairman  to  get  this 
portion  of  this  highway  bill  ready  to  merge  with  that  of  the  Envi-
ronment  and  Public  Works  Committee.  But  we’re  going  to  look  to 
you,  as  Chairman  of  the  Subcommittee,  for  the  guidance  as  to 
how—you  and  your  colleague  on  the  other  side—to  how  to  merge 
our  portion  with  the  basic  bill  of  the  Senate  and  take  it  to  the 
House  conference.  We  look  forward  to  doing  that,  as  you  said,  be-
fore the end of next week. 

So,  we  thank  all  the  witnesses  for  being  here.  And  I’m  sorry  to 

be slightly late. We had to open the Senate this morning. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  do  apologize  for  coming  in  late  and  being  called  to  a  leadership 
meeting.  But,  I  do  hope  we’ll  pursue  some  concepts  of  incentives  to  the  states  to 
increase  their  safety  precautions  and  the  requirements  for  safety.  My  state  is  one 
that doesn’t have a primary state seatbelt law, safety belt law, which I regret. Those 
of  us  who  are  pilots  just  automatically  get  in  anything  and  lock  up,  you  know,  it 
becomes  second  nature.  I’m  saddened  to  see  that  this  is  the  case.  I  would  urge  us 
to  consider  giving  advantages  to  those  states  that  have  records  of  compliance  in 
terms  of  safety  features—both  safety  belts  and  guide  rails  and  let  them  have  more 
discretion in how they use their funds, but at the same time have some basic man-
dates for use of funds where there is no apparent attempt to adopt some of the ap-
proaches  that  have  in  fact  reduced  injuries  and  deaths  on  the  highway.  I  want  to 
particularly be able talk to you and Members of the Committee about the increasing 
problem that Mr. Mead has mentioned in terms of motorcycles. They are wonderful 
vehicles for enjoyment and seeing the outdoors, but the increased accident rate both-
ers me considerably and I think we have to find some way to stimulate greater safe-
ty education for those who use motorcycles. I thank you very much for the hearing.

Senator LOTT. Well, thank you very much for being here. 
And  let  me  call  on  our  panel,  now,  to  give  their  testimony.  Your 
statements,  written  statements,  will  be  entered  into  the  record  in 
their entirety. I’d like to ask you to take just 5 minutes to summa-
rize your statement, since we have four of you here, and then allow 
us time to ask specific questions. 

Our  panel  of  witnesses  today  include  the  Honorable  Kenneth 
Mead,  Inspector  General,  U.S.  Department  of  Transportation;  the 
Honorable Jeffrey Runge, Administrator, National Highway Traffic 
Safety  Administration;  the  Honorable  Annette  Sandberg,  Adminis-
trator,  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration;  and  Stacey 
Gerard,  Acting  Assisting  Administrator,  Chief  Safety  Officer,  Pipe-
line and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration. 

Thank  you  all  very  much  for  being  here.  This  is  an  important 
part of our transportation system in America. We take it very seri-
ously.  These  safety  interests,  you  know,  highway  interests,  con-
sumer interests all have to be considered very carefully, and we are 
working  on  that,  but  we  need  the  testimony  of  those  of  you  that 
lead these various administrations in the Department of Transpor-
tation. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

4

We’d like to begin with Honorable Kenneth Mead, Inspector Gen-

eral, U.S. Department of Transportation. 

Mr. Mead? 

STATEMENT OF HON. KENNETH M. MEAD, INSPECTOR 

GENERAL, DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Mr.  MEAD.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thanks  for  inviting  us  to 

testify. 

Our  testimony  is  going  to  draw  from  audits  and  criminal  inves-
tigations.  We  have  new  safety  audits  underway  that  I  want  to  tell 
you  about,  one  on  alcohol-impaired  driving,  motor-carrier  safety, 
and bridge safety. 

Overall, I think the Motor Carrier Safety Administration and the 
National  Highway  Traffic  Safety  Administration  have  made 
progress, illustrated by a 6.3 percent decrease in the highway fatal-
ity  rate  between  1998  and  2003.  While  the  fatalities  increased  2.8 
percent, from about 41,500 in 1998 to 42,600-odd in 2003, the num-
ber  of  highway  vehicle  miles  traveled  increased  about  10  percent. 
And that increase in vehicle miles traveled explains why the fatal-
ity  rate  decreased,  but  the  absolute  number  of  fatalities  increased 
slightly. 

The  Department  has  a  very  ambitious  goal,  you  should  know,  to 
reduce  the  fatality  rate  to  one  death  per  hundred-million  vehicle 
miles traveled by 2008. That is going to require some heavy lifting. 
It  will  require  a  decrease,  in  5  years,  that  is  almost  twice  the  de-
crease  accomplished  in  the  past  decade.  It  anticipates  roughly 
6,000 fewer fatalities per year. 

Now,  Mr.  Chairman,  it  almost  goes  without  saying  that  improv-
ing  highway  infrastructure  improves  safety,  but  we  want  to  rec-
ommend eight action items. 

First,  strengthen  enforcement  of  commercial  driver’s  license 
fraud. This is a very basic matter. We have found commercial driv-
er’s  license  fraud  schemes  now  in  23  states.  They  involve  drivers 
who obtain their license fraudulently by giving bribes or kickbacks 
to state employees or third-party examiners. It’s mostly third-party 
examiners.  Some  of  these  drivers  have  been  retested,  but  Motor 
Carriers  should  require  states  to  ensure  that  all  these  drivers  are 
qualified. We also recommended that Motor Carriers require states 
to  adopt  counterfraud  methods,  such  as  having  police  officers  pose 
as  drivers.  Georgia  and  Pennsylvania  have  already  done  this,  and 
it is effective. If Motor Carriers doesn’t believe it has the authority 
to take these actions, it ought to request Congress for that author-
ity now. 

Second,  strengthen  state  enforcement  that  bars  Mexican  trucks 
from operating in the U.S. without proper authority. Now, you may 
think  it  odd  that  I  raise  this,  since  the  border  isn’t  open,  but,  in 
fact, trucks can come across now, but they can only operate in what 
are  called  the  commercial  zones.  But  some  of  those  trucks,  they 
keep on going into the interior United States, and they’re not sup-
posed to. They don’t have that authority. 

State  inspectors  have  found  over  a  hundred  Mexican  companies 
operating illegally in the U.S. And in 2002, Motor Carriers required 
state  inspectors  to  place  out  of  service  any  truck  from  Mexico  that 
doesn’t  have  the  proper  authority.  Five  states  have  not  adopted 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

5

those  rules.  And  a  number  of  others  don’t  follow  them  because 
there’s  confusion  about  how  the  new  rules  fit  into  existing  safety 
criteria.  Motor  Carriers  needs  to  take  action  to  ensure  its  rule  is 
fully implemented. If we don’t take care of this now, it’s only going 
to get worse once the border opens. 

Third, increase enforcement of hours-of-service violations. I think 
you  know,  these  regulations  are  aimed  at  preventing  accidents 
caused  by  fatigued  drivers.  But  regardless  of  what  limits  are  in 
place,  the  old  rules  or  the  new  ones,  unscrupulous  companies  will 
violate the rule and force drivers to far exceed them. Our investiga-
tion showed that this occurs sometimes by these companies requir-
ing  drivers  to  drive  as  much  as  20  straight  hours,  far  in  excess  of 
any rule that you could imagine. 

A  California  company,  for  example—they  had  been  repeatedly 
fined—they  were  involved  in  an  Arizona  accident  that  killed  a  fa-
ther  and  son  and  injured  at  least  seven  others.  The  company  en-
couraged the drivers to falsify their logbooks. The driver in that ac-
cident had been behind the wheel for nearly 19 straight hours. His 
logbook said he was sleeping in the sleeper berth at the time of the 
accident. 

Fourth,  refocus  funds  to  reduce  drunk  driving.  Forty  percent  of 
highway  fatalities—that’s  about  17,000  deaths  in  2003,  alone—are 
attributed to driving while under the influence. I think the Admin-
istration has a pretty good proposal in this area. 

Increase  seatbelt  use.  This  is  another  one  where  I  think  the  Ad-
ministration  has  a  pretty  focused  program,  and  they’ve  achieved  a 
lot of progress. The usage of seatbelts has gone from 70 percent to 
80  percent  from  1998  to  2004.  Primary  seatbelt  rules,  which  allow 
an  officer  to  stop  and  ticket  a  motorist  solely  for  not  wearing  a 
seatbelt, they’re quite effective. Only 21 states have them now. 

Increase  motorcycle-helmet  use.  I  know  that  this  is  a  very  con-
troversial one, but it is one of the few remaining areas of low-hang-
ing  fruit.  Only  20  states  require  helmets  for  all  motorcycle  riders 
right  now.  I  should  tell  you  that  there  has  been  an  increase  in  fa-
talities  in  motorcycle  accidents  by  about  60  percent  since  1998. 
Helmets  save  lives,  and  that’s  in  addition  to  savings  associated 
with  inpatient  medical  costs  that  are  occasioned  by  brain  injuries. 
Item  seven,  detect  vehicle  and  equipment  defects  more  effec-
tively. In 2000, Congress held hearings on accidents involving vehi-
cles equipped with defective tires, and it found that NHTSA did not 
collect  enough  data  on  defects;  and  the  data  it  did  collect,  it  didn’t 
use.  To  address  those  concerns,  Congress—in  fact,  I  think  this 
Committee had a major role in that—passed the TREAD Act to im-
prove  equipment  standards  and  to  create  a  computer  system  that 
analyzes  data  from  warranty  claims,  manufacturers,  consumers, 
and  lawsuits  to  identify  potential  defects  that  warrant  investiga-
tion. NHTSA ought to complete expansion of the system’s capabili-
ties,  because  the  data’s  too  voluminous  and  complex  to  analyze 
without a sophisticated tool. 

We’d  also  like  to  hear  from  NHTSA  on  its  views  on  what  ac-
counts for the increase in vehicle recalls, whether voluntarily or by 
action  of  the  government.  It’s  gone  from  265  in  1995,  to  541  in 
2000, and to 602 in 2004. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

6

You  know  there’s  a  new  agency  at  DOT.  This  is  my  item  eight. 
It’s  called  the  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Adminis-
tration,  and  it’s  pronounced  ‘‘fimsa’’  [PHMSA],  and  this  is  a  good 
opportunity  to  improve  transportation  safety  here.  They  face  three 
imperatives. 

The  first  is  to  focus  attention  on  the  overlapping  areas  of  safety 
and  security,  and  identify  vulnerabilities  of  hazardous-materials 
shipments  to  negligence,  intentional  violations,  and  terrorist  at-
tack.  A  good  example  here—I  mean,  I  know  this  is  dealing  with 
mostly  highways  and  surface  safety,  but—is  the  train  accident  in 
South Carolina, with that chlorine car. The switch there was found 
to  be  vulnerable  to  manual  tampering.  So  there  is  a  case  where 
there’s an overlap between safety and security. 

A  second  imperative  is  to  coordinate  hazardous-materials  issues 
with other agencies in the Department of Transportation. We have 
ten  agencies  over  there,  and  a  number  of  those  agencies  have 
HAZMAT enforcement responsibilities, and we need to break down 
those stovepipes. 

And  a  third  imperative  for  PHMSA  is  to  complete  long-overdue 
hazardous-materials-related  mandates  and  NTSB  recommenda-
tions. 

Now, finally, I’d like to say a word about unscrupulous household 
moving  companies.  Now,  they’re  clearly  in  a  minority.  It’s  not  fair 
to  paint  the  entire  industry  this  way.  But  we  have  a  very  serious 
and,  I  think,  a  disgusting  problem  here  that  I’d  like  to  see  the  re-
authorization take on. 

Typically  what  happens  here  is,  a  crooked  mover  will  offer  a 
lowball  estimate,  and  then  refuse  to  deliver  the  household  goods 
unless  he  is  paid  an  exorbitant  sum.  So,  the  goods,  in  effect,  are 
held hostage. Sometimes they’re even sold off. Meanwhile, the con-
sumer is left with nothing, and no real effective remedy. 

Here’s one case. Elderly New York couple. They’re quoted $2,800 
to make this move to Florida. The foreman of the moving company 
threatens  to  confiscate  their  goods  unless  they’re  paid  $10,000. 
Now, the consumer really doesn’t have any choice. They don’t have 
time  to  go  to  arbitration  and  all  that.  They  need  their  household 
goods. But they’re basically left with nothing. 

To  give  you  an  idea  of  the  magnitude  of  the  problem,  our  office 
has  investigated  criminal  fraud  cases  involving  these  companies, 
about 8,000 victims of more than 25 moving companies since 2000. 
And I think it’s the tip of the iceberg. Since 2001, consumers have 
filed  well  over  2,500  complaints  with  Motor  Carriers  that  accuse 
them of overcharging and other serious tariff violations. Motor Car-
riers  stepped  up  its  efforts  beginning  last  year.  Before  that,  they 
had  one  person.  Now  they  have  ten.  But  they  don’t  really  have  an 
effective enforcement scheme. The penalties just aren’t sufficient. 

I think the good news is that the House version of TEA–21 reau-
thorization  targets  the  crooked  movers  by  increasing  the  civil  pen-
alties, giving the states the authority to enforce federal regulations. 
It  also  creates  a  federal  crime  called  ‘‘holding  goods  hostage’’  with 
a  maximum  penalty  of  2  years  in  prison  per  count.  I  think  that’s 
ridiculously  low.  For  this  type  of  offense,  you  ought  to  go,  I  think, 
a minimum of 5 years per count. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

7

[The prepared statement of Mr. Mead follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. KENNETH M. MEAD, INSPECTOR GENERAL, 

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Subcommittee: 
Thank  you  for  inviting  us  to  testify  today  as  the  Subcommittee  begins  delibera-
tions on the reauthorization of the safety programs in the Transportation Equity Act 
for  the  21st  Century  (TEA–21).  You  have  asked  us  to  discuss  highway  and  motor 
carrier  safety,  hazardous  materials  safety,  and  household  goods  transportation 
fraud. 

Our  testimony  today  will  draw  from  our  body  of  audit  work  and  criminal  inves-
tigations. We also want to advise the Subcommittee that we have several safety au-
dits  under  way,  including  one  on  alcohol-impaired  driving  and  another  on  imple-
mentation  of  the  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Improvement  Act  of  1999,  which  was  re-
quired by Congress. 

Given the challenges they have faced, two agencies dealing with highway safety—
the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  (FMCSA)  and  the  National  High-
way  Traffic  Safety  Administration  (NHTSA)—have,  overall,  made  good  progress. 
Specifically,  the  highway  fatality  rate  has  decreased  6.3  percent,  from  1.58  deaths 
per 100 million vehicle miles traveled in 1998 to 1.48 in 2003, the most recent year 
for which figures are available. 

The absolute number of deaths has increased 2.8 percent, from 41,501 in 1998 to 
42,643 in 2003. The number of large-truck-related fatalities decreased in every year 
from 1998 to 2002 but increased slightly in 2003. But the number of highway vehi-
cle  miles  traveled  increased  9.8  percent  from  2.6  trillion  to  2.9  trillion  in  the  same 
period.  This  explains  why  the  fatality  rate  has  decreased  as  the  absolute  number 
of deaths increased. 

These  successes  can  be  attributed  to  the  increased  attention  given  to  highway 
safety, including Congress’ creation of FMCSA in 1999; its passage of the Transpor-
tation  Recall  Enhancement,  Accountability,  and  Documentation  (TREAD)  Act  in 
2000; NHTSA’s attention to seat belt use and potential vehicle and equipment safety 
defects;  and  FMCSA’s  efforts  to  increase  enforcement  and  complete  important 
rulemakings. 

Funding  for  highway  safety  improvement  increased  more  than  50  percent  during 
the  5-year  period  from  1998  to  2003.  But  the  fatality  trends  have  essentially  flat-
tened during that period (as Figures 1 and 2 illustrate). 

The Department has established a goal to reduce the overall highway fatality rate 
to  one  death  per  100  million  vehicle  miles  traveled  by  2008.  Meeting  the  Depart-
ment’s goals will require a decrease in 5 years that is almost twice the decrease that 
was accomplished in the previous 11 years.

While  they  will  be  difficult  to  achieve,  accomplishing  the  Department’s  goals 
would save about 31,000 lives between 2004 and 2008, assuming that vehicle miles 
traveled  remain  constant.  This  would  lower  annual  deaths  by  an  average  of  about 
6,200  lives,  a  significant  decrease  in  the  more  than  42,000  annual  deaths.  Acting 
on the following items will help the Department to achieve these goals.

• Use  covert  methods  to  reveal  Commercial  Drivers  License  (CDL) 
fraud  and  ensure  that  truck  drivers  who  obtained  their  CDLs  from  exam-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

.

s
p
e
1
d
a
e
m
5
0
4

8

iners suspected of fraud obtained their licenses properly. We have found far 
too many CDL fraud schemes—in 23 states—and identified more than 8,000 drivers 
who had obtained their CDLs through state or ‘‘third-party examiners’’ suspected of 
fraud.  Although  some  of  these  drivers  were  retested,  FMCSA  should  require  states 
to  ensure  that  all  of  those  drivers  are  properly  qualified.  We  have  recommended 
that  FMCSA  also  require  states  to  adopt  effective  CDL  counter-fraud  methods,  in-
cluding covert test methods, which includes having police officers pose as applicants. 
These  methods  have  been  successfully  used  in  Pennsylvania  and  Georgia,  and 
should  be  required  in  all  states  that  use  third-party  examiners  (our  last  study  of 
CDL fraud found that 39 states use third-party examiners). 

We have also recommended that when corrupt examiners are caught, the holders 
of CDLs approved by those examiners be retested. FMCSA officials recently advised 
us  that  they  are  assessing  whether  it  has  the  regulatory  authority  to  order  states 
to use covert counter-fraud methods and retest suspect CDL holders. If FMCSA de-
termines that it does not have the authority, it should seek that authority from Con-
gress.
• Strengthen  state  enforcement  of  laws  that  bar  Mexican  trucks  from 
operating  in  the  United  States  without  proper  authority.  These  trucks  can 
now operate in the United States in only limited ways, primarily in the commercial 
areas along the border. Mexican companies seeking to operate in the United States 
under  new  privileges  granted  by  the  North  American  Free  Trade  Agreement 
(NAFTA)  are  required  to  obtain  operating  authority  from  FMCSA.  The  agency  will 
grant operating authority only to those Mexican companies that meet detailed safe-
ty-related  requirements.  Opening  of  the  border  has  been  delayed.  But  even  before 
the  border  has  opened,  records  indicate  that  state  inspectors  have  already  found 
more  than  100  Mexican  trucking  companies  operating  illegally  in  the  interior 
United States. 

In  August  2002,  FMCSA  issued  an  interim  final  rule  requiring  state  inspectors 
to place out of service any commercial vehicle operating without authority or beyond 
the  scope  of  their  authority.  However,  in  January  2005,  we  reported  that  gaps  still 
exist  in  implementing  and  enforcing  this  rule.  Five  states  still  need  to  adopt  rules 
to  enforce  operating  authority,  and  some  of  the  states  that  have  adopted  the  rules 
are  not  placing  trucks  out  of  service  when  found  operating  without  authority,  be-
cause operating without authority is not one of the Commercial Vehicle Safety Alli-
ance’s (CVSA) North American Inspection Standards out-of-service criteria. 

CVSA  is  an  association  of  state  and  federal  officials  responsible  for  the  adminis-
tration  and  enforcement  of  motor  carrier  safety  laws.  According  to  CVSA,  the  term 
‘‘out of service’’ is intended to refer to vehicles that ‘‘by reason of its mechanical con-
dition  or  loading  would  likely  cause  an  accident  or  breakdown.’’  Training  and  guid-
ance for state officials on the operating authority issue is also a problem. 

In  its  response  to  our  January  2005  report,  FMCSA  stated  that  it  will  continue 
to communicate with all states and encourage timely adoption and full enforcement 
of  its  August  2002  rule,  which  it  considers  to  be  clear  and  unambiguous.  However, 
if this issue continues to present an obstacle to implementation of the rule, FMCSA 
will  need  to  take  further  action  to  ensure  that,  notwithstanding  CVSA’s  view  of 
when  vehicles  may  be  placed  out  of  service,  the  states  consistently  implement 
FMCSA’s rule.
• Increase enforcement of egregious violations of Hours of Service reg-
ulations. Hours of Service regulations are aimed at preventing accidents caused by 
fatigued  commercial  drivers.  The  regulations  prescribe  a  limit  on  the  number  of 
hours that a commercial driver can be behind the wheel. Simply put, the key provi-
sion in the regulations currently in effect limit consecutive hours of driving time to 
11 hours, and this regulation expires in September 2005. The previous limit was 10 
hours. 

The  Subcommittee  should  know  that  regardless  of  the  limits  in  place,  there  will 
be  unscrupulous  operators  who  will  violate  the  rule  and  drive  20  consecutive  hours 
or  more.  We  have  conducted  criminal  investigations  of  egregious  cases  in  which 
trucking  company  officials  have  been  prosecuted  for  systematically  forcing  their 
drivers to drive well in excess of the limits. 

In  one  case,  a  California  trucking  company  that  repeatedly  had  been  fined  by 
FMCSA for Hours of Service violations was involved in an accident in Arizona that 
killed  a  father  and  son  and  injured  at  least  seven  other  people.  The  company,  its 
two  owners,  and  11  employees  have  been  indicted  on  federal  criminal  charges.  The 
indictments  charge  that  the  company  had  encouraged  its  drivers  to  falsify  their  log 
books.  Our  investigation  disclosed  that  the  driver  involved  in  the  Arizona  fatality 
had  been  behind  the  wheel  for  19  hours,  and  that  his  log  book  falsely  reflected  he 
was in the sleeper berth at the time of the accident. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

9

Unscrupulous  trucking  companies  and  drivers  view  FMCSA’s  fines  for  Hours  of 
Service and log book violations simply as a cost of doing business. Current penalties 
and enforcement methods can be further strengthened to deter this offense. We note 
that at one time, FMCSA proposed that all trucks be required to have onboard elec-
tronic  devices  that  would  record  driving  time  and  provide  key  evidence  for  enforce-
ment efforts. FMCSA rescinded that proposal, but the courts have directed FMCSA 
to review the decision to rescind it. If ultimately FMCSA does not require recorders, 
it needs to develop additional strategies to deter Hours of Service violations. For ex-
ample,  one  way  would  be  to  eliminate  FMCSA’s  distinction  between  a  missing  or 
incomplete  log  book  and  possessing  a  false  log  book,  which  carries  a  fine  up  to  10 
times  higher  than  a  missing  log  book.  Another  would  be  to  eliminate  an  FMCSA 
policy  that  restricts  inspectors’  use  of  data  from  a  trucking  company’s  GPS  or  on-
board  recording  device  to  check  for  Hours  of  Service  violations  during  compliance 
audits.
• Refocus  funds  to  reduce  drunk  driving.  Driving  while  under  the  influ-
ence  of  alcohol  continues  to  be  one  of  the  largest  highway  safety  problems  in  the 
nation,  with  an  estimated  40  percent  of  all  highway  fatalities  (more  than  17,000 
deaths  in  2003  alone)  considered  to  be  alcohol-related.  We  agree  with  the  Adminis-
tration’s  proposal  to  focus  new  funding  resources  on  up  to  10  states  that  have  an 
especially high number of alcohol-related fatalities.
• Increase  the  use  of  seat  belts.  NHTSA  and  the  states  have  been  effective 
in increasing the national seat belt use rate from 70 percent in 1998 to an estimated 
80  percent  in  2004.  The  number  of  states  with  primary  seat  belt  laws  increased 
from  14  in  1998  to  21  (plus  the  District  of  Columbia  and  Puerto  Rico)  in  2004. 
NHTSA estimates that for each 1 percent increase in seat belt use, 270 deaths and 
4,400  serious  injuries  are  prevented  each  year.  A  key  tool  in  this  effort  is  the  pri-
mary  seat  belt  law,  which  allows  police  to  stop  and  ticket  a  motorist  solely  for  not 
wearing a seat belt. We agree with the Department’s proposal to reward states that 
enact  the  primary  seat  belt  law  or  show  significant  improvement  in  their  rate  of 
seat belt use.
• Increase  the  use  of  motorcycle  helmets.  Annual  deaths  from  motorcycle 
accidents  increased  60  percent,  or  by  1,367  deaths,  from  1998  to  2003.  This  is  one 
of  the  few  areas  where  there  is  still  ‘‘low-hanging  fruit’’  that  can  advance  progress 
toward achieving safety goals. In 2003, only 20 states, the District of Columbia, and 
Puerto  Rico  require  helmets  for  all  riders.  In  four  states  that  repealed  helmet  use 
laws  for  adults—Arkansas,  Texas,  Louisiana,  and  Kentucky—motorcycle  operator 
deaths increased (in August 2004, Louisiana re-enacted a universal helmet law). 

In  a  crash,  a  helmet-less  motorcyclist  is  40  percent  more  likely  to  suffer  a  fatal 
head  injury  and  15  percent  more  likely  to  suffer  a  nonfatal  injury  than  a  helmeted 
motorcyclist.  In  2003,  3,661  motorcyclists  died  and  approximately  67,000  were  in-
jured  in  highway  crashes  in  the  nation.  NHTSA  estimates  that  helmets  saved  the 
lives  of  1,158  motorcyclists  in  2003,  and  that  if  all  motorcycle  operators  and  pas-
sengers had worn helmets that year, another 640 lives would have been saved. 

In addition to lives lost, a key issue in the debate over helmet laws are the med-
ical costs that could be avoided with helmet use. One NHTSA study estimated that 
in 2002 motorcycle helmet use resulted in $1.3 billion in savings. An additional $853 
million  would  have  been  saved  if  all  motorcyclists  had  worn  helmets.  Another 
NHTSA study of motorcycle accidents in Missouri, New York, and Pennsylvania es-
timated that without a mandatory helmet law, inpatient medical costs for brain in-
juries would be almost twice as much.
• Detect  vehicle  and  equipment  defects  more  effectively.  In  September 
2000,  Congress  held  hearings  to  determine  why  NHTSA,  Firestone,  and  Ford  did 
not identify tread separation defects sooner to prevent the numerous deaths and in-
juries  associated  with  Ford  Explorers  equipped  with  defective  Firestone  tires.  Dur-
ing  the  hearings,  Congress  noted  that  the  data  available  to  NHTSA’s  Office  of  De-
fects Investigation (ODI) were insufficient, and that ODI did not use the data it did 
possess  to  spot  trends  related  to  failures  in  these  tires.  To  address  these  concerns, 
Congress passed the TREAD Act in October 2000. 

Its  purpose  was  to  create  new  equipment  standards  and  ways  for  the  automobile 
industry  and  the  Department  to  discover  safety  defects  more  quickly.  NHTSA  has 
implemented  all  of  the  TREAD  Act’s  22  requirements,  and  completed  a  new  safety 
defects  system  called  the  Advanced  Retrieval  (Tire,  Equipment,  Motor  Vehicle)  In-
formation System (ARTEMIS). This system was created to analyze the large volume 
of  early  reports  of  defects  from  manufacturers  and  consumers,  to  identify  defects 
that  require  further  investigation  and  possible  recall.  In  a  2002  audit  we  reported 
that  ODI  received  an  average  of  34,000  complaints  a  year  directly  from  consumers, 
and manufacturers received an even larger number. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

10

In  September  2004,  we  reported  that  ARTEMIS  had  cost  and  schedule  overruns 
early  in  its  development.  In  addition,  the  computer  system  cannot  yet  link  deaths 
to  an  alleged  defect,  or  identify  relationships  between  disparate  categories  of  infor-
mation, such as a consumer complaint and the filing of a warranty claim. 

Until these capabilities are implemented, analysts will not be able to fully utilize 
the  information  to  help  them  find  safety  defect  trends  and  subtle  relationships  in 
the  large  volume  of  data  it  receives.  NHTSA  is  working  to  improve  the  system  and 
has  set  milestones  for  adding  the  analytical  capability  and  for  completing  training 
of  staff  to  use  the  system  by  October  2005.  It  is  important  that  the  agency  follow 
through  on  implementing  those  capabilities  and  that  it  determine  the  reasons  why 
the number of vehicle recalls has been increasing. According to NHTSA, the number 
of vehicle recalls, whether voluntarily or by action of the government, has increased 
from 265 in 1995, to 541 in 2000, and to 602 in 2004.
• The  creation  of  the  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Admin-
istration  is  a  good  opportunity  for  this  new  agency  to  have  an  effect  simi-
lar to that of FMCSA. PHMSA faces three imperatives. First is to focus attention 
on safety and security for the more than 3 billion tons of regulated hazardous mate-
rials that move nationally in more than 292 million shipments each year. Hazardous 
materials is an area where safety and security intersect in significant ways. PHMSA 
must develop new ways to identify vulnerabilities of hazardous materials shipments 
to  negligence,  intentional  violations,  and  terrorist  attack.  The  intersection  of  safety 
and  security  was  particularly  evident  in  the  train  derailment  in  South  Carolina  in 
January 2005 that leaked chlorine, killing nine people and injuring hundreds. While 
preliminarily  attributed  to  human  error,  the  train  derailment  also  has  revealed  se-
curity vulnerabilities involving manually controlled switches. 

A  second  imperative  for  PHMSA  is  to  coordinate  hazardous  materials  regulatory 
issues with other agencies in the Department of Transportation and coordinate haz-
ardous materials security issues with the Department of Homeland Security (DHS). 
In  the  past  5  years,  success  in  achieving  Department-wide  objectives  to  facilitate 
hazardous  materials  regulatory  issues  has  been  limited,  due  primarily  to  each 
modal  administration  separately  administering  its  hazardous  materials  program. 
Coordinating  hazardous  materials  security  issues  with  DHS  is  never  more  evident 
than  with  the  responsibility  to  secure  the  U.S.  transportation  system  and  protect 
its users from criminal and terrorist acts, especially in the area of hazardous mate-
rials safety oversight and enforcement. A third imperative for PHMSA is to lead and 
coordinate  efforts  to  complete  eight  outstanding  hazardous  materials-related  man-
dates  and  23  outstanding  hazardous  materials-related  National  Transportation 
Safety  Board  recommendations  throughout  the  Department  that  are  long  overdue. 
One outstanding recommendation is to act with the Federal Railroad Administration 
to create fracture resistance standards for rail tank cars carrying dangerous chemi-
cals such as chlorine.
• Protect  consumers  from  fraud  perpetrated  by  unscrupulous  house-
hold goods moving companies. Although it is not safety-related, household goods 
moving  fraud  is  a  serious  problem,  with  thousands  of  victims  who  have  fallen  prey 
to  these  scams  across  the  country.  Typically,  an  unscrupulous  operator  will  offer  a 
low-ball  estimate  and  then  refuse  to  deliver  or  release  the  household  goods  unless 
the  consumer  pays  an  exorbitant  sum,  often  several  times  the  original  estimate.  In 
one case, for example, a New York husband and wife in their seventies were quoted 
a  price  of  $2,800  to  move  their  household  goods  to  Florida.  Once  the  movers  had 
loaded about half of the goods, the foreman advised the couple that unless they paid 
the new price of $9,800 they would never see their property again. Fearing that the 
moving  crew  might  physically  hurt  them,  the  couple  paid  the  vastly  inflated  price. 
Since  2000,  our  office  has  investigated  allegations  of  fraud  associated  with  ap-
proximately  8,000  victims,  involving  more  than  25  household  goods  moving  compa-
nies. FMCSA data reflects that since 2001, consumers have filed over 10,000 official 
complaints  via  its  hotline  against  household  goods  movers,  including  about  2,500 
complaints that accuse movers of overcharging, providing misleading and inaccurate 
estimates, and other serious tariff violations. 

Until  this  year,  FMCSA  had  dedicated  one  full-time  investigator  for  household 
goods  complaints.  Because  of  Congressional  concern  over  the  increase  in  fraud, 
FMCSA received an increase in funding in FY 2004 to hire 10 additional investiga-
tors. It has also cross-trained other safety inspectors to support its household goods 
investigation  efforts.  FMCSA’s  goal  is  to  conduct  300  investigations  by  the  end  of 
FY  2005,  compared  to  just  over  30  conducted  in  FY  2004.  Clearly,  this  is  an  area 
where  stronger  sanctions  and  authorities  are  needed  to  leverage  the  limited  re-
sources available to respond to the steadily increasing volume of complaints of fraud 
and abuse in the household goods moving industry. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

11

The House version of TEA–21 reauthorization (H.R. 3), which passed last month, 
contains  important  provisions  to  strengthen  enforcement  in  this  area,  including 
greater  civil  penalties  and  ensuring  that  states  have  the  authority  to  take  enforce-
ment  action,  under  federal  regulations,  against  a  company  operating  in  interstate 
commerce.  Also,  significantly,  H.R.  3  creates  a  specific  federal  felony  of  holding 
goods  hostage  and  sets  2  years  imprisonment  per  count  as  the  maximum  penalty, 
but  this  is  relatively  low  for  a  felony.  We  recommend  that  the  maximum  penalty 
be  at  least  5  years  imprisonment,  to  fall  in  line  with  most  other  federal  felonies, 
given the underlying nature of the crime, which really is extortion. 

This concludes our testimony. Thank you for inviting us to testify here today. We 

would be glad to answer any questions that you have.

Senator  LOTT.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Mead.  I’ll  look  forward  to  having 
an opportunity to ask you questions after we hear from the rest of 
the panel. 

Our  next  witness  is  Dr.  Jeff  Runge,  Administrator,  National 

Highway Traffic Safety Administration. 

Dr. Runge? 

STATEMENT  OF  HON. 

JEFFREY  W.  RUNGE,  M.D.,
ADMINISTRATOR,  NATIONAL  HIGHWAY  TRAFFIC  SAFETY
ADMINISTRATION 
Dr. RUNGE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, Senator Inouye, Members 
of the Subcommittee, Chairman Stevens. Thank you for the chance 
to speak with you today about our mission to reduce fatalities and 
injuries on our nation’s roadways. 

During  2003,  Mr.  Chairman,  42,643  people  died  on  our  nation’s 
roadways, and 2.9 million were injured. Our analysis of crashes in 
the  year  2000  reveals  that  a  single  year’s  motor-vehicle  crashes 
cost  the  American  economy  $230  billion.  To  put  those  figures  into 
perspective,  the  fatality  figure  for  crash  victims  is  slightly  more 
than three times the number of AIDS deaths annually, and the cost 
to  our  economy  exceeds  the  gross  national  product  of  many,  if  not 
most, countries. 

In  response  to  these  staggering  numbers,  Secretary  Mineta  did 
set a challenging goal to reduce deaths to no more than 1.0 deaths 
per  hundred-million  vehicle  miles  traveled,  by  2008.  Our  current 
overall  fatality  rate  is  1.48,  an  all-time  low.  But  we  will  not  ap-
proach  that  goal  of  1.0  without  the  help  of  Congress  to  authorize 
safety programs that are based on sound science. 

The  Administration’s  proposal  contains  many  sound,  scientif-
ically  based  proposals,  but  I  want  to  focus  my  testimony  on  one 
provision  that  will  save  more  lives,  and  do  it  faster  and  cheaper, 
than  any  other  proposal  that  you  will  consider  in  this  Congress  or 
probably  even  this  decade.  This  is  our  proposal  to  provide  incen-
tives to states to pass primary safety-belt laws or reach 90 percent 
safety-belt use for two consecutive years. 

A  primary  safety-belt  law  treats  safety-belt  usage  in  the  same 
manner  as  speeding,  running  a  red  light,  blowing  through  a  stop 
sign, as well as the hundreds of other laws that regulate dangerous 
behavior  while  driving.  Twenty-one  states,  plus  DC  and  Puerto 
Rico, have such laws. But, in 28 states, wearing a safety belt is also 
the  law,  but  a  police  officer  cannot  issue  a  citation  unless  the  mo-
torist  is  cited  for  another  offense.  And  this  situation  has  led  to  a 
very low safety-belt use in many of those states, because traffic offi-
cers are prevented from enforcing the law. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

12

If all states adopted a primary safety-belt law, we would prevent 
1,275  deaths  every  year,  and  prevent  17,000  serious  injuries  from 
going  to  our  trauma  centers.  Moreover,  for  every  percentage  point 
we raise belt use across the nation, we save 275 lives and $800 mil-
lion of economic cost. There is no other safety countermeasure that 
NHTSA can employ that will save more than 1,200 people annually 
for no additional cost. It’s simple, it works, and it’s life-saving. 

Now,  consider,  Mr.  Chairman,  that  NHTSA  recently  completed 
all of our rulemakings related to the TREAD Act. These actions as-
sociated  with  that  law  cost  consumers  about  $1.2  billion  in  cost, 
and took years to develop. In total, those improvements to vehicles 
and  tires  will  save  maybe  200  to  300  lives  yearly.  By  comparison, 
if  the  remaining  states  passed  a  primary  safety-belt  law  we  could 
save four times that number every year at no cost to the consumer. 
Simply put, getting safety-belt use to the level of other developed 
heavily motorized nations is long overdue. Nothing will accomplish 
this short of primary belt laws in every state in the land, and noth-
ing will prompt the passage of those primary safety-belt laws than 
this Committee reporting out a bill with a meaningful incentive for 
states to enact those primary safety-belt laws. 

I want to stress, Mr. Chairman, that our proposal includes incen-
tives  to  the  states,  not  sanctions.  The  Administration  recognizes 
that states are sovereign entities and not branch offices of the Fed-
eral  Government.  Nonetheless,  it  is  in  the  national  interest  for 
states to follow the science and pass this life-saving legislation. 

Our  proposal  also  gives  the  states  unprecedented  flexibility.  If 
there’s  one  complaint  that  I  hear  constantly  from  states,  it’s  that 
they  are  forced  to  spend  tax  dollars  not  where  they  would  do  the 
most  good,  but  according  to  a  predetermined  one-size-fits-all  for-
mula. 

Under  our  safety  proposal,  for  example,  a  state  could  use  a  por-
tion  of  its  highway-safety  incentive  funds  for  hazard  mitigation, 
putting up guardrails along a dangerous highway, or installing bet-
ter  signage,  or  median  barriers  in  an  interstate.  But,  on  the  other 
hand, if a state has a high impaired-driving rate or low safety-belt 
use, safety funds could be redirected to more vigorous enforcement 
or to a more sustained public-information campaign. 

The  principle  behind  this  provision  is  that  states  know,  them-
selves,  where  their  greatest  needs  are.  And,  therefore,  we  believe 
they should have the flexibility to address those needs. 

Mr.  Chairman,  before  coming  to  the  Administration,  I  spent  20 
years practicing and teaching emergency medicine in one of our na-
tion’s  busiest  trauma  centers.  Motor-vehicle  injury  is  a  disease.  It 
consumes  all  of  us,  particularly  our  young  people,  at  alarming 
rates.  I’ve  seen  and  felt  the  pain  of  many  families  who  have  been 
victimized  by  this  disease,  and  literally  so  many  of  us,  probably 
even in this room, are affected every year by this preventable cause 
of mortality. 

Mr. Chairman, it’s not hyperbole to state that providing a mean-
ingful  incentive  to  encourage  states  to  enact  primary  belt  laws 
would  be  the  single  most  important  traffic  safety  measure  that 
could  pass,  this  decade.  No  vehicle  mandate  for  improved  tech-
nologies,  no  elaborate  rulemaking,  no  public-relations  campaign  or 
public education would save as many lives. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

13

I  would  urge  the  Subcommittee  to  adopt  all  of  the  Administra-
tion’s safety proposals; but, most especially, I urge you to adopt our 
primary safety-belt-use-law incentives for the states. 

Thank  you  for  your  consideration  of  my  views,  and  I’ll  be  happy 

to answer any questions when my colleagues are finished. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Runge follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JEFFREY W. RUNGE, M.D., ADMINISTRATOR, 

NATIONAL HIGHWAY TRAFFIC SAFETY ADMINISTRATION 

Chairman Lott, Senator Inouye, Members of the Subcommittee: Thank you for the 
opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  the  Administration’s  proposal  to 
reauthorize our highway safety programs in the ‘‘Safe, Accountable, Flexible and Ef-
ficient  Transportation  Equity  Act  of  2003’’  or  ‘‘SAFETEA.’’  My  staff  and  I  look  for-
ward  to  working  with  this  Subcommittee  and  the  rest  of  the  Senate  to  shape  the 
proposals  that  will  reauthorize  our  programs  and  address  the  highway  safety  chal-
lenges facing the Nation. 

The National Highway Traffic Safety Administration’s (NHTSA) mission is to save 
lives  and  prevent  injuries.  Motor  vehicle  crashes  are  responsible  for  95  percent  of 
all  transportation-related  deaths  and  99  percent  of  all  transportation-related  inju-
ries. They are the leading cause of death for Americans for every age from 3 through 
33.  Although  we  are  seeing  improvements  in  vehicle  crash  worthiness  and  crash 
avoidance  technologies,  the  numbers  of  fatalities  and  injuries  on  our  highways  re-
main  staggering.  In  2003,  the  last  year  for  which  we  have  complete  data,  an  esti-
mated  42,643  people  were  killed  in  motor  vehicle  crashes.  This  number  represents 
a  slight  decrease  of  362  fatalities  from  2002  (43,005),  but  we  need  to  continue  and 
accelerate that downward trend. 

The  economic  costs  associated  with  these  crashes  seriously  impact  the  Nation’s 
fiscal health. The annual cost to our economy of all motor vehicle crashes is $230.6 
billion in Year 2000 dollars, or 2.3 percent of the U.S. gross domestic product. This 
translates  into  an  average  of  $820  for  every  person  living  in  the  United  States.  In-
cluded  in  this  figure  is  $81  billion  in  lost  productivity,  $32.6  billion  in  medical  ex-
penses, and $59 billion in property damage. The average cost to care for a critically 
injured  survivor  is  estimated  at  $1.1  million  over  a  lifetime,  a  figure  that  does  not 
begin to account for the physical and psychological suffering of the victims and their 
families. 

The  fatality  rate  per  100  million  vehicle  miles  traveled  (VMT)  in  2003  was  at  an 
all-time low of 1.48. Secretary Mineta has set a goal of reducing this rate even fur-
ther,  to  no  more  than  1.0  fatality  for  every  100  million  VMT  by  2008.  President 
Bush and Secretary Mineta have made reducing highway fatalities the number one 
priority  for  the  Department  of  Transportation  and  for  the  reauthorization  of 
NHTSA’s programs. 

As the statistics indicate, traffic safety constitutes a major public health problem. 
But unlike a number of the complex issues facing the Nation today, we have at least 
one  highly  effective  and  simple  remedy  to  combat  highway  deaths  and  injuries. 
Wearing  safety  belts  is  the  single  most  effective  step  individuals  can  take  to  save 
their lives. Buckling up is not a complex vaccine, doesn’t have unwanted side effects 
and doesn’t cost any money. It’s simple, it works and it’s lifesaving. 

Safety  belt  use  cuts  the  risk  of  death  in  a  severe  crash  in  half.  Most  passenger 
vehicle occupants killed in motor vehicle crashes are unrestrained. If safety belt use 
were  to  increase  from  the  2004  national  average  of  80  percent  to  90  percent—an 
achievable  goal—nearly  2,700  lives  would  be  saved  each  year.  For  every  1  percent-
age point increase in safety belt use—that is 2.8 million more people buckling up—
we would save hundreds of lives, suffer significantly fewer injuries, and reduce eco-
nomic costs by hundreds of millions of dollars a year. 

States recognize these lifesaving benefits, and have enacted safety belt laws. How-
ever, as of March 2005, only 21 states plus the District of Columbia and Puerto Rico 
have  primary  laws,  which  allow  police  officers  to  stop  and  issue  citations  to  motor-
ists  upon  observation  that  they  are  not  buckled  up.  Other  safety  belt  laws,  known 
as  secondary  laws,  do  not  allow  such  citations  unless  a  motorist  is  stopped  for  an-
other offense. In 2004, belt use in states with primary safety belt laws averaged 84 
percent, 11 points higher than in states with secondary laws—a statistically signifi-
cant  difference.  If  all  states  enacted  primary  safety  belt  laws,  we  would  prevent 
1,275  deaths  and  17,000  serious  injuries  annually.  Enacting  a  primary  safety  belt 
law  is  the  single  most  effective  action  a  state  with  a  secondary  law  can  take  to  de-
crease highway deaths and injuries. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

14

The  Administration’s  SAFETEA  proposal  builds  on  the  tremendous  successes  of 
previous surface transportation legislation by taking some important next steps. I’d 
like to highlight one very important component of this proposal that creates a strong 
incentive for states to enact primary safety belt laws or achieve high safety belt use 
rates, while at the same time streamlining NHTSA’s grant programs to make them 
more performance-based. 

The  Administration’s  SAFETEA  proposal,  transmitted  to  Congress  in  2003  and 
adjusted  this  February,  proposes  a  major  consolidation  of  NHTSA  highway  safety 
grant programs that would provide authorizations over the 6-year period to fund the 
basic formula grant program to the states under Section 402, but add two important 
new elements—a Safety Belt Performance Grant and a General Performance Grant. 
The  Safety  Belt  Performance  Grant  provides  up  to  $100  million  each  year  to  re-
ward states for passing primary safety belt laws or achieving 90 percent safety belt 
use rates in two consecutive years. Under our proposal, a state that has already en-
acted  a  primary  safety  belt  use  law  for  all  passenger  motor  vehicles  (effective  by 
December  31,  2002)  would  receive  a  grant  equal  to  2.5  times  the  amount  of  its  FY 
2003 formula grant for highway safety. A state that enacts a new primary belt law 
or  achieves  90  percent  belt  use  for  two  consecutive  years  will  receive  a  grant  equal 
to five times the amount of its FY 2003 formula grant for highway safety. This sig-
nificant  incentive  is  intended  to  prompt  state  action  needed  to  save  lives.  States 
achieve  high  levels  of  belt  use  through  primary  safety  belt  laws,  public  education 
using  paid  and  earned  media,  and  high  visibility  law  enforcement  programs,  such 
as the Click it or Ticket campaign. 

A state that receives a Safety Belt Performance Grant for the enactment of a pri-
mary safety belt law can elect to use all of those funds for a wide range of highway 
safety  programs,  including  infrastructure  investments  eligible  under  the  Federal 
Highway  Administration’s  (FHWA)  Highway  Safety  Improvement  Program  in  ac-
cordance with the state’s Comprehensive Strategic Highway Safety Plan. 

Under another provision of the Safety Belt Performance Grant, a state can receive 
additional grants by improving its safety belt use rates. This incentive, alone, would 
provide  up  to  $182  million  over  the  6-year  authorization  period.  Any  state  that  re-
ceives a grant for improved safety belt use rates is permitted to use up to 50 percent 
of  those  funds  for  activities  eligible  under  the  new  Highway  Safety  Improvement 
Program. 

The  6-year  General  Performance  Grant  component  of  our  consolidated  highway 
safety  grant  program  not  only  eases  the  administrative  burdens  of  the  states  but 
also  rewards  states  with  increased  federal  funds  for  measurable  improvements  in 
their  safety  performance  in  the  areas  of  overall  motor  vehicle  fatalities,  alcohol-re-
lated  fatalities,  and  motorcycle,  bicycle,  and  pedestrian  crash  fatalities.  Any  state 
that  receives  a  General  Performance  Grant  is  permitted  to  use  up  to  50  percent  of 
those  funds  for  activities  eligible  under  the  new  Highway  Safety  Improvement  Pro-
gram. 

These  grants  reflect  a  different  approach  to  addressing  the  Nation’s  substantial 
highway  safety  problems.  While  formulating  the  Department’s  reauthorization  pro-
posal, the FHWA and NHTSA embraced the guiding principle that states should re-
ceive resources to address their own, unique transportation safety issues, should be 
strongly encouraged to increase their safety belt use rates—the single most effective 
means  of  decreasing  deaths  and  injuries—and  should  be  rewarded  for  performance 
with  increased  funds  and  greater  flexibility  to  spend  those  funds  on  either  infra-
structure safety or behavioral safety programs. 

But  with  the  flexibility  comes  the  accountability.  States  will  be  held  accountable 
for  setting  realistic  and  appropriate  performance  goals,  devising  corresponding 
plans, and ultimately improving performance and achieving the goals. 

These guiding principles of flexibility and accountability underlie all aspects of the 
Administration’s highway safety reauthorization proposal. In fact, our Nation’s gov-
ernors  speak  with  one  voice  on  this  issue—and  they  all  want  maximum  flexibility 
to distribute highway safety funds where the need is the greatest. 

Mr. Chairman, the single most important safety measure Congress could pass this 
decade is SAFETEA’s proposal to provide incentive grants for states to pass primary 
belt laws. As the Nation’s chief highway safety official, I urge you to pass a bill that 
gives states the strongest incentives possible to enact primary belt laws. No vehicle 
safety mandate, no elaborate rulemaking, no public relations campaign that NHTSA 
could undertake would have the life-saving impact of Congress providing meaningful 
incentives to the states to pass primary belt laws. 

I’d  like  to  give  you  a  brief  overview  of  some  of  the  other  provisions  of  our 

SAFETEA proposal transmitted to Congress in 2003. 

SAFETEA  would  establish  a  new  core  highway  safety  infrastructure  program,  in 
place  of  the  existing  Surface  Transportation  Program  safety  set-aside.  This  new 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

15

FHWA  program,  called  the  Highway  Safety  Improvement  Program  (HSIP),  would 
more than double funding over comparable TEA–21 levels, providing more funds for 
safety  projects  over  the  6-year  authorization  period.  In  addition  to  increased  fund-
ing,  states  would  be  encouraged  and  assisted  in  their  efforts  to  formulate  com-
prehensive highway safety plans. Those states with such comprehensive plans could 
flex up to 50 percent of their HSIP funds for behavioral safety programs. 

SAFETEA also is designed to help the states deter impaired driving. Reducing the 
number  of  impaired  drivers  on  our  roadways  is  a  complex  task  requiring  inter-
connected  strategies  and  programs.  In  2003,  an  estimated  17,013  people  died  in  al-
cohol-related  crashes  (40  percent  of  the  total  fatalities  for  the  year),  a  29-percent 
reduction  from  the  23,833  alcohol-related  fatalities  in  1988,  and  a  decline  of  3  per-
cent  over  2002.  Our  data  show  that  2003  was  the  first  year  since  1999  that  the 
number of alcohol-related fatalities decreased. The proportion of traffic deaths of in-
dividuals with a blood-alcohol content above .08—the legal limit in every state—was 
highest  in  2003  for  21–24  year  olds,  at  32  percent,  followed  by  25–34  year  olds,  at 
27 percent. 

A component of our revised Section 402 program would focus significant resources 
on  a  small  number  of  states  with  particularly  severe  impaired  driving  problems  by 
creating  a  new  $50-million-a-year  impaired  driving  discretionary  grant  program. 
The grant program would include support for up to 10 states with an especially high 
number  of  alcohol-related  fatalities  and  a  high  rate  of  alcohol-related  fatalities  rel-
ative to vehicle miles traveled and population. A team of outside experts would con-
duct detailed reviews of the impaired driving systems of these states to assist them 
in  developing  a  strategic  plan  for  improving  programs  and  reducing  impaired  driv-
ing-related fatalities and injuries. Additional support would be provided for training, 
for  technical  assistance  in  the  prosecution  and  adjudication  of  driving  while  intoxi-
cated  (DWI)  cases,  and  to  help  licensing  and  criminal  justice  authorities  close  legal 
loopholes. 

NHTSA believes that this targeted state grant program and supporting activities, 
together  with  continued  nationwide  use  of  high-visibility  enforcement  and  paid  and 
earned  media  campaigns,  would  lead  to  a  continuation  of  the  downward  trend  in 
alcohol-related  fatalities.  Also,  through  the  comprehensive  safety  planning  process, 
all  states  could  elect  to  use  a  significant  amount  of  their  FHWA  Highway  Safety 
Infrastructure  funding,  in  addition  to  their  consolidated  highway  safety  program 
funds, to address impaired driving. 

SAFETEA’s  highway  safety  title  includes  a  key  provision  to  authorize  a  com-
prehensive national motor vehicle crash causation survey to enable us to determine 
the factors responsible for the most frequent causes of crashes on the Nation’s roads. 
This  comprehensive  survey  would  be  funded  at  $10  million  a  year  out  of  the  funds 
authorized for our highway safety research and development program. The last com-
prehensive  update  of  crash  causation  data  was  generated  in  the  1970s.  Congress 
has  recognized  the  importance  of  this  survey  and  so  far  has  appropriated  $14  mil-
lion for this effort. Appropriations have been used to develop protocols and method-
ology,  procure  equipment,  hire  and  train  new  researchers,  establish  data  collection 
methodology and structure and begin field data collection. 

SAFETEA  also  would  create  a  new  $50-million-a-year  incentive  grant  program 
that  builds  upon  a  TEA–21  program  to  encourage  states  to  improve  their  traffic 
records data. Accurate state traffic safety data are critical to identifying local safety 
issues, applying focused safety countermeasures, and evaluating the effectiveness of 
countermeasures. Improvements are needed for police reports, driver licensing, vehi-
cle  registration,  and  citation/court  data  to  provide  essential  information.  Addition-
ally, deficiencies in data negatively impact national databases including the Fatality 
Analysis  Reporting  System,  General  Estimates  System,  National  Driver  Register, 
Highway  Safety  Information  System,  and  Commercial  Driver  License  Information 
System. 

For the past 20 years, federal support for Emergency Medical Services (EMS) has 
been  both  scarce  and  uncoordinated.  As  a  result,  the  capacity  of  this  critical  public 
service has seen little growth, and support for EMS has been spread among a num-
ber  of  agencies  throughout  the  Federal  Government,  including  NHTSA.  Except  for 
NHTSA,  most  of  the  support  offered  by  these  agencies  has  focused  only  on  specific 
system functions, rather than on overall system capacity, and has been inconsistent 
and ineffectively coordinated. 

SAFETEA would establish a new $10 million-a-year state formula grant program 
to  support  EMS  systems  development,  including  9–1–1  nationwide,  and  would  pro-
vide for a Federal Interagency Committee on EMS to strengthen intergovernmental 
coordination of EMS with NHTSA providing staff support. The states would admin-
ister the grant program through their state EMS offices and coordinate it with their 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

highway safety offices. Enactment of this section would result in comprehensive sup-
port for EMS systems, and improved emergency response capacity nationwide. 

16

SAFETEA  also  would  provide  a  total  of  over  $500  million  for  NHTSA’s  highway 
safety  research  and  development  program.  This  program  supports  state  highway 
safety  behavioral  programs  and  activities  by  developing  and  demonstrating  innova-
tive  safety  countermeasures  and  by  collecting  and  disseminating  essential  data  on 
highway  safety.  The  results  of  our  Section  403  research  provide  the  scientific  basis 
for  highway  safety  programs  that  states  and  local  communities  can  tailor  to  their 
own  needs,  ensuring  that  precious  tax  dollars  are  spent  only  on  programs  that  are 
effective. The states are encouraged to use these effective programs for their ongoing 
safety programs and activities. 

Highway safety behavioral research focuses on human factors that influence driv-
er and pedestrian behavior and on environmental conditions that affect safety. This 
research addresses a wide range of safety problems through various initiatives, such 
as  impaired  driving  programs,  safety  belt  and  child  safety  seat  programs  and  re-
lated  enforcement  mobilizations,  pedestrian,  bicycle,  and  motorcycle  safety  initia-
tives, enforcement and justice services, speed management, aggressive driving coun-
termeasures,  emergency  medical  services,  fatigue  and  inattention  countermeasures, 
and data collection and analysis efforts. These efforts have produced a variety of sci-
entifically sound data and results. 

Finally, SAFETEA would provide a total of over $23 million for the National Driv-
er  Register.  This  system  facilitates  the  exchange  of  driver  licensing  information  on 
problem drivers among the states and various federal agencies to aid in making de-
cisions concerning driver licensing, driver improvement, and driver employment and 
transportation safety. 

Overall, SAFETEA is a groundbreaking proposal that offers states more flexibility 
than  they  have  ever  had  before  in  how  they  spend  their  federal-aid  safety  dollars. 
It  reduces  state  administrative  burdens  by  consolidating  multiple  categorical  grant 
programs into one. It would reward states for accomplishing easily measurable goals 
and  encourage  them  to  take  the  most  effective  steps  to  save  lives.  It  is  exactly  the 
kind  of  proposal  that  is  needed  to  more  effectively  address  the  tragic  problem  of 
highway fatalities. 

On  the  motor  vehicle  safety  side  of  NHTSA’s  mission,  we  focus  our  efforts  on  ac-
tions offering the greatest potential for saving lives and preventing injury. In 2003, 
we  published  the  first  ever  NHTSA  multi-year  vehicle  safety  rulemaking  priorities 
and  supporting  research  plan.  It  sets  forth  the  agency’s  rulemaking  goals  for  2003 
through  2006.  We  have  transmitted  to  Congress  the  January  2005  update  of  the 
plan, which covers the years 2005 through 2009. 

In  addition,  we  are  committed  to  reviewing  all  Federal  Motor  Vehicle  Safety 
Standards  systematically  over  a  7-year  cycle.  NHTSA  is  a  data-driven  and  science-
driven  agency,  and  we  decided  that  such  a  review  is  needed  in  light  of  changing 
technology,  vehicle  fleet  composition,  safety  concerns  and  other  issues  that  may  re-
quire  changes  to  a  standard.  Our  regulatory  reviews  are  in  keeping  with  the  goals 
of the Government Performance and Results Act, to ensure that our rulemaking ac-
tions  produce  measurable  safety  outcomes.  Several  decades  of  vehicle  safety  rule-
making have demonstrated that quality data and research produce regulations that 
are  technically  sound,  practicable,  objective,  and  repeatable.  Our  rulemaking  prior-
ities plan was crafted with these principles in mind. 

NHTSA’s  priority  rulemakings  for  the  immediate  future  include  enhanced  side 
crash  protection;  improved  rollover  crash  protection  through  advanced  prevention 
technologies,  reduced  occupant  ejection,  and  upgraded  roof  crush  protection;  reduc-
tion  in  light  vehicle  tire  failures;  and  shorter  stopping  distances  for  heavy  trucks. 
Our longer-term priorities include research and rulemaking decisions to address ve-
hicle ‘‘aggressivity’’ toward other vehicles; improved visibility through enhanced mir-
rors  and  other  technologies;  reduction  in  crashes  associated  with  driver  distraction; 
improved  heavy  truck  tires;  ensuring  the  safety  of  hydrogen,  fuel  cell,  and  alter-
native-fueled  vehicles;  and  advancing  crash  avoidance  technologies,  such  as  driver-
assist  systems.  We  have  integrated  our  rulemaking  priorities  plan  and  our  sup-
porting  research  plan  to  ensure  that  research  is  available  when  needed  to  conduct 
rulemakings that advance safety. 

I  would  ask  the  Subcommittee  not  to  include  rulemaking  mandates  in  your  bill 
to  reauthorize  NHTSA’s  programs.  Mandates  take  away  NHTSA’s  ability  to 
prioritize its work based on its most important safety priorities, to revise those pri-
orities as circumstances change, and to have the time needed to ensure that our reg-
ulations are based on sound science. Mandates that dictate timelines and the regu-
latory  approach  impair  our  ability  to  provide  the  public  with  the  best  safety  solu-
tions. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

17

Mr.  Chairman,  the  Secretary  named  the  Administration’s  proposal  ‘‘SAFETEA’’ 
for a very good reason. This Subcommittee literally has the power to save thousands 
of  lives  in  the  years  to  come  at  no  cost  to  the  consumer.  I  urge  you  to  support  the 
Administration’s SAFETEA proposal, and especially to give the states the necessary 
incentives  to  pass  primary  belt  laws.  It  is  worth  repeating  that  nothing  Congress 
will do in this bill will have a greater and a more lasting impact on safety. 

Thank  you  for  your  consideration  of  my  views.  I  will  be  pleased  to  answer  any 

questions you may have.

Senator  LOTT.  Thank  you  very  much,  Dr.  Runge,  for  your  testi-
mony,  and  I  will  have  some  questions  on  the  things  you  did  talk 
about,  and  one  or  two  that  maybe  you  just  ran  out  of  time  and 
didn’t have enough time to comment on. 

Next, we will hear from Annette Sandberg——
Oh,  yes,  Senator  Stevens  does  have  to  leave  to  attend  a  leader-
ship  meeting.  Senator  Stevens,  did  you  have  any  comment  or  any 
questions you’d like to submit for the record at this point? 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, Mr. Chairman, I do apologize for coming in 
late  and  being  called  now  to  a  leadership  meeting,  but  I  do  hope 
we’ll  pursue  some  concepts  of  incentives  to  the  states  to  increase 
their safety precautions and requirements for safety. 

My state is one that doesn’t have a primary seatbelt law—safety-
belt  law,  which  I  regret.  Those  of  us  that  are  pilots  just  automati-
cally get in anything and lock up. You know? It is—it becomes sec-
ond nature. And I’m sad to see that this is the case. 

I  would  urge  us  to  consider  giving  advantages  to  those  states 
that  have  records  of  compliance,  in  terms  of  safety  features,  both 
safety  belts  and  the  guardrails,  and  let  them  have  more  discretion 
in how they use their funds, but, at the same time, have some basic 
mandates  for  use  of  funds  where  there  is  no  apparent  attempt  to 
adopt  some  of  the  approaches  that  have,  in  fact,  reduced  injuries 
and deaths on the highway. 

And  I  want  to,  particularly,  be  able  to  talk  to  you  about—Mem-
bers  of  the  Committee—about  the  increasing  problem  that  Mr. 
Mead  has  mentioned,  in  terms  of  motorcycles.  They’re  a  wonderful 
vehicle  for  enjoyment  and  seeing  the  outdoors,  but  the  increased 
accident rate bothers me considerably, and I think we have to find 
some  way  to  stimulate  greater  safety  education  for  those  who  use 
motorcycles. 

So,  I  thank  you  very  much  for  the  hearing.  I  will  have  some 
questions  I’d  like  to  add  for  the  record,  and  I  apologize  to  my  col-
leagues for speaking up before my turn. 

Senator  LOTT.  And  since  we  are  on  a  tight  time  schedule,  in 
terms  of  marking  up  a  bill,  I  would  urge  the  witnesses  to  respond 
as quickly as possible to these questions from the Chairman of the 
full  Committee  so  that  we’ll  have  them  when  we  go  to  mark-up 
here, in a week or so. 

Senator  Pryor,  we  have  already  noted  that  any  prepared  state-
ment you have would be put in the record at the beginning. Do you 
have  any  question  or  comment  right  at  this  point,  or  can  we  pro-
ceed with the witnesses? 

Senator PRYOR. I don’t. Thank you. 
Senator  LOTT.  All  right.  Thank  you  for  being  here,  Senator 

Pryor. 

Anything further, Senator Inouye? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

18

Then  we  are  ready  to  go  with  Annette  Sandberg.  Ms.  Sandberg 
is  Administrator  of  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administra-
tion. 

Welcome. We’d be glad to hear your testimony. 

STATEMENT OF HON. ANNETTE SANDBERG, ADMINISTRATOR, 

FEDERAL MOTOR CARRIER SAFETY ADMINISTRATION 

Ms. SANDBERG. Thank you, sir. 
Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  Inouye,  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee, thank you for inviting me today to discuss the successes 
the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  has  had  in  en-
hancing safety on our nation’s highways, particularly as they relate 
to the safe operation of commercial motor vehicles and their opera-
tors. 

As  Secretary  Mineta  has  said  many  times,  safety  is  the  center-
piece of the Administration’s reauthorization proposal. We are com-
mitted to achieving the Department’s highway-safety goal of reduc-
ing the fatality rate in all motor-vehicle crashes by 41 percent from 
1996  to  2008.  And  I’m  pleased  to  report  that  the  Fiscal  Year  2003 
commercial motor-vehicle fatality rate of 2.3 is the lowest recorded 
since the Department initiated tracking in 1975. 

In  Fiscal  Year  2004,  federal  and  state  enforcement  operations 
that ensured compliance with the Federal Motor Carrier safety reg-
ulations  included  the  following:  more  than  25,000  new  entrance 
safety  audits,  over  11,000  safety  compliance  reviews,  and  nearly 
three million roadside inspections. As a result, our agency initiated 
more than 5,000 enforcement cases. 

The  Administration’s  SAFETEA  proposal  transmitted  to  Con-
gress  in  2003,  and  adjustments  this  February,  proposes  important 
advances  to  our  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Program.  And  I’m  pleased 
that items we believe critical for safety continue to be addressed by 
your Subcommittee. However, we ask the Subcommittee to address 
the  following  issues  in  our  title:  the  codification  of  the  existing 
hours-of-service  rule  for  interstate  commercial  motor-vehicle  driv-
ers,  the  commercial  driver’s  license  improvements,  the  safety  and 
security  of  the  southern  border,  increasing  penalties  for  unscrupu-
lous  household  goods  brokers,  establishment  of  the  medical  pro-
gram and medical registry, and hazardous-materials transportation 
safety. 

With regard to the hours of service, I would like to report on the 
progress  we  have  made  since  Congress  passed  the  most  recent 
TEA–21  extension.  I  established  a  dedicated  hours-of-service  team 
that  reports  directly  to  me.  The  team  is  on  track  to  meet  the  Sep-
tember  deadline.  However,  the  new  rule,  like  the  old  rule,  will  not 
please  everyone.  I’m  concerned  that  the  revised  rule  will  open  the 
agency  and  the  Department  to  the  same  kinds  of  legal  challenges 
we’ve experienced already. These challenges keep the industry and 
others  in  a  constant  state  of  uncertainty.  And,  for  this  reason,  the 
Administration seeks the inclusion of language in the Senate reau-
thorization  bill  that  would  make  the  2003  rule  permanent  and 
allow  our  agency  the  opportunity  to  revise  the  rule  in  the  future, 
if necessary. 

Another  important  initiative  is  the  Commercial  Driver’s  License 
Improvement  Program.  In  2004,  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

19

Administration conducted 16 compliance reviews of state CDL pro-
grams,  we  strengthened  oversight  of  the  annual  state  self-certifi-
cation  CDL  programs,  and  allocated  22  million  of  grant  funds  in 
support of states to address compliance, fraud, and security issues. 
We  are  also  partnering  with  the  Office  of  the  Inspector  General  to 
coordinate  CDL  fraud  investigation  by  providing  CDL-specific  in-
vestigative  expertise  to  state  agencies,  and,  where  warranted,  fed-
eral prosecution of criminal violations. 

The  Administration  has  requested  greater  enforcement  of  viola-
tions  by  movers  of  household  goods.  The  Administration’s  proposal 
establishes  more  visible  enforcement  through  increased  investiga-
tions  and  expanded  outreach.  Additionally,  we  seek  authority  for 
state  attorneys  general  to  enforce  federal  household  goods  regula-
tions against interstate carriers. We believe this authority will help 
reduce abusive practices and make sure there is consistency in en-
forcement across the country by having one set of regulations, rath-
er than many state regulations. 

Since the beginning of this fiscal year, the agency has conducted 
over  100  investigations,  representing  three  times  as  many  as  in 
Fiscal  Year  2004.  And  we  are  on  target  to  meet  our  annual  goal 
of 300 investigations this year. 

Currently,  the  agency  has  10  full-time  safety  investigators,  and 
we’ve—devoted,  specifically  to  household  goods  enforcement—and 
we’ve  trained  an  additional  37  investigators  to  support  this  effort. 
Another  important  aspect  of  our  reauthorization  proposal  is  the 
creation  of  a  standing  medical  review  board  to  provide  our  agency 
with  expert  medical  advice  on  driver-qualification  standards  and 
guidelines,  medical-examiner  education  and  research,  thereby  en-
hancing our ability to adopt medically sound and up-to-date regula-
tions. 

In the past, we’ve assembled expert medical specialists on an ad-
hoc  basis  to  review  the  standards  and  guidelines  for  qualifying 
truck and bus drivers. Many of the standards that we now have in 
place  were  adopted  in  the  early  1970s  or  since  then.  A  standing 
medical review board will greatly enhance our ability to adopt reg-
ulations that reflect current medical advances. 

The  Administration  is  committed  to  implementing  fully  the 
NAFTA  land  transportation  provisions.  In  2004,  the  Supreme 
Court  ruled  in  the  Administration’s  favor  in  a  suit  which  would 
have  required  preparation  of  an  environmental  impact  statement 
for  the  rules.  The  most  recent  Inspector  General  audit  for  the 
NAFTA  implementation  released  in  January  of  this  year  stated 
that  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  has  suffi-
cient  staff,  facilities,  equipment,  and  procedures  in  place  to  sub-
stantially  meet  the  Section  350  provisions  for  Mexican  long-haul 
trucks. 

One of the requirements mandated in Section 350 makes the in-
spection  procedures  and  decal  of  a  nongovernmental  organization 
mandatory  for  Mexican  CMVs.  In  the  Administration’s  safety  ad-
justments,  we  propose  that  the  required  inspection  decal  be  issued 
or  approved  by  the  Secretary  of  Transportation.  We  feel  that  this 
is an important function for which the Federal Government should 
be responsible. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

20

FMCSA  has  implemented  a  comprehensive  hazardous-material 
security program to improve the secure transportation of hazardous 
materials on our highways and protect the country from the threat 
of  terrorism.  The  program  includes  an  enforcement-compliance 
component,  as  well  as  an  outreach  component.  A  major  element  of 
our  HAZMAT  security  program  involves  a  new  HAZMAT  permit 
program. Carriers of extremely high-hazard materials are required 
to obtain a permit. This permit is contingent upon the carriers de-
veloping  and  maintaining  a  satisfactory  security  program  that 
meets  the  requirements  of  the  hazardous-materials  regulations, 
and includes a communication component for permitted loads. 

Mr. Chairman, I am pleased to report that the FMCSA is making 
steady  progress  addressing  our  congressional  regulatory  and  re-
porting  requirements.  When  I  began  as  Administrator,  there  was 
a  tremendous  regulatory  backlog.  During  my  tenure,  in  the  last  2 
years,  I  have  reduced  this  backlog  by  over  40  percent.  I  have  met 
with  your  staff  to  update  them  on  our  progress,  and  I  would  ask 
that  any  current  or  future  mandated  rulemakings  not  be  added  to 
your  bill.  FMCSA  needs  to  be  able  to  set  rulemaking  priorities 
based on safety and not mandated timelines. 

Thank you for inviting me to discuss the Federal Motor Carriers 
Safety Administration’s priorities, and I would be happy to respond 
to any questions you may have. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Sandberg follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. ANNETTE SANDBERG, ADMINISTRATOR, FEDERAL 

MOTOR CARRIER SAFETY ADMINISTRATION 

Chairman  Lott,  Senator  Inouye,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee.  Thank  you 
for inviting me today to discuss the successes the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Ad-
ministration  (FMCSA)  has  had  in  enhancing  safety  on  our  nation’s  highways,  par-
ticularly  as  they  relate  to  the  safe  operation  of  commercial  motor  vehicles  (CMVs) 
and  their  operators.  I  last  appeared  before  this  Committee  in  June  2003,  just  one 
month  after  my  confirmation  hearing.  Nearly  2  years  later,  I  am  pleased  to  report 
that CMV safety has greatly improved during my tenure as Administrator. 
Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration Overview 

As Secretary Mineta has said many times, safety is the centerpiece of the Admin-
istration’s  Safe,  Accountable,  Flexible,  and  Efficient  Transportation  Equity  Act 
(SAFETEA). FMCSA is committed to that goal. Our agency was conceived out of the 
need  for  stronger  CMV  safety—it  is  our  mandate.  More  than  that,  our  agency  con-
sists  of  a  group  of  dedicated  professionals  to  whom  safety  is  the  highest  priority. 
Toward  that  goal,  FMCSA  is  working  to  reduce  the  unnecessary  loss  of  life  on  our 
nation’s  highways.  FMCSA  is  committed  to  achieving  the  Department’s  highway 
safety  goal  of  reducing  the  fatality  rate  in  all  motor  vehicle  crashes  by  41  percent 
from  1998  to  2008.  Our  part  of  that  goal  is  to  reduce  commercial  vehicle  crash  fa-
talities  to  1.65  fatalities  per  100  million  miles  of  truck  travel.  Achieving  our  safety 
goal  will  be  challenging,  as  commercial  vehicle  miles  traveled  are  increasing  at  a 
rate  faster  than  that  of  passenger  cars.  I  am  pleased  to  report  that  the  FY  2003 
CMV fatality rate of 2.3 is the lowest recorded since the Department initiated track-
ing in 1975. 

Safety  improvements  like  these  cannot  be  accomplished  without  sound  programs 
and  adequate  enforcement  across  all  levels  of  government.  Enforcement  is  the  cor-
nerstone  of  motor  carrier  safety.  In  FY  2004,  federal  and  state  safety  enforcement 
operations  that  ensured  compliance  with  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Regulations 
included  the  following:  more  than  25,000  new  entrant  safety  audits;  over  11,000 
safety  compliance  reviews;  and  nearly  3  million  roadside  inspections.  As  a  result, 
FMCSA initiated more than 5,000 enforcement cases. In 2003, an Office of Manage-
ment  and  Budget  assessment  found  that  FMCSA  has  achieved  reductions  in  the 
large  truck  fatality  rate  in  each  of  the  past  5  years  and  is  on  track  to  achieve  its 
ambitious long-term safety goals. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

21

The  Administration’s  SAFETEA  proposal,  transmitted  to  Congress  in  2003  and 
updated  in  adjustments  this  February,  proposes  important  advances  to  our  motor 
carrier  safety  program.  I  am  pleased  that  items  we  believe  critical  for  safety  con-
tinue  to  be  addressed  by  your  Committee.  They  include:  the  penalty  for  denial  of 
access to records, increased penalties for out-of-service violations, and safety fitness. 
We have also been working with Committee staff on some of our SAFETEA adjust-
ments,  specifically  patterns  of  safety  violations  by  motor  carrier  management  and 
intrastate  operations  of  interstate  motor  carriers,  and  we  appreciate  their  willing-
ness to work with us to increase safety in these areas. 

However, in order for FMCSA to fully achieve its safety mission, we ask the Com-
mittee to address the following issues: the codification of the existing hours of serv-
ice  rule  for  interstate  CMV  drivers,  Commercial  Driver’s  License  (CDL)  improve-
ments,  the  safety  and  security  of  the  Southern  Border,  increasing  penalties  for  un-
scrupulous household goods brokers, establishment of the medical review board and 
medical registry, mandatory fuel surcharge, and hazardous materials transportation 
safety. 
Hours of Service 

With regard to hours of service, I would like to report on the progress made since 
the  most  recent  extension  of  the  Transportation  Equity  Act  for  the  21st  Century 
(TEA–21),  on  September  30,  2004.  In  the  Surface  Transportation  Extension  Act  of 
2004,  Part  V,  Congress  provided  that  the  current  hours-of-service  rule  will  stay  in 
effect until the Agency publishes a final rule addressing the factors in the July 2004 
decision  of  the  U.S.  Court  of  Appeals  for  the  District  of  Columbia  Circuit,  or  Sep-
tember 30, 2005, whichever is earlier. 

I  established  a  dedicated  hours-of-service  task  force  that  reports  directly  to  me. 
This  task  force  consists  of  some  of  the  most  highly  respected  professionals  in  our 
agency.  Its  work  has  already  proved  exceptional—since  its  creation  the  task  force 
has  issued  its  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  (NPRM)  on  the  new  rule  and  is  on 
track to meet the September deadline. However, the new rule, like the old rule, will 
not please everyone. I am concerned that the revised rule will open the Agency and 
the Department to the same kinds of legal challenges we have experienced already. 
These  challenges  keep  the  industry  and  others  in  a  constant  state  of  uncertainty. 
For  this  reason,  the  Administration  seeks  the  inclusion  of  language  in  the  Senate 
reauthorization bill that will make the 2003 rule permanent and allow FMCSA the 
opportunity to revise the rule, if necessary. 

Another  issue  of  concern  is  the  number  of  proposed  exemptions  to  the  hours  of 
service rule. The old rule on hours of service contained statutory exemptions for var-
ious industries. These exemptions have been retained in the new rule. New blanket 
statutory exemptions for various industries increase the likelihood that tired drivers 
will be on the roads endangering the driving public. 

Overall,  these  exemptions  compromise  safety.  They  create  enforcement  problems, 
hamper accurate recordkeeping, encourage other industries to seek exemptions, and 
dilute the objective of providing drivers a more regular schedule to coincide with cir-
cadian  rhythms.  As  Administrator  of  the  Agency,  I  am  charged  with  fulfilling  its 
mandate  of  improving  the  safety  of  these  drivers  and  the  traveling  public  with 
whom  they  interact.  Exemptions  to  the  hours  of  service  rule  without  data  and  re-
search  to  support  the  exemptions  hamper  the  Agency’s  ability  to  fulfill  our  safety 
mission. 
CDL Improvement Program 

Another important initiative is the Commercial Driver’s License improvement pro-
gram.  Critical  to  the  safety  and  security  of  the  United  States,  the  CDL  grant  pro-
gram  is  the  latest  in  a  series  of  efforts  by  our  agency  to  improve  and  enhance  the 
effectiveness  of  the  CDL  program.  Since  implementation  of  the  CDL  program  in 
1986,  FMCSA  has  promulgated  regulations  addressing  state  compliance  with  the 
CDL  requirements,  initiated  judicial  outreach,  expanded  state  CDL  compliance  re-
view, and most recently developed a CDL anti-fraud program. In 2004, FMCSA con-
ducted 16 compliance reviews of state CDL programs, strengthened oversight of an-
nual  state  self-certification  of  CDL  programs  and  allocated  $22  million  in  grant 
funding for states to address compliance, fraud, and security issues. 

Also  in  2004,  FMCSA  organized  a  working  group  of  motor  vehicle  administrators 
and law enforcement staff to address anti-fraud initiatives. The group has made sev-
eral  recommendations  to  eventually  be  included  in  a  model  law  enforcement  pro-
gram for preventing CDL fraud. This program, when fully implemented, will estab-
lish  a  framework  for  motor  vehicle  and  law  enforcement  agencies  to  work  collabo-
ratively in addressing CDL fraud. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

22

FMCSA is also partnering with the Office of Inspector General (OIG) to coordinate 
CDL  fraud  investigations  by  providing  CDL-specific  investigative  expertise  to  state 
agencies,  and  where  warranted,  federal  prosecution  for  criminal  violations.  With 
FMCSA’s  assistance,  the  OIG  is  preparing  training  materials  for  their  field  inves-
tigators to assist in CDL-related investigations. 

Finally,  the  CDL  compliance  review  program  now  includes  a  specific  anti-fraud 
component.  The  agency  has  included  anti-fraud  priorities  as  an  eligible  funding  ac-
tivity for CDL improvement grant funds. Not only has FMCSA elevated fraud issues 
with  states  during  CDL  compliance  reviews  and  with  CDL  grant  awards  but  also 
will  continue  to  emphasize  fraud  awareness  training  to  state  law  enforcement  and 
motor vehicle personnel. 
Household Goods Enforcement 

The  Administration  has  requested  greater  enforcement  of  violations  by  movers  of 
household goods (HHG). I know that the Chairman and Members of this Committee 
have  noticed  an  increase  in  consumer  complaints  about  household  goods  carriers. 
The  Administration’s  proposal  establishes  more  visible  enforcement  through  in-
creased  investigations  and  expanded  outreach.  Our  efforts  seek  to  increase  con-
sumer  awareness  and  help  citizens  make  better-informed  decisions  when  moving 
across state lines. Additionally, we seek authority for State Attorneys General to en-
force federal household goods regulations against interstate carriers. We believe this 
authority will help reduce abusive practices and makes sure there is consistency in 
enforcement  across  the  country  by  having  one  set  of  regulations  rather  than  many 
state regulations. 

For  FY  2005,  FMCSA  is  conducting  strike  force  activity  in  states  where  we  have 
seen the highest level of complaints, with a goal of 300 investigations. These states 
are Florida, New York, New Jersey, and California. Since the beginning of the fiscal 
year,  the  Agency  has  conducted  over  100  investigations,  three  times  as  many  as  in 
FY  2004,  and  is  on  target  to  meet  its  annual  goal.  FMCSA  used  the  $1.3  million 
appropriated  to  hire  federal  employees  to  investigate  HHG  complaints  and  to  con-
duct  concentrated  strike  force  activities,  bringing  together  investigators  from 
throughout the country to operate in a specific area for a short period of time. Cur-
rently, the Agency has 10 full-time safety investigators devoted to HHG enforcement 
and we have trained an additional 37 investigators to support this effort. Our agen-
cy is committed to eradicating this threat to American consumers. 
Medical Review Board 

Another  important  aspect  of  our  reauthorization  proposal  is  the  creation  of  a 
standing medical review board to provide the Agency with expert medical advice on 
driver  qualification  standards  and  guidelines,  medical  examiner  education,  and  re-
search, thereby enhancing our ability to adopt medically sound and up to date regu-
lations.  In  the  past,  we  have  assembled  expert  medical  specialists  on  an  ad  hoc 
basis  to  review  the  standards  and  guidelines  for  qualifying  truck  and  bus  drivers. 
Many  of  the  standards  in  place  now  were  adopted  in  the  1970s  or  earlier.  A  stand-
ing review board will greatly enhance the Agency’s ability to adopt regulations that 
reflect current medical advances. Establishment of a medical registry would respond 
to the National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB), which issued eight safety rec-
ommendations  in  September  2001,  requiring  that  FMCSA  establish  comprehensive 
standards  for  qualifying  medical  providers  and  conducting  medical  qualification 
exams. 

Last  Congress,  S.  1072  established  a  medical  review  board  based  on  the  Federal 
Aviation Administration (FAA) model for pilot standards. Neither FMCSA nor FAA 
believes the FAA model to be an appropriate one for CMV drivers. The sheer num-
ber of drivers and differences in the age and health characteristics of the driver pop-
ulation  make  this  model  an  untenable  one  for  FMCSA.  The  FAA  has  6,000  author-
ized aviation medical examiners to perform yearly exams on approximately 270,000 
pilots.  FMCSA  estimates  that  approximately  300,000  medical  examiners  perform 
exams on approximately 6.4 million CMV drivers on a biennial basis. While I appre-
ciate  the  Committee’s  inclusion  of  the  medical  registry  provision,  I  urge  the  Com-
mittee to rework the review board model and provide adequate funding to maximize 
our ability to set appropriate medical standards for CMV drivers. 
Safety and Security at the Southern Border 

The Administration is committed to implementing fully the North American Free 
Trade  Agreement  (NAFTA)  land  transportation  provisions.  In  June  2004,  the  U.S. 
Supreme  Court  ruled  in  the  Administration’s  favor  in  a  suit  that  would  have  re-
quired environmental analyses of the rules. The most recent Inspector General audit 
for  NAFTA  implementation,  released  in  January  2005,  stated:  ‘‘FMCSA  has  suffi-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

23

cient  staff,  facilities,  equipment  and  procedures  in  place  to  substantially  meet  the 
eight Section 350 provisions for Mexican long haul trucks.’’ 

In preparation for allowing Mexican carriers beyond the commercial zones and in 
response  to  the  mandates  of  Section  350  of  the  FY  2002  DOT  Appropriations  Act, 
FMCSA  has  deployed  274  inspectors,  auditors,  and  investigators  along  the  border 
to  process  these  carriers.  FMCSA  has  provided  funds  to  the  four  southern  Border 
States to hire additional inspectors and construct inspection facilities. As of Decem-
ber 10, 2004, 693 Mexican carriers have applied for authority to operate beyond the 
commercial  zones.  Of  the  693  applications,  314  are  ready  for  the  mandated  safety 
audit. 

One  of  the  requirements  in  Section  350  of  the  FY  2002  DOT  Appropriations  Act, 
which  has  been  adopted  in  all  subsequent  DOT  appropriations  acts,  makes  the  in-
spection  procedures  and  decal  of  a  non-governmental  organization  mandatory  for 
Mexican  CMVs.  In  one  of  the  Administration’s  SAFETEA  Adjustments,  we  propose 
that the required inspection decal be issued or approved by the Secretary of Trans-
portation. We feel that this is an important function for which the Federal Govern-
ment should be responsible. 
Hazardous Materials Transportation 

FMCSA  has  implemented  a  comprehensive  Hazardous  Materials  (HM)  Security 
Program  to  improve  the  secure  transportation  of  hazardous  materials  on  our  high-
ways  and  protect  the  country  from  the  threat  of  terrorism.  The  program  includes 
an enforcement/compliance component as well as an outreach component. 

A major element of the FMCSA HM Security Program involves FMCSA’s new HM 
Permit Program. Carriers of extremely high-hazard materials are required to obtain 
a  permit  from  FMCSA.  This  permit  is  contingent  upon  the  carrier’s  developing  and 
maintaining a satisfactory security program that meets the requirements of the HM 
Regulations  and  includes  a  communication  component  for  permitted  loads.  FMCSA 
will  validate  the  adequacy  of  the  security  plan  for  1,200  carriers  during  FY  2006 
using  a  Security  Contact  Review  (SCR).  The  SCR  includes  an  in-depth  assessment 
of the adequacy of a carrier’s security plan and its implementation as well as secu-
rity  training,  communication  requirements,  and  other  requirements  of  the  HM  per-
mit program. 
Mandatory Fuel Surcharge 

The  Nation  has  benefited  enormously  from  our  economic  deregulation  of  the 
transportation industry. In the last 25 years, the free market for motor carrier serv-
ices  in  particular  has  made  important  contributions  to  the  growth  and  efficiency  of 
our  economy  and  helped  to  sustain  its  remarkable  ability  to  create  new  jobs.  Al-
though the price of diesel fuel has risen sharply in the past few years, the allocation 
of  those  costs  among  the  buyers  and  sellers  of  transportation  is  best  accomplished 
through the working of the marketplace, not by government prescription. The man-
datory fuel surcharge for truckload transportation prescribed by section 4139 of H.R. 
3 would insinuate government into commercial relationships in a way that is ill-ad-
vised  and  that  would  reverse  a  quarter-century  of  U.S.  economic  policy.  For  these 
reasons,  the  Administration  strongly  urges  the  members  of  this  Committee,  and 
other Senators, not to include language supporting a fuel surcharge in its reauthor-
ization bill. 
Regulatory Backlog 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  am  pleased  to  report  that  FMCSA’s  progress  has  been  steady 
and  our  future  is  bright.  One  aspect  of  our  progress  of  which  I  am  particularly 
proud  is  how  we  have  addressed  our  Congressional  regulatory  and  reporting  re-
quirements.  When  I  began  as  Administrator,  there  was  a  tremendous  regulatory 
backlog.  During  my  tenure,  I  have  reduced  this  backlog  by  over  40  percent.  I  have 
met  with  your  staff  to  update  them  on  our  progress.  I  ask  that  no  mandated 
rulemakings be added to the Committee’s bill. FMCSA needs to be able to set rule-
making priorities based on safety, not mandated timelines. 
Conclusion 

I wish to thank you for inviting me to discuss the achievements FMCSA has made 
toward  reducing  fatalities  and  injuries  on  our  nation’s  highways.  This  reauthoriza-
tion represents the first opportunity for our 5-year old agency to step forward, stand 
on its own, and chart our course. I would be happy to respond to any questions you 
may have.

Senator LOTT. Thank you very much, Ms. Sandberg. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

24

And,  let’s  see,  our  last  witness  today  is  Ms.  Stacey  Gerard,  Act-
ing  Assistant  Administrator,  Chief  Safety  Officer,  Pipeline  and 
Hazardous Materials Safety Administration. 

Welcome. We’d be glad to hear your testimony. 

STATEMENT  OF  STACEY  L.  GERARD,  ACTING  ASSISTANT
ADMINISTRATOR/CHIEF  SAFETY  OFFICER,  PIPELINE  AND
HAZARDOUS MATERIALS SAFETY ADMINISTRATION (PHMSA) 
Ms. GERARD. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  am  Stacey  Gerard,  the  Acting  Assistant  Administrator/Chief 
Safety  Officer,  of  PHMSA.  And  thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to 
discuss our hazardous-materials program. 

This is the first appearance before your Committee as an official 
of  this  new  agency,  PHMSA,  created  by  the  Norman  Mineta  Act. 
Our new organization reflects the importance the Department puts 
on improving the safety and security of hazardous materials. 

Hazardous  materials  are  essential  to  our  economy  and  well-
being.  Our  priority  is  keeping  Americans  safe.  With  more  than  3 
billion  tons  of  regulated  HAZMAT  in  transport  each  year,  and 
those  amounts  on  the  rise,  our  focus  in  on  those  that  pose  the 
greatest threat to safety. 

Our  hazardous-materials  program  is  focused  on  four  principal 
areas.  First,  we  have  comprehensive  regulations.  Second,  we  help 
shippers  and  carriers  understand  and  comply  with  those  regula-
tions. Third, we identify and stop those persons who do not comply 
with  the  regulations.  Finally,  we  assist  the  nation’s  response  com-
munity  to  plan  for  and  respond  to  HAZMAT  transportation  emer-
gencies. 

Since 9/11, a major focus of the regulatory program has been se-
curity. In 2003, we required certain shippers and carriers to imple-
ment security planning, addressing personnel, unauthorized access, 
en-route  security,  and  training.  We’re  working  with  the  Federal 
Railroad Administration and the Department of Homeland Security 
to  enhance  the  security  of  rail  shipments.  Those  materials  classi-
fied  as  toxic  by  inhalation,  or  TIH,  pose  a  special  risk  in  an  inci-
dent  because  of  the  greater  likelihood  of  exposing  a  significant 
number of people to hazards. 

Our  regulations  provide  for  domestic  and  international  shippers 
to use largely the same set of standards. This is good for safety and 
commerce.  We  are  currently  working  to  harmonize  requirements 
for cylinders and infectious substances. 

We  make  a  priority  of  helping  shippers  and  carriers  know  and 
comply  with  the  regulations.  In  addition  to  an  active  Website,  we 
take  130  hotline  calls  every  day,  plus  offering  hundreds  of  work-
shops each year. 

There  will  always  be  people  who,  through  ignorance  or  neg-
ligence, do not comply with the hazardous-materials transportation 
safety regulations. PHMSA, alone, conducts 1900 inspections annu-
ally;  700  inspections  this  past  year  addressed  adequacy  of  security 
plans.  We  are  enforcing  against  over  40  percent  of  companies  who 
did not meet our standards. 

Despite  best  efforts,  accidents  will  occur,  and  assisting  emer-
gency  responders  is  a  priority  for  us.  Every  4  years,  PHMSA  and 
our  partners  in  Canada  and  Mexico  publish  an  updated  version  of 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

25

the  Emergency  Response  Guidebook.  The  ERG,  as  it  is  commonly 
known,  is  hailed  as  a  most  valuable  emergency  reference  for 
HAZMAT  emergencies.  But  there  is  no  better  testament  to  it  than 
its translation in more than 30 languages. 

We also operate planning and training grants programs to assist 
local  responders  at  HAZMAT  incidents.  This  help  is  vital  to  our 
many communities served largely by volunteer emergency respond-
ers. This help is also useful to communities traversed by pipelines. 
You invited me here today specifically to discuss reauthorization 
of  the  Hazardous  Materials  Transportation  Safety  Program.  We 
hope  that  the  Committee’s  proposal  will  reallocate  food-transpor-
tation  responsibilities  to  the  most  qualified  agencies.  We  hope  you 
will  provide  civil  penalty  authority  for  the  postal  service  to  help 
fine  and  punish  undeclared  HAZMAT  shipments  in  the  mail.  We 
hope for enhancements to our enforcement program to help us take 
swift  action  to  identify  and  remove  hidden  unsafe  shipments  from 
transportation.  We  should  be  permitted  to  open  and  examine  sus-
pect packages. Finally, raising penalties to 100,000 per violation is 
important and needed. 

We  do  not  support  proposals  to  revise  the  Registration  Fee  Pro-
gram.  Specifically,  we  are  concerned  that  a  cap  on  the  maximum 
annual  registration  fee  may  require  us  to  modify  our  current  two-
level fee structure and impose substantial registration increases on 
small entities. 

Finally,  we  hope  you  consider  reducing  the  area  of  overlap  be-
tween  DOT’s  regulation  of  HAZMAT  transportation  and  the  Occu-
pational  Safety  and  Health  Administration’s  regulation  of  worker 
protection. 

We look forward to working with the Members of this Committee 
and  with  Congress  to  enhance  the  safe  and  secure  transportation 
of hazardous materials. 

Thank  you,  again,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  the  opportunity  to  appear 

and respond to your questions and concerns. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Gerard follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF STACEY L.  GERARD,  ACTING ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR/
AND HAZARDOUS MATERIALS SAFETY

CHIEF SAFETY OFFICER,  PIPELINE
ADMINISTRATION (PHMSA) 
Mr.  Chairman,  I  am  Stacey  L.  Gerard,  the  Acting  Assistant  Administrator/Chief 
Safety Officer of PHMSA, the Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administra-
tion of the Department of Transportation. With me is Robert McGuire, PHMSA’s As-
sociate  Administrator  for  the  Office  of  Hazardous  Materials  Safety.  Thank  you  for 
this opportunity to discuss with you the Department’s ongoing efforts to improve the 
safe and secure transportation of hazardous materials. 

Before  I  begin,  I  would  like  to  note  an  important  milestone.  This  is  the  first  ap-
pearance of an official of the new Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Adminis-
tration  before  your  Committee.  Our  new  organization  reflects  the  Department’s 
longstanding  commitment  to  the  safety  of  our  Nation’s  pipeline  infrastructure  and 
our continuing emphasis on the safety and security of commercial shipments of haz-
ardous materials by all modes of transport. The importance of this new organization 
is underscored by the fact that our regulatory authority for safety covers 28 percent 
of the ton freight moved annually in the United States. 

PHMSA’s  Office  of  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  is  responsible  for  a  comprehen-
sive,  nationwide  program  designed  to  protect  the  Nation  from  the  risks  to  life, 
health, property, and the environment inherent in the commercial transportation of 
hazardous materials. 

Hazardous  materials  are  essential  to  the  economy  of  the  United  States  and  the 
well-being  of  its  people.  Hazardous  materials  fuel  automobiles,  and  heat  and  cool 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

26

homes and offices, and are used for farming and medical applications and in manu-
facturing,  mining,  and  other  industrial  processes.  More  than  3  billion  tons  of  regu-
lated  hazardous  materials—including  explosive,  poisonous,  corrosive,  flammable, 
and radioactive materials—are transported in this country each year. There are over 
800,000  daily  shipments  of  hazardous  materials  moving  by  plane,  train,  truck,  or 
vessel  in  quantities  ranging  from  several  ounces  to  many  thousands  of  gallons. 
These  shipments  frequently  move  through  densely  populated  or  sensitive  areas 
where the consequences of an incident could be loss of life or serious environmental 
damage. Our communities, the public, and workers engaged in hazardous materials 
commerce count on these shipments being safe and secure. 

Safety  continues  to  be  Secretary  Mineta’s  highest  priority,  and  it  is  the  first  pri-
ority  for  the  hazardous  materials  safety  program.  Overall,  the  safety  record  for  the 
transportation  of  hazardous  materials  is  excellent.  Over  the  past  10  years,  221  fa-
talities  were  caused  by  incidents  involving  hazardous  materials  in  transportation, 
and  half  of  those  were  due  to  a  single  event,  the  Valujet  tragedy  in  1996.  While 
every  casualty  is  one  too  many,  in  the  context  of  800,000  daily  shipments,  this  is 
a remarkable record. 

Since  9/11,  we  have  moved  aggressively  to  recognize  and  address  security  issues 
associated with the commercial transportation of hazardous materials. In the wrong 
hands, hazardous materials could pose a significant security threat. Hazardous ma-
terials  in  transportation  are  frequently  transported  in  substantial  quantities  and 
are potentially vulnerable to sabotage or misuse. Such materials are already mobile 
and are frequently transported in proximity to large population centers. Further, se-
curity of hazardous materials in the transportation environment poses unique chal-
lenges  as  compared  to  security  at  fixed  facilities.  Finally,  hazardous  materials  in 
transportation often bear clear identifiers to ensure their safe and appropriate han-
dling  during  transportation  and  to  facilitate  identification  and  effective  emergency 
response in the event of an accident or release. 

Hazardous materials safety and security are two sides of the same coin. Congress 
legislated  its  intent  that  ‘‘hazmat  safety  [was]  to  include  hazmat  security’’  when  it 
enacted  the  Homeland  Security  Act  of  2002.  Section  1711  of  that  act  amended  the 
federal hazardous materials transportation law to authorize the Secretary of Trans-
portation to ‘‘prescribe regulations for the safe transportation, including security, of 
hazardous  material  in  intrastate,  interstate,  and  foreign  commerce’’  and  to  provide 
that the Hazardous Materials Regulations ‘‘shall govern safety aspects, including se-
curity,  of  the  transportation  of  hazardous  material  the  Secretary  considers  appro-
priate.’’  DOT  shares  responsibility  for  hazardous  materials  transportation  security 
with  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security.  The  two  departments  consult  and  co-
ordinate  concerning  security-related  hazardous  materials  transportation  require-
ments  to  assure  that  they  are  consistent  with  the  overall  security  policy  goals  and 
objectives  established  by  DHS  and  that  the  regulated  industry  is  not  confronted 
with inconsistent security regulations promulgated by multiple agencies. 

PHMSA’s  hazardous  materials  transportation  safety  and  security  program  is  fo-
cused on four principal areas. First, we have in place comprehensive regulations for 
the safe and secure transportation of hazardous materials. Second, we help shippers 
and  carriers  understand  the  regulations  and  how  to  comply  with  them.  Third,  we 
identify  those  persons  who  refuse  or  neglect  to  comply  with  safety  and  security  re-
quirements and stop their illegal activities. Finally, we assist the Nation’s response 
community  to  plan  for  and  respond  to  hazardous  materials  transportation  emer-
gencies. Throughout the remainder of my testimony, I will highlight actions we have 
taken in all of these areas to enhance hazardous materials transportation safety and 
security. 
Regulations Development 

The  Hazardous  Materials  Regulations—or  HMR—are  designed  to  achieve  three 

goals:

(1)  To  ensure  that  hazardous  materials  are  packaged  and  handled  safely  during 

transportation;

(2)  To  provide  effective  communication  to  transportation  workers  and  emergency 

responders of the hazards of the materials being transported; and

(3) To minimize the consequences of an incident should one occur.
The  hazardous  material  regulatory  system  is  a  risk  management  system  that  is 
prevention-oriented  and  focused  on  identifying  a  safety  or  security  hazard  and  re-
ducing the probability and quantity of a hazardous material release. We collect and 
analyze  data  on  hazardous  materials—incidents,  regulatory  actions,  and  enforce-
ment activity—to determine the safety and security risks associated with the trans-
portation  of  hazardous  materials  and  the  best  ways  to  mitigate  those  risks.  Under 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

27

the HMR, hazardous materials are categorized by analysis and experience into haz-
ard  classes  and  packing  groups  based  upon  the  risks  they  present  during  transpor-
tation. The HMR specify appropriate packaging and handling requirements for haz-
ardous  materials,  and  require  a  shipper  to  communicate  the  material’s  hazards 
through  use  of  shipping  papers,  package  marking  and  labeling,  and  vehicle 
placarding. The HMR also require shippers to provide emergency response informa-
tion  applicable  to  the  specific  hazard  or  hazards  of  the  material  being  transported. 
Finally,  the  HMR  mandate  training  requirements  for  persons  who  prepare  haz-
ardous  materials  for  shipment  or  who  transport  hazardous  materials  in  commerce. 
The  HMR  also  include  operational  requirements  applicable  to  each  mode  of  trans-
portation. 

In 2003, we published a final rule to require shippers and carriers of certain high-
ly  hazardous  materials  to  develop  and  implement  security  plans.  The  security  plan 
must  include  an  assessment  of  possible  transportation  security  risks  and  appro-
priate  measures  to  address  the  assessed  risks.  At  a  minimum,  the  security  plan 
must  address  personnel  security,  unauthorized  access,  and  en  route  security.  For 
personnel security, the plan must include measures to confirm information provided 
by job applicants for positions that involve access to and handling of the hazardous 
materials  covered  by  the  plan.  For  unauthorized  access,  the  plan  must  include 
measures  to  address  the  risk  that  unauthorized  persons  may  gain  access  to  mate-
rials or transport conveyances being prepared for transportation. For en route secu-
rity,  the  plan  must  include  measures  to  address  security  risks  during  transpor-
tation,  including  shipments  stored  temporarily  en  route  to  their  destinations.  The 
final  rule  also  included  new  security  awareness  training  requirements  for  all  haz-
ardous materials employees and in-depth security training requirements for employ-
ees of persons required to develop and implement security plans. 

We  continue  to  seek  ways  to  assure  the  security  of  hazardous  materials  ship-
ments. For example, we are working with DHS to examine ways to enhance the se-
curity of rail shipments of materials that are classified as Toxic by Inhalation (TIH). 
Under  the  HMR,  TIH  materials  are  gases  or  liquids  that  are  known  or  presumed 
on  the  basis  of  tests  to  be  toxic  to  humans  and  to  pose  a  hazard  to  health  in  the 
event of a release during transportation. TIH materials play a vital role in our soci-
ety,  including  purifying  water  supplies,  fertilizing  crops,  providing  fundamental 
components  in  manufacturing,  and  fueling  the  Space  Shuttle.  TIH  materials  pose 
special risks during transportation because their uncontrolled release can endanger 
significant numbers of people. Because of the importance of ensuring their safe and 
secure transportation, TIH materials are among the most stringently regulated haz-
ardous  materials.  DHS  and  DOT  are  examining  the  feasibility  of  specific  security 
enhancements,  including  potential  costs  and  benefits.  Security  measures  being  con-
sidered  include  improvements  to  security  plans,  modification  of  methods  used  to 
identify  shipments,  enhanced  requirements  for  temporary  storage,  strengthened 
tank car integrity, and implementation of tracking and communication systems. 

In addition to a new focus on security issues, PHMSA’s hazardous materials regu-
latory  program  has  recently  finalized  regulations  in  a  number  of  important  areas. 
For  example,  in  December  2004,  we  amended  the  HMR  to  prohibit  the  transpor-
tation  of  primary  lithium  batteries  and  cells  as  cargo  on  board  passenger  aircraft. 
Primary lithium batteries and cells pose an unacceptable fire risk for passenger air-
craft. 

Further, we amended the incident reporting requirements in the HMR to improve 
the  usefulness  of  data  collected  for  risk  analysis  and  management  by  government 
and industry. The new incident reporting regulations include a requirement for car-
riers to report undeclared shipments when they are discovered. 
International Standards Harmonization 

The  continually  increasing  amount  of  hazardous  materials  transported  in  inter-
national commerce warrants the harmonization of domestic and international trans-
portation  requirements  to  the  greatest  extent  possible.  Harmonization  serves  to  fa-
cilitate international transportation while helping to assure the protection of people, 
property,  and  the  environment.  The  HMR  provide  that  both  domestic  and  inter-
national  shipments  of  hazardous  materials  may  be  offered  for  transportation  and 
transported  under  provisions  of  international  standards  applicable  to  air  or  vessel 
transportation  of  hazardous  materials  or  the  Canadian  hazardous  materials  stand-
ards.  In  this  way,  carriers  are  able  to  train  their  hazmat  employees  in  a  single  set 
of  requirements  for  the  classification,  packaging,  communication  of  hazards,  han-
dling, stowage, and the like, thereby minimizing the possibility of improperly trans-
porting a shipment of hazardous materials because of differences in national regula-
tions. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

28

Basic  requirements  of  the  HMR  and  these  international  standards  are  based  on 
the United Nations Recommendations on the Transport of Dangerous Goods. Indeed, 
most national and regional regulations, such as the European road and rail regula-
tions, are based on the UN Recommendations, as are the regulations of some of our 
largest trading partners, including Mexico, Canada, and Japan. DOT represents the 
United  States  at  meetings  of  international  standards-setting  organizations  con-
cerned  with  the  safe  transportation  of  hazardous  materials  with  the  goal  of  pro-
moting a uniform, global approach to the safe transportation of hazardous materials. 
Our participation is essential to ensure that U.S. interests are considered in the de-
velopment of the standards issued by these organizations. 

We  recently  completed  a  rulemaking  to  harmonize  the  HMR  with  international 
standards applicable to the transportation of hazardous materials by air and vessel 
and to the transportation of radioactive materials. We are currently engaged in rule-
making  to  harmonize  HMR  cylinder  requirements  and  requirements  applicable  to 
the transportation of infectious substances with international requirements. 
Outreach and Training 

Developing  rigorous  safety  regulations  that  protect  the  public  and  workers  en-
gaged in hazardous materials commerce is critical to safe transportation. But regu-
lations  cannot  be  effective  if  shippers  and  carriers  do  not  understand  them.  There-
fore,  we  invest  significant  resources  to  help  shippers  and  carriers  know  the  regu-
latory  requirements  and  how  to  comply  with  them.  Our  comprehensive  hazardous 
materials  website  and  Hazardous  Materials  Information  System  allow  easy  access 
to vital hazardous materials data and information by industry, the public, DOT em-
ployees, hazardous materials workers, and federal and state agencies. We also oper-
ate  a  toll-free  hotline  service  every  day  from  9:00  a.m.  until  5:00  p.m.;  the  hotline 
answers  over  130  calls  per  day.  We  hold  training  workshops,  and  we  develop  and 
provide industry and the public with many publications and training modules. 

Since 9/11, PHMSA’s hazardous materials outreach and training program has de-
voted  substantial  time  and  effort  to  assisting  shippers  and  carriers  to  comply  with 
the  new  security  plan  requirements  and  to  generally  enhance  hazardous  materials 
transportation  security.  To  assist  hazardous  materials  shippers  and  transporters  in 
evaluating  security  risks  and  implementing  measures  to  reduce  those  risks,  we  de-
veloped  a  security  template  for  the  Risk  Management  Self-Evaluation  Framework 
or  RMSEF.  RMSEF  is  a  tool  we  developed  through  a  public  process  to  assist  regu-
lators,  shippers,  carriers,  and  emergency  response  personnel  to  examine  their  oper-
ations  and  consider  how  they  assess  and  manage  risk.  The  security  template  illus-
trates how risk management methodology can be applied to security issues. We also 
developed a Hazardous Materials Transportation Security Awareness Training Mod-
ule directed at law enforcement, industry, and the hazmat community. The training 
module  is  computer-based,  posted  on  our  website  and  is  available  free  of  charge  on 
CD–ROM.  To  date  we  have  distributed  over  68,000  copies  of  the  training  module. 
In  addition,  we  have  developed  security  information,  including  a  sample  security 
plan, to assist farmers to comply with security plan requirements. Finally, PHMSA’s 
outreach  staff  has  conducted  numerous  training  sessions  to  assist  the  regulated 
community  to  understand  and  comply  with  hazardous  materials  transportation  se-
curity requirements. 
Enforcement 

Although  training  and  education  are  valuable  tools  for  enhancing  compliance, 
there  will  always  be  people  who,  through  ignorance,  negligence  or  as  a  result  of 
knowing  or  intentional  actions,  do  not  comply  with  the  hazardous  materials  trans-
portation  safety  regulations.  Compliance  enforcement  efforts  are  thus  key  to 
PHMSA’s  efforts  to  reduce  incidents  that  result  from  unsafe  operations  by  compa-
nies  or  individuals  who  ship  or  transport  hazardous  materials  or  who  manufacture 
or  test  hazardous  materials  containers  and  packagings.  PHMSA  enforcement  spe-
cialists at our headquarters and five regional offices conduct 1,900 inspections annu-
ally  of  hazardous  materials  shippers,  freight  forwarders,  container  manufacturers 
and  packaging  requalifiers.  Since  the  implementation  of  new  security  requirements 
in  the  HMR,  our  inspectors  have  conducted  nearly  700  inspections  in  which  the 
company was required to have a security plan. To date, 57 percent of the companies 
are in full compliance. We are aggressively enforcing against those who are not. Our 
sister  DOT  operating  administrations—the  Federal  Aviation  Administration,  Fed-
eral Motor Carrier Safety Administration, and Federal Railroad Administration—to-
gether with the United States Coast Guard, also conduct modal inspections of ship-
pers  and  carriers.  To  further  leverage  our  resources,  we  conduct  joint  inspections 
with other federal agencies and states. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

Emergency Response 

29

Despite  best  efforts,  accidents  will  occur.  We  have  a  responsibility  to  reduce  the 
consequences  of  transportation  accidents  involving  hazardous  materials.  Thus,  we 
play  a  major  role  in  assisting  the  emergency  response  community  to  plan  for  and 
respond  to  hazardous  materials  transportation  incidents.  Every  4  years,  PHSMA 
and  our  partners  in  Canada  and  Mexico  publish  an  updated  version  of  the  Emer-
gency  Response  Guidebook.  We  developed  the  Guidebook  for  use  by  ‘‘first  respond-
ers’’—those public safety personnel first dispatched to the scene of a hazardous ma-
terials  transportation  incident,  such  as  fire  fighters,  police,  and  emergency  services 
personnel.  The  Guidebook  provides  first  responders  with  a  guide  for  initial  actions 
to be taken in those critical first minutes after an incident to protect the public and 
to  mitigate  potential  consequences.  The  Guidebook  has  been  widely  hailed  as  the 
single  most  valuable  reference  for  initial  response  to  hazardous  materials  emer-
gencies. We work with our Canadian and Mexican partners and with the emergency 
response  community  and  hazardous  materials  industry  to  assure  its  continuing  ac-
curacy and utility. To date, we have published and distributed over 2.1 million cop-
ies  of  the  2004  edition  of  the  Guidebook  for  first  responders  and  others  responsible 
for handling hazardous materials transportation emergencies in the U.S. The Guide-
book is also globally recognized and in addition to the English, French and Spanish 
editions produced by the U.S., Canada, and Mexico, it has been translated into Chi-
nese,  Dutch,  German,  Hebrew,  Hungarian,  Japanese,  Korean,  Polish,  Portuguese, 
Russian, Thai and Turkish. 

We also operate a planning and training grants program to assist local responders 
at  hazardous  materials  incidents.  The  possible  consequences  of  a  serious  incident, 
even  if  unlikely,  require  that  all  communities  develop  response  plans  and  train 
emergency  services,  fire  and  police  personnel  to  assure  an  effective  response.  The 
importance  of  planning  and  training  cannot  be  overemphasized.  To  a  great  extent, 
we  are  a  nation  of  small  towns  and  rural  communities  served  by  largely  volunteer 
fire  departments.  In  many  instances,  communities’  response  resources  already  are 
overextended in their efforts to meet routine emergency response needs. 

Our Emergency Preparedness Grants program provides assistance to states, terri-
tories, and Indian tribes, and, through them, to local communities. Planning grants 
are  made  for  developing,  improving,  and  implementing  emergency  plans.  Training 
grants provide for training public sector employees to respond to accidents and inci-
dents  involving  hazardous  materials.  Planning  and  training  grants  are  funded 
through  registration  fees  paid  by  the  hazardous  materials  industry.  Since  the  pro-
gram’s inception, grantees have developed or updated an average of 3,759 plans per 
year  with  HMEP  planning  grant  funds.  Grant  program  funds  have  been  used  to 
train  over  1.7  million  first  responders  and  to  compile  over  43,000  local  hazardous 
materials response plans. 
Hazardous Materials Program Reauthorization 

You invited me here today specifically to discuss reauthorization of the hazardous 
materials  transportation  safety  program.  We  hope  that  the  Committee’s  proposal 
will include the proposals submitted in prior years by the Administration, as did S. 
1072  in  the  108th  Congress.  For  example,  we  urge  you  to  consider  reallocating  re-
sponsibilities for sanitary food transportation among the Departments of Health and 
Human  Services,  Agriculture,  and  Transportation  to  ensure  that  each  aspect  of  the 
food  transportation  safety  mission  is  made  the  responsibility  of  the  most  qualified 
agency.  Similarly,  to  address  the  problem  of  undeclared  hazardous  materials  ship-
ments  in  the  mail,  we  support  measures  to  provide  authority  for  the  United  States 
Postal Service to collect civil penalties and recover costs and damages for violations 
of its hazardous materials regulations. 

In  addition,  we  would  support  revisions  to  the  terms  under  which  exemptions 
from the HMR may be granted. The exemptions program permits shippers and car-
riers  to  take  advantage  of  new  technologies  and  improved  business  methods  by  ap-
plying  for  permission  to  deviate  from  existing  regulatory  requirements.  Applicants 
for exemptions must demonstrate that the new technology or improved way of doing 
business  maintains  a  safety  level  equivalent  to  current  regulatory  requirements. 
The  exemptions  program  provides  an  opportunity  for  the  testing  and  evaluation  of 
technological improvements in a real-world transportation environment. Exemptions 
that  result  in  demonstrated  safety  and  efficiency  benefits  are  frequently  converted 
into regulations of general applicability. We suggest a provision to change the term 
‘‘exemption’’  to  ‘‘special  permit;’’  we  believe  that  this  change  appropriately  conveys 
that  hazardous  materials  transportation  conducted  under  what  are  now  termed  ex-
emptions  is  required  to  be  conducted  in  accordance  with  the  terms  and  conditions 
established  by  PHMSA.  In  addition,  revising  the  effective  period  for  which  a  re-
newal of a special permit may be issued from two years to four years will eliminate 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

30

a  great  deal  of  unnecessary  industry  and  government  processing  time  and  will  en-
able PHMSA staff to focus attention on significant special permit issues rather than 
routine renewals. 

We hope you will also consider measures to enhance our ability to enforce the haz-
ardous  materials  regulations  and  to  take  swift  action  to  identify  hidden  shipments 
and  remove  unsafe  shipments  from  transportation.  Hidden  hazardous  materials 
pose  a  significant  threat  to  transportation  workers,  emergency  responders,  and  the 
general public. Moreover, it is likely that terrorists who seek to use hazardous mate-
rials to harm Americans will move those materials as hidden shipments. Expanding 
our inspection authority to permit an enforcement officer to open and examine pack-
ages suspected to contain a hazardous material will help us to address the pervasive 
problem of undeclared hazardous materials shipments in transportation. Authoriza-
tion for enforcement officials to remove packages from transportation if the package 
poses  an  imminent  safety  hazard  or  to  issue  emergency  orders  to  stop  unsafe  prac-
tices  that  present  an  immediate  threat  will  materially  enhance  our  ability  to  pre-
vent  unsafe  movements  of  hazardous  materials  and  possible  accidents  resulting 
from  such  unsafe  movements.  And  increasing  the  maximum  civil  penalty  from 
$27,500  to  $100,000  for  each  violation  will  provide  us  with  the  flexibility  to  assess 
appropriately high civil penalties in cases involving significant non-compliance with 
the regulations and especially those resulting in death, serious injury, or significant 
property or environmental damage. 

We do not support proposals to revise the registration fee program that funds the 
Emergency Preparedness Grants program. Specifically, we are concerned that a cap 
on the maximum annual registration fee, when coupled with the significant increase 
to  the  grant  program  being  considered  by  both  the  Senate  and  the  House,  may  re-
quire  us  to  modify  our  current  two-level  fee  structure  and  impose  substantial  reg-
istration  fee  increases  on  small  entities.  We  are  also  concerned  that  reductions  in 
the  authorization  levels  for  elements  of  the  grant  program  may  limit  our  ability  to 
administer that program effectively. 

Finally,  we  request  that  you  consider  our  proposal  to  reduce  the  area  of  overlap 
between  DOT’s  regulation  of  hazardous  materials  transportation  and  the  Occupa-
tional Safety and Health Administration’s (OSHA’s) regulation of worker protection. 
The  Hazardous  Materials  Transportation  Uniform  Safety  Act  of  1990  gave  OSHA 
duplicative  regulatory  authority  over  hazardous  materials  training,  handling  cri-
teria, registration, and motor carrier safety. In consultation with OHSA, we propose 
to correct the extent of shared DOT/OSHA jurisdiction by eliminating dual jurisdic-
tion  over  handling  criteria,  registration,  and  motor  carrier  safety.  DOT  and  OSHA 
would  retain  their  respective  jurisdiction  over  employee  training,  and  OSHA  would 
retain its jurisdiction over the occupational safety or health protection of employees 
responding to a release of hazardous materials. 
Conclusion 

We  look  forward  to  working  with  the  Members  of  this  committee  and  with  Con-
gress  to  enhance  the  safe  and  secure  transportation  of  hazardous  materials.  At  the 
same  time,  we  will  continue  to  evaluate  and  implement  additional  safety  and  secu-
rity measures, and we will continue to work with the hazardous material transpor-
tation  community  and  our  federal,  state,  and  local  partners  to  maximize  the  con-
tribution  that  hazardous  materials  make  to  our  economy  while  minimizing  their 
safety and security risks. 

Thank you again, Mr. Chairman, for the opportunity to appear today and respond 

to your questions and concerns.

Senator LOTT. Thank you very much, Ms. Gerard. 
I  would  like  to  ask  some  questions.  And  I’d  like  to  ask  my  col-
leagues  to—let’s  keep  our  questions  to  5  minutes,  and  we’ll  do  a 
second and third round, if need be. 

First,  Mr.  Mead,  thank  you  for  the  job  you  do  as  Inspector  Gen-
eral  of  the  Department  of  Transportation.  I  think  you  do,  in  that 
position,  what  Congress  intended  when  we  created  it  in  the  first 
place a few years ago. 

Now,  let  me  ask  you  the  big  question  right  up  front.  In  your 
opinion, what could Congress do in this reauthorization that would 
have  the  most  immediate  impact  on  improving  safety  in  our  high-
way transportation systems? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

31

Mr.  MEAD.  I’d  have  to  say  a  primary  seatbelt  law.  I  think  the 
best  way  to  approach  that  is  through  incentives.  And,  as  I  said  in 
my statement, I know it’s very controversial, but I think the helmet 
laws—they’re proven to be effective. 

Senator LOTT. What, now? 
Mr. MEAD. Motorcycle helmet laws. 
Senator LOTT. The law? 
Mr.  MEAD.  And  I  know  they’re  controversial.  I  guess  it—people 
see it as interfering with their personal freedoms, and all that. But 
when  you  have  a  60  percent  increase  in  fatalities  since  1998,  that 
speaks volumes. 

So those are the two. And household goods, I didn’t mention that, 
because that’s not really a safety item. Commercial driver’s license 
fraud,  that’s  something  that  we  just  need  to  be  a  lot  more  forceful 
with.  If  we  can’t  keep  people  that  get  licenses  fraudulently  off  the 
road  and  stop  them  from  driving  these  big  rigs,  we’re  going  to 
be——

Senator  LOTT.  All  right,  let  me  ask  you  the  next  question,  then. 
What is the status of fully opening the border with Mexico to Mexi-
can  trucks?  And  can  we  do  this  in  a  way  that  is  efficient  and  also 
effective in protecting safety? 

Mr. MEAD. Yes, we can. And I think Motor Carriers has their re-
sources  in  place,  the  equipment  in  place  at  the  border.  In  other 
words, they’re standing ready. But there are two major issues that 
are stopping the opening of the border. One is that, under the law, 
we  have  to  be  able  to  inspect,  onsite  in  Mexico,  Mexican  trucking 
companies.  And  there  is  no  agreement  with  Mexico  to  do  that  yet. 
And  No.  2  is,  they  have  to  agree  on  HAZMAT  background  inves-
tigations with Mexico. Those two things haven’t been done. A third 
item  is,  I  think  we  ought  to  have  all  the  states  where  Mexican 
trucks  can  operate  enforcing  the  rule  that  if  a  Mexican  truck  is 
there illegally, it gets put out of service. 

Senator LOTT. This household-goods issue, I know there’s been a 
tremendous increase in the complaints filed. And, frankly, I’m a lit-
tle surprised that there are not existing laws, state or federal, that 
would  better  enforce  the  rights  of  the  consumers  that  have  been, 
you  know,  offended  by  all  of  this.  I  presume  you’ve  had  a  chance 
to  look  at  the  provisions  that  the  House  included  in  their  bill.  Do 
you  think  they  are  basically  the  type  of  provisions  we  need  to  in-
clude  in  our  bill  to  deal  with  the  fraud  in  this  household-goods 
moving industry? 

Mr. MEAD. Yes, sir. I would add that there is a provision in there 
on  putting  them  out  of  business  for  a  6-month  period.  You  might 
extend  that  period.  Second,  the  period  of  imprisonment,  normally 
for  an  extortion-type  crime  the  per-count  maximum  is  more  than 
just  2  years.  The  other  thing  of  key  importance  here  is  that  the 
state  attorney  generals  need  to  be  empowered  to  enforce  the  Fed-
eral regulatory regime. 

Senator  LOTT.  Dr.  Runge,  on  the  primary  safety—seatbelt  issue, 
you  know,  they’re—my  state,  unfortunately,  has  the  lowest  usage 
in  the  Nation—63  percent,  I  think.  And  I  think  that  there’s  no 
question  that  there’s  evidence  that  it  does  help  to  save  lives  and 
reduce  the  injuries,  although,  you  know,  Senator  Stevens  and  I, 
and  maybe  some  of  the  other  Members  of  the  Committee,  come 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

32

from  states  that  really  don’t  like  the  idea  of  the  Federal  Govern-
ment  telling  us  we’ve  got  to  wear  seatbelts,  we’ve  got  to  wear  hel-
mets. It’s—I don’t know what—just, sort of, ‘‘We don’t like the Fed-
eral  Government  doing  that,’’  sort  of  a—maybe  a  libertarian  atti-
tude,  although  I  think  that  the  attitude  has  been  improving  some. 
And I think part of what we need to do is a better job of education. 
Now,  the  Senate  in  my  state  did  pass  a  primary  safety-belt  law, 
45 to 7, which was overwhelming, but, unfortunately, in the House, 
the bill was opposed by the Speaker, and the Transportation Com-
mittee  Chairman  did  not  see  fit,  at  the  time,  to  go  forward,  al-
though an incentive of $9 million, in my poor state, is not insignifi-
cant. I’ve always been opposed to safety requirements that penalize 
states,  ‘‘Do  something  we  tell  you,  or  we’re  going  to  take  money 
away from you.’’ But you flip that—and I think Mr. Mead referred 
to  that—if  you  give  them  an  incentive,  ‘‘You  do  a  better  job,  and, 
you  know,  then  you’ll  get  some  reward  in  that  area.’’  So,  that  is 
what you’re proposing here, isn’t it, what the Administration is pro-
posing,  that  you  specify  that  if  you  do  have  these  primary  safety-
belt  laws,  or  if  you  meet  certain  standards  on  improved  safety  re-
sults or reduced fatalities, you get the incentives? Is that accurate? 
Dr. RUNGE. Yes, sir, that’s precisely our vision. And with this in-
centive,  we  really  wanted  to  make  it  a  significant  incentive.  We 
wanted  to  make  it  real  money.  I’ve  been  out  and  testifying  at  the 
invitation  of  several  state  legislatures,  and  I  can  tell  you  that  the 
opportunity  to  gain  extra  funds  to  apply  for  any  highway  safety 
purpose  really  does  represent  a  true  incentive.  Mississippi,  9  mil-
lion. Missouri has one on the table right now; it’s about 18 million. 
Tennessee  passed  their  bill  last  year,  16  million.  Illinois  passed 
their  bill  the  year  before;  that  would  be  31  million  in  incentives. 
So it does make a difference, sir. 

Senator  LOTT.  All  right.  What  percent  of  the  safety  funds  would 
have  the  flexibility  that  you  referred  to?  For  instance,  I  think  the 
best  safety  program  of  all  is  one  that  builds  safer  bridges  and 
wider  highways  and  flatter  roads.  That’s  what  led  to  my  own  fa-
ther’s  death  on  the  highway—narrow,  hilly,  two-lane  road,  and  he 
topped  the  hill  and  got  hit  head-on.  So  that’s  the  ultimate  safety, 
you  know,  incentive.  What  is  that  percentage  that  you’re—did  you 
have one in mind? 

Dr.  RUNGE.  Well,  we  proposed  $600  million  over  the  life  of  the 
bill, which is about two-tenths of 1 percent, for the primary belt in-
centives, and there are other incentive programs——

Senator  LOTT.  You  mentioned  a  specific  percentage—or  you  sug-
gested a percentage—that could be used for other than pure, tradi-
tional safety measures, like——

Dr. RUNGE. That’s correct. 
Senator LOTT.—bridges. 
Dr.  RUNGE.  Yes,  all  of  those  funds  would  be  flexible.  Now,  I—
there’s  a  small  caveat  to  that,  and  that  is  that  we  ask  every  state 
to  do  a  comprehensive  analysis  of  its  safety  problems  using  their 
own  data.  So  what’s  a  safety  problem  in  Alaska  is  very  different 
from what it is in Mississippi or South Carolina, so we want every 
state  to  apply  their  own  traffic  safety  data  to  find  out  where  their 
problems  are.  If  it’s  a  hotspot,  if  it’s  a  dead-man’s  curve,  if  it’s  a 
bad  hill  and  a  narrow  road,  that’s  hazard  mitigation  that  those 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

33

funds could be used for. If a state has a problem—particular prob-
lem  with  impaired  driving,  then  those  funds  can  be  used  for  that. 
It  really  depends  on  what  the  Governor  and  the  Department  of 
Transportation  and  the  Governor’s  Highway  Safety  Office  decide 
are  their  problems,  and  those  funds  then  would  be  flexed  to  meet 
those problems. 

Senator  LOTT.  Well,  let  me  just  ask  you  one  other  area.  You  did 
not address another area that is a serious contributor to traffic fa-
talities,  injuries,  and  deaths—and  that’s  drunk  driving.  What  are 
we going to do about that? 

Dr. RUNGE. Well, that was—since I had 5 minutes——
Senator LOTT. Yeah. 
Dr. RUNGE.—Senator——
Senator LOTT. Well, I’ve already used up my 5 minutes, too, and 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  LOTT.  My  colleagues  are  allowing  me  to  go  a  little  bit 

I——

over time. And we’ll be flexible now that——

Dr. RUNGE. Thank you. 
Senator LOTT.—we’ve got your testimony on record. 
Dr.  RUNGE.  We  have  actually  effected  the  first  decrease  in  im-
paired-driving fatalities in 5 years, and the largest decrease in the 
impaired-driving fatality rate in a decade. Now, that’s not a victory, 
because  we’re  still  losing  over  17,000  people  a  year  to  alcohol  im-
pairment; 15,000 of those have blood-alcohols over .08, and 50 per-
cent  of  those  drivers  involved  in  those  crashes  have  blood  alcohols 
greater  than  .16.  So,  we  realize  that  we’re  not  dealing  with  social 
indiscretions here; we’re dealing with people who have substantive 
medical alcohol problems. 

And we have taken a four-point strategy to deal with that. We’re 
working  with—in  the  states—one  is  continued  high  visibility  en-
forcement, so—to keep people who are socially responsible being re-
sponsible. And that has led to a pretty rapid decrease in the num-
bers of drivers with low blood-alcohol levels involved in fatal crash-
es. That’s the good news. 

The  second  one  was  that  we’re  working  with  the  court  systems. 
We’re  trying  to  get  DWI  courts  into  the  jurisdictions  across  the 
country  that  have  the  biggest  problems  with  impaired-driving 
crashes.  And  we  have  resource  prosecutors  now.  We’re  working  to 
have  resource  prosecutors  in  every  state  who  will  help  prosecutors 
with this very complex law. 

The  third  point  is  working  with  the  medical  community  to  actu-
ally do screening and referral for alcohol problems on every patient 
that they see, asking a simple question, ‘‘How many drinks do you 
drink  when  you  sit  down  to  have  some  drinks?’’  And,  surprisingly, 
the folks at NIAAA tell us that’s a pretty reliable indicator of peo-
ple with alcohol problems. If you drink four or more drinks at a sit-
ting, then you probably ought to get an evaluation. 

Now—and,  actually,  the  fourth  point  here,  the  thing  that  has 
made  probably  the  biggest  decrease  in  an  impaired-driving,  over-
all—impaired-driving  deaths,  overall—is  increased  safety-belt  use. 
And  we  enjoyed  an  80  percent  belt-use  rate  last  year,  and  I  have 
to  admit  that  a  lot  of  our—there’s  some  spillover  effect  into  im-
paired driving when potential victims are buckled up. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

34

So, that’s our strategy. 
Senator LOTT. Thank you. 
Senator Inouye, thank you for your patience, and feel free to take 

whatever time you need, sir. 

Senator  INOUYE.  I  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  can 
only stay for a moment, but I’d like to ask some general questions, 
and they can respond. 

I’d like to ask the panel, What is the appropriate level of funding 
for  the  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Assistance  Program  and  for  border-
safety  enforcement?  So  whoever  can  answer  that  can  submit  that 
in writing. 

Ms. Sandberg? 
Ms. SANDBERG. Yes. Senator, the current levels that we have for 
the Motor Carrier Safety Assistance Program is authorized—or out-
lined in the Administration’s SAFETEA proposal—are adequate for 
that  program.  That  includes  a  number  of  functions  beyond  the 
basic  MCSAP  levels.  As  you  know,  the  basic  MCSAP  formula  is  a 
formula  that  denotes  how  much  goes  to  each  state  for  the  Motor 
Carrier Safety Assistance Program. Those amounts for 2006, for ex-
ample,  would  be  about  134  million.  However,  if  you  look  at  the 
total rolling up, the commercial driver’s license programs, the high-
priority  funding  that  we  request,  and  some  of  those  others,  it  ap-
proaches to 180 million for those programs. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Thank  you.  I  listened  very  carefully  to  the  re-
sponse to our Chairman on the primary safety-belt law bonus. Ha-
waii  has  had  one  for  19  years  now,  and,  under  this  provision,  we 
get nothing, because we have been behaving ourselves. But——

[Laughter.] 
Senator  INOUYE.—if  you  have  not,  you  receive  a  bonus.  Is  that 

fair? 

Dr.  RUNGE.  Actually,  Senator  Inouye,  thanks  for  raising  that 
issue.  Hawaii  would,  under  our  proposal,  receive  $1.9  million  for 
being  the  servant  first  to  the  field.  The  difference  in  our  proposal 
is that—in that we only have a given amount of money in this pot, 
we  wanted  to  make  sure  that  the  servants  who  we  really  need  to 
come  late  to  the  field  are  adequately  incentivized  to  do  so.  So  we 
set  a  number  of  five  times  their  Formula  402  Fund  to  actually  be 
a  real  incentive.  But  recognizing  that  we  wanted,  also,  to  reward 
states  that  did,  in  fact,  make  those  gains,  we  set  a  number  of  2.5 
times. 

Now, obviously, we would love to work with the Committee to ad-
dress those inequities, and I think it really is an inequity, the par-
able notwithstanding. But there is only a certain amount of money, 
and  we  want  to  make  sure  that  states  who  have  not  yet  come  are 
adequately incentivized. 

And, by the way, congratulations to Hawaii. You’ve been leading 
the Nation in belt use now for several years, with about 95 percent. 

Senator INOUYE. Thank you very much. 
I listened to testimony that Mexico has refused to let us examine 

trucks on their property. Do we permit those trucks to come in? 

Mr.  MEAD.  No.  But  you  actually  asked  two  questions.  The  an-
swer  to  the  first  one  is,  there  has  been  no  agreement  with  Mexico 
relative  to  letting  U.S.  officials  inspect  onsite  in  Mexico.  The  an-
swer  to  the  second  question  is,  no,  because  that  allowing  us  to  do 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

35

that  is  a  precondition  to  the  opening  of  the  border  to  the  interior 
United  States,  not  to  the  border  zone,  right  around  the  border. 
Trucks can go there now. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Now,  they  get  into  the  border  zone,  and  you’ve 

indicated that hundreds go beyond that. 

Mr.  MEAD.  Yes,  they  can  go  beyond  that.  I  used  to  think,  Sen-
ator,  that  there  was  some  kind  of  fence  around  these  commercial 
zones,  but  there  isn’t.  They  can  just  keep  on  going.  And  they  do. 
And  the  point  I  was  making  in  my  statement  was  that  we  ought 
to  have  a  law  in  every  state  that  you  can’t  do  that,  and  if  you’re 
caught  doing  it,  your  truck’s  going  to  be  put  out  of  service  imme-
diately. 

Senator INOUYE. How successful have you been? 
Mr.  MEAD.  Actually,  there’s  been  quite  a  bit  of  progress  in  the 
last few years, but there are still five states that have not adopted 
that  rule,  and  10  of  14  that  we  reviewed,  who  adopted  the  rule, 
were  not  prepared  to  place  vehicles  out  of  service.  There’s  some 
confusion out there, and I think that needs to be cleared up. 

Senator INOUYE. Have the border states adopted rules of that na-

ture? 

companies? 

Mr. MEAD. Yes, I believe so. 
Senator INOUYE. Sir, you indicated that there were 2,000 moving 

companies involved in fraudulent activities? 

Mr.  MEAD.  No,  I  said  that  we’ve—my  office  has  individually,  on 
its  own,  prosecuted  25  of  them  involving  8,000  victims.  Almost 
every day——

Senator  INOUYE.  Are  these  fly-by-nights  or  nationally-known 

Mr.  MEAD.  Fly  by-nights.  What  happens  sometimes,  the  con-
sumer  will  call  up  one  of  the  more  well-established  firms,  get  a 
quote, ‘‘It’s going to cost you $6,000, sir, to make this move.’’ They 
go  out  and  get  another  estimate.  One  of  the  estimates  comes  from 
a fly-by-night firm. They say, ‘‘We’ll do your—we’ll make the move 
for  $1700.’’  They  say,  ‘‘That  sounds  good  to  me.’’  They  sign  on  the 
dotted  line.  The  moving  company  comes  and  gets  their  goods,  and 
then,  when  you  get  to  your  destination,  they  say,  ‘‘You  want  your 
goods, that move just cost you $12,000.’’

Ms. SANDBERG. Senator, if I may, also one of the provisions that 
we’ve requested in the reauthorization proposal is to strengthen en-
forcement  on  household-goods  brokers,  because  people  will  hold 
themselves  out  as  a  broker,  and  then  they’re  not  going  to  be  the 
one that actually shows up to do the move, and so there’s this kind 
of bait-and-switch that occurs. So it gives us the ability to go after 
those  individuals  that  actually  fraudulently  hold  out  some  kind  of 
a  price  to  the  individual,  and  then  they’re  not  the  ones  that  actu-
ally move them. 

Senator INOUYE. Do these movers have special licenses to do so? 
Ms.  SANDBERG.  If  they’re  moving  in  interstate  commerce,  they 
are required to register with our agency and follow all of our rules 
and regulations. 

Senator INOUYE. Then these fly-by-nights have no license. 
Ms. SANDBERG. Some of them do register with us, and that’s why 
we are going after them. If they haven’t registered with us, we also 
go after them if they’re moving in interstate commerce. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

36

Senator  INOUYE.  What  is  the  appropriate  hours  of  operation  for 
a truck driver, or service for a truck—12 hours, 18 hours, 6 hours? 
Ms. SANDBERG. Our current rule, sir, is that truck drivers would 
have  a  14-hour  workday,  which  is  an  on-duty  period.  Of  that  14 
hours,  they’re  allowed  to  drive  up  to  11  hours.  And  then  the  re-
quirement  is,  is  that,  after  their  14  hours  hits,  they’re  required  to 
take 10 hours off duty. 

The objective of the rule was to get the truck drivers onto a reg-
ular 24-hour cycle so that there’s more a Circadian rhythm. Under 
the  old  rule,  truck  drivers  could  expand  their  workday  infinitely, 
based on taking off-duty breaks throughout the day, as they called 
it  off  duty.  But,  oftentimes,  they  were  sitting  at  loading  docks.  So 
our  new  rule  now  requires  that  those  14  hours  be  14  consecutive 
hours, and they’re allowed to drive 11 within that. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Does  medical  research  support  that  one  can 

drive for 11 hours safely? 

Ms.  SANDBERG.  The  research  that  we  had  when  we  wrote  the 
rule would indicate that drivers can safely drive within that period 
of time. 

Senator INOUYE. Something must be wrong with me. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  INOUYE.  We  hear  much  about  teenagers.  And  there  are 
certain  areas  that  suggest  that  you  shouldn’t  have  more  than  one 
teenager in a car. And that a teenager should have an adult in the 
car. What about that? Should we have that in the law? 

Dr.  RUNGE.  Senator,  the  most  important  thing—there  are  actu-
ally  two  very,  very  important  things  we  can  do  to  help  curb  teen 
driving deaths in this country. About over 8,000 people were killed 
last  year  involving  a  teen  driver.  There  is  a  very  effective  method, 
as  you  suggest,  called  ‘‘graduated  licensing  laws.’’  And  the  two 
things  that  we  know  from  very  good  data  are  that  fatalities  go  up 
as  you  add  teenagers  to  the  vehicle  of  an  inexperienced  driver. 
There’s  about  a  25  percent  higher  fatality  rate  for  teens  that  have 
one  teen  passenger.  And  if  you  add  three  or  more,  it  goes  up  400 
percent. 

Also, nighttime driving restrictions are very effective. If you look 
at  the  graduated  licensing  laws  in  North  Carolina  and  Michigan, 
for  instance,  they  had  a  25  percent  decrease  in  crashes  among 
teens  after  their  graduated  licensing  law  was  put  into  effect.  I  be-
lieve Kentucky saw a 33 percent decrease. So if you have nighttime 
driving  restrictions,  and  teen  passenger  restrictions,  as  well  as  a 
sufficient  period  of  supervised  driving  that  is  with  a  parent,  not 
just  a  driver’s  ed  teacher,  then  we  believe  that’s  a  very  effective 
way to go. 

Senator  INOUYE.  So  you’ve  indicated  that  we  know  what  the 

problem is. 

ally——

Dr.  RUNGE.  We  know  what  some  of  the  problem  is.  And,  actu-

Senator INOUYE. Do you have any solutions, legislative solutions, 

that we can get involved in? 

Dr. RUNGE. That’s a very good question. We were very much try-
ing to focus our grant programs and our incentive programs in this 
bill toward the biggest pieces of the pie chart. This is an area that 
states  really  don’t  disagree  with  much.  I  mean,  if  you  read  the 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

37

clips,  you  do  see  certain  state  legislators  who  complain  that  they 
want  their  16-year-old  to  be  able  to  transport  all  their  other  chil-
dren to school, which is the worst possible practice. People will ad-
vocate  for  bad  practices,  but  the  states,  themselves,  I  think  know 
that graduated licensing is effective. And I just—I question wheth-
er  or  not  we  need  another  incentive  from  Congress  for  that  pur-
pose.  Certainly,  if  you  state  a  preference  for  that  in  SAFETEA, 
that would be welcomed by us. 

Senator INOUYE. I thank you very much. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator LOTT. Thank you, Senator Inouye. And I look forward to 
continuing  to  work  with  you  to  get  this  language  drafted  in  a  way 
that  we  can  all  be  supportive  and  that  can  give  these  people  the 
authority they need to do their job. 

Senator Pryor? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. And I want to thank 
you  for  your  leadership  on  this,  and  the  questions  that  you’ve 
asked. I’d like to follow up on moving fraud. 

Back when I was the attorney general of my state, we would get 
complaints  on  this  fairly  regularly.  Sometimes  we  could  do  some-
thing  to  help,  and  sometimes  we  couldn’t.  In  fact,  when  this  issue 
came  up  in  preparation  for  this  hearing,  we  were  talking  to  our 
staff,  and  this  has  happened  to  three  members  on  our  staff,  just 
moving to and from DC, in fact, in one case a couple got held hos-
tage  for  bubble-wrap.  The  company  didn’t  disclose  this,  but  they 
charged them $1500 for bubble-wrap. And so, this is a problem that 
we see, and it recurs. 

And  I  think  that  one  issue,  and  I  think  you  all  touched  on  this 
a  moment  ago,  is  that  this  area  really  is  like  a  regulatory  orphan. 
There’s really not anyone who’s really on top of this issue. And you 
all mentioned, a few moments ago, about how we could maybe help 
with  these  rogue  movers.  And  I  believe  it  was  you,  Ms.  Sandberg, 
who  talked  about  making  sure  the  states  have  an  active  role  in 
this.  I’d  like  to  hear  from  you  on  how  that  should  be  shaped.  How 
should  we  structure  that,  for  example,  the  state  attorneys  general 
would have the ability to enforce federal law? 

Ms.  SANDBERG.  We  have  been  working  with  the  National  Asso-
ciation  of  Attorneys  General  to  figure  out  how  best  to  do  that. 
Some  of  what  we’ve  been  doing—most  attorney  generals’  offices  in 
this country have a consumer-protection division. 

Senator PRYOR. Right. 
Ms. SANDBERG. And so, we’re focusing on those consumer-protec-

tion divisions as a way to enforce. 

But  we  feel  that  the  most  important  rule—because  this  is  a  bit 
of  an  orphan.  We’re  a  safety  agency.  This  is  something  we  inher-
ited  when  the  ICC  Termination  Act  occurred,  and  it’s  the  one  fi-
nancial regulation we still have, but we take it seriously. We think 
that  consumer  education  is  probably  one  of  the  most  important 
things we can do. And we’re working with state attorneys general’s 
officers  across  the  country  to  educate  consumers  in  how  they  can 
be better informed before they engage a mover. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

38

So,  for  example,  one  of  the  most  frequent  fraudulent  things  that 
we’re  seeing  occurring  right  now  is,  people  go  onto  the  Internet—
seems  to  be  a  big  tool  that  everybody  wants  to  use—and  there  are 
places  where  you  can  go  in  and  get  a  rate  quote  from  a  mover. 
That’s  the  absolute  worst  thing  somebody  could  do,  because  the 
only way a mover can really tell you what it’s going to cost to move 
your  goods  is  to  come  out  to  your  house,  look  at  the  size  of  your 
house,  look  at  how  many  household  goods  you  actually  have,  and 
give you a quote in person. 

And  so,  there  are  a  number  of  things  like  that  that  we’re  doing 
to educate consumers. We actually just had an increase in funding 
last  year  to  do  more  consumer  outreach.  We’re  putting  some  new 
websites up specifically for household-goods consumers. 

And  then  the  second  piece  is  a  piece  that  we  request  that  you 
put  in  your  reauthorization  proposal,  which  gives  state  attorneys 
general the opportunity to enforce our federal regulations. 

Senator LOTT. Could I inquire? 
Senator PRYOR. Sure. 
Senator  LOTT.  Is  that  in  the  Administration  proposal,  that  last 

part? 

Ms. SANDBERG. The authority to enforce? 
Senator LOTT. Yes. 
Ms. SANDBERG. Yes, it is. 
Senator LOTT. For the attorneys general. 
Ms. SANDBERG. Yes. 
Senator LOTT. OK, good. 
Mr.  MEAD.  Yes,  I  think—I’d  like  to  add  to  that—I  think  that—
you  asked  about  structuring  it—I  think  that  actually  it  is  an  or-
phan  left  over  from  the  Interstate  Commerce  Commission.  Back 
then,  consumers  had  a  place  to  go,  and  their  complaints  could  get 
individually handled. 

But  one  way  of  structuring  it  would  be  similar  to  the  way  the 
Motor Carrier Program currently runs commercial driver’s licenses. 
States  enforce  those,  and  they  pull  the  licenses.  Although  I  think 
the  concern  of  the  moving  companies  would  be  that  every  state 
shouldn’t  be  authorized  to  come  up  with  an  individual  rule  regime 
of its own. You’d want some standardization, I would think. 

Senator PRYOR. Senator Lott, my guess is this is like most other 
industries we’d see in the consumer protection division in my office 
back in Arkansas. That would be that 95 to 99 percent of the oper-
ators  out  there  are  totally  legit,  they’re  playing  by  the  rules,  and 
they’re  doing  exactly  what  they’re  supposed  to  do.  But  it’s  the  1 
percent, 2 percent, 3 percent that do not play by the rules. I mean, 
we  don’t  know  the  exact  number.  But  they’re  out  there,  and  some 
of  these  people  are  just  absolutely  ripping  folks  off.  And  so,  yeah, 
I  want  to  work  with  the  Committee,  and  I  want  to  work  with  you 
on this, and make sure that we get the right structure in this bill. 
It sounds like we may have it already. 

As I understand it, the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administra-
tion  only  has  about  10  inspectors.  Is  that  right?  And  that’s  an  in-
crease, as I understand it, but, still, you only have about 10. 

Ms. SANDBERG. Yes. 
Senator  PRYOR.  And  my  guess  is  that’s  not  nearly  enough.  Am 

I right on that? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

39

Ms. SANDBERG. What we’ve done is, we had one, as the Inspector 
General  said.  We’ve  asked  for  increase  in  funding  that  went  up  to 
10 full-time. And we actually trained 37 additional safety investiga-
tors.  So  it’s  kind  of  ancillary  duties,  but  they  assist  us  with  our 
strike-force activities. 

Right  now,  we’re  focusing  a  majority  of  our  activities  in  four 
states  where  we  receive  the  most  complaints  and  had  the  most 
problems.  Those  states  are  California,  New  York,  New  Jersey,  and 
Florida.  But  we  do,  as  complaints  come  in—we  have  a  new  triage 
protocol  inside  FMCSA,  and  this  has  just  been  put  in  place  since 
I’ve  been  there.  We  take  complaints  into  a  master  database.  If  it’s 
one  instance  of  a  hostage-goods,  where  the  instance,  like  the  In-
spector  General  commented,  we  actually  will  then  work  with  the 
Inspector  General’s  Office,  state  law  enforcement—because,  often-
times, state law enforcement wants to get involved—and the attor-
ney general’s office from that state to go after that company. Then 
we  also  look  for  patterns  of  violations  from  other  companies.  And 
those  are  the  cases  that  I  was  talking  about  in  my  testimony,  the 
100  cases  that  we’ve  already  done  this  year,  and  we  anticipate  we 
will  have  over  300  cases  that  we  will  have  gone  after,  this  year 
alone,  which  is  a  significant  increase,  because  last  year  we  did 
maybe 30. 

Senator PRYOR. Good. 
Mr. MEAD. Yes, I’ll tell you, you know, it’s a good thing they gave 
them—you gave them 10 people and they fixed their phone line up. 
Until a year ago, you’d call—a consumer would call up to complain 
that  they  were  ripped  off,  and  it  would  say—the  recording  would 
say, ‘‘Sorry, the mailbox is full.’’

Senator PRYOR. Yes. 
Let me ask you, Mr. Inspector General, if I can, how many com-
plaints do they get every year? About 3,000? Am I correct on that? 

Mr. MEAD. I’ve got a list here——
Senator  PRYOR.  You  know,  300  is  a  lot  of  prosecutions  you  talk 

about, but about——

hotline. 

Mr. MEAD. Well, we get one about—we have an inspector general 

Senator PRYOR. Right. 
Mr. MEAD. We get one, I’m advised, about once every day. 
Senator PRYOR. OK. 
Mr.  MEAD.  In  2001,  Motor  Carriers—the  Motor  Carriers—Ms. 
Sandberg  was—her  office  received  about  2,000.  In  2002,  about  the 
same number. In 2003, it went up to about 3,000. In 2004, it went 
up to 3,600. 

Senator PRYOR. Do you think the incidents are increasing, or just 

the complaints you’re receiving are increasing? 

Mr. MEAD. I think it’s becoming an increasing problem. And——
Senator PRYOR. That’s my guess, too. 
Mr.  MEAD.—my  office  has  about  450  people  in  it.  My  office—we 
can  pursue  criminal  sanctions,  although  it’s  a  very  contorted  proc-
ess,  because  we’re  using  other  statutory  schemes,  other  than  one 
directly  tailored  to  this.  And  I  don’t  think  that  the  civil  enforce-
ment  regime  that  Administrator  Sandberg  was  referring  to  has—
is robust enough, powerful enough, at the present time. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

40

Senator  PRYOR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  look  forward  to 
working  with  you  on  this,  because  I  think  this  is  an  important 
problem. 

Senator LOTT. Thank you, Senator Pryor. 
Senator Lautenberg? 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes, Mr. Chairman, I’m going to take some 
of  my  time  to  just  introduce  part  of  the  statement  that  I  was  pre-
pared  to  give.  And  I  would  ask  unanimous  consent  that  the  full 
statement  be  included  in  the  record  and  that  the  record  be  kept 
open in order to pose questions in writing——

Senator LOTT. Without objection——
Senator LAUTENBERG.—and ask for a prompt response. 
Senator LOTT.—it will be included in its entirety, and the record 
will  be  kept  open  for  any  questions  you  may  want  to  submit,  be-
yond what you ask. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Lautenberg follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Mr. Chairman, 
It’s  been  more  than  a  year  and  a  half  since  TEA–21  expired,  and  we  still  don’t 
have a long-term blueprint for transportation. Every day that has gone by, millions 
of  Americans  have  sat  stuck  in  traffic . . . and  thousands  have  been  involved  in 
accidents.  Since  TEA–21  expired.  much-needed  new  roads  have  not  been  built,  and 
important safety measures have not been implemented. 

My  interest  in  making  our  roads  and  highways  safer  goes  back  several  decades. 
During my first three terms in the Senate, I wrote the bills to increase the drinking 
age  from  18  to  21 . . . establish  .08  as  the  blood  alcohol  standard  for  drunk 
driving . . . and ban triple-trailer trucks from the Interstate Highway System. 

I’m proud that all three of these measures became law. 
They have made our roads and highways safer for my grandchildren and everyone 
else who travels on our roads and highways. And according to safety experts, these 
laws have saved thousands of lives. 

In 2003, 42,643 people died in traffic crashes. While great progress has been made 
to  reduce  the  epidemic  levels  of  death  on  our  roads  since  the  1970s  and  1980s,  the 
raw numbers of victims continues to increase each year. 

As  our  country  grows  and  more  drivers  use  our  roads,  fatalities  will  continue  to 
increase—unless  we  adopt  effective  strategies  to  address  highway  safety  risks.  We 
must  continue  our  efforts  to  prevent  drunk  driving.  Each  year,  some  17  thousand 
people  die  in  alcohol-related  crashes—one  death  every  31  minutes.  Most  of  these 
deaths  involve  a  higher-risk  drunk  driver—that  is,  one  who  is  a  repeat  offender  or 
above the .15 blood alcohol threshold, which is almost twice the legal limit. 

Senator DeWine and I will soon re-introduce our bill to crack down on higher-risk 
drunk drivers. Now that all states have a .08 blood alcohol law in place, and social 
drinkers  have  done  their  part,  we  must  adequately  address  the  problems  posed  by 
higher-risk drivers. They are responsible for most of the deaths; they should be held 
accountable, and dealt with effectively. 

We  also  must  deal  with  the  increase  of  truck  traffic  on  our  roads.  While  large 
trucks  have  a  fairly  good  safety  record  with  respect  to  the  numbers  of  miles  they 
travel, 1 in 8 fatalities on our roads involved a large truck. 

Now the Administration expects truck traffic to double in the next 15 years. New 
Jersey  will  see  a  good  share  of  that  growth,  as  traffic  to  the  port  of  New  York  and 
New Jersey continues to increase. While we welcome the economic growth this traf-
fic  represents,  it  also  raises  the  potential  for  deadly  highway  crashes.  This  under-
scores the need for effective truck safety strategies. 

One  strategy  is  to  stem  the  growth  of  truck  size  and  weight.  In  1991,  Congress 
banned  triple-trailer  trucks.  And  in  2003,  this  Committee  voted  to  extend  that  ban 
to the National Highway System roads—keeping more of our roads safer and freez-
ing in place current state truck length limits. I hope Members of the Committee will 
see the wisdom of again voting for safety. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

41

I  look  forward  to  working  with  colleagues  to  get  these  important  highway  safety 

provisions incorporated into the reauthorization bill. 

And I look forward to hearing from the witnesses today on these important issues 
and  others—including  important  consumer  protections  in  the  movement  of  house-
hold goods, and hazardous materials regulation. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman.

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you. 
We’re looking at the need to prepare for substantially more traf-
fic  on  our  roads.  And,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  commend  you  for  trying  to 
move  this  process  along.  We  need  that  highway  bill,  desperately, 
and the transportation resources that it produces. 

I want to talk about safety, my interest in making our roads and 
highways  safer  goes  back  several  decades.  And  during  my  first 
three  terms,  before  I  was  a  freshman,  I  wrote  bills  to  increase  the 
drinking  age  from  18  to  21.  Purportedly,  we  save  almost  a  thou-
sand lives a year doing that. 

As an example of what I experienced, I was at a rodeo in a west-
ern  state,  and  a  lot  of  young  people  there  were  drinking  beer  and 
walking  around  with  it.  And  I  walked  up  to  a  police  officer,  and  I 
said,  ‘‘Well,  sir,  do  you  know  what  the  minimum  drinking  age  is?’’ 
And he, ‘‘Yes, sir. It’s 21.’’ I said, ‘‘These kids don’t look like they’re 
21.’’ He said, ‘‘I do traffic, Mister, that’s my job.’’

[Laughter.] 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Anyway, it tells you something about what 
could  happen  by  way  of  lifesaving  if  we  could  get  more  teeth  into 
the enforcement of that law. 

We established .08 as a blood-alcohol standard for drunk driving, 
and  it  was  a  tough  job.  But,  Dr.  Runge,  you  made  mention  of  the 
fact that the standards for the chronic problem drinkers have to be 
dealt  with.  And  we  have  legislation  that  we’re  going  to  be  intro-
ducing very shortly to try and get that into place. 

And  part  of  what  I  have  also  done  is  to  ban  triple-trailer  trucks 

from the interstate highway system. 

And I’m proud that all three of these measures became law. One 
law that I wrote, in that period of time, was to put helmets on mo-
torcycle riders. And, Mr. Mead, you and I have had many moments 
when  we’ve  sat  across  tables  some  distance  from  one  another,  like 
this,  and  I  looked  at  your  testimony  and  saw  confirmation  of  the 
fact that when those helmets are on there’s a substantial ability to 
save  lives.  And  based  on  what  you’ve  said  here,  it’s  about  30  per-
cent;  in  2003,  3,661  motorcyclists  died,  and  approximately  67,000 
injured  in  a  highway  crash.  NHTSA  estimates  that  the  helmets 
saved  the  lives  of  1,158;  approximately  30  percent  of  those  that 
would  have  died,  didn’t,  thank  goodness,  because  they  were  wear-
ing helmets. And, Mr. Chairman, I have great respect for you, and 
how  independent  people  like  to  be  of  Big  Brother  Government. 
When  I  think  of  the  simple  thing  of  raising  the  drinking  age  from 
18 to 21, two of my kids, who were in college at the time, they said, 
‘‘Dad,  you’re  a  real  spoiler.’’  And  friends  of  mine  who  used  to 
smoke,  when  we  wrote  the  No  Smoking  in  Airplanes  legislation, 
said,  ‘‘What  am  I  supposed  to  do?  Why  are  my  rights  being  in-
fringed  upon?’’  Well,  red  lights  infringe  upon  people’s  rights.  And 
you have to have laws to conduct an orderly society. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

42

And  so,  I  think  that  it’s  critical  that  we  address  these  problems, 
as  you  are  today,  Mr.  Chairman.  In  2003,  42,000  people  died  in 
traffic  crashes.  Now,  that’s  a  static  number  over  the  years,  even 
though,  the  population  has  grown;  thusly,  the  percentage  is  small-
er. But 42,000 people in one year, that’s a lot of people to lose. We 
lost  58,000  in  Vietnam  over  a  10-year  period.  The  county  was 
heartbroken.  And  while  great  progress  has  been  made  to  reduce 
the  epidemic  levels  of  death  on  our  roads,  the  raw  numbers  con-
tinue to increase. 

And  so,  Mr.  Chairman,  we’ve  got  to  continue  doing  what  you’re 
doing  here  today.  And  I  commend  this  excellent  panel,  we  have 
here to provide us with the information and let us figure out what 
the  political  fallout’s  going  to  be,  but  help  us  to  do  the  job  in  im-
proving  road  safety  throughout  our  country.  It’s  not  a  real  tough 
job. 

So, I thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator LOTT. Thank you, Senator Lautenberg. 
Ms. Sandberg, let me come back to you and talk a little bit more 
about  this—the  Department’s  hours-of-service  rule.  That  ruling 
was stricken down by a court. What was the basis for their ruling? 
What did they say the reason was why they struck it down? 

Ms.  SANDBERG.  The  reason  that  the  court  struck  down  the  rule 
was, they said that we did not adequately address the driver-health 
issue. They basically——

Senator LOTT. Driver health? 
Ms.  SANDBERG.  That’s  correct.  There’s  a  underlying  statute  that 
says  that  Motor  Carrier,  when  we  look  at  our  regulations,  need  to 
consider driver health. The agencies always looked at driver health 
in  a  very—kind  of  more  macro  level.  The  court  said  we  needed  to 
look  at  it  more  micro.  For  example,  in  the  past,  we  looked  at  our 
rules  impacting  driver  health  as  if  it  created  death  or  serious  in-
jury. The court said we needed to look at more specific things, such 
as, Did it increase hypertension? Did it increase back injuries? 

Senator  LOTT.  So  the  court  actually  said  you  should—you  didn’t 

go far enough. 

Ms. SANDBERG. That’s correct. 
Senator LOTT. Yes. Now, though, you are asking the Congress to 

ratify the rule that you had developed. Is that correct? 

Ms. SANDBERG. That is correct. 
Senator LOTT. OK. 
What is the status of the large-truck causation study? And what 

are the study’s primary—preliminary findings? 

Ms.  SANDBERG.  The  large-truck  crash  causation  study,  we  com-
pleted  collecting  all  the  crashes  last  year,  and  that’s  actually  a 
partnership project with us and the National Highway Traffic Safe-
ty  Administration.  We’re  getting  ready  to  release  the  first  large 
group of data sets from that study, in May of this year. Once those 
individual  data  sets  are  released,  then  we  will  work  with  various 
panels to look at specific segments. 

I  can  tell  you,  overarchingly,  in  seeing  some  of  the  data,  that  it 
appears  that  the  driver  is  a  primary  issue  that  we  need  to  focus 
on in the future. 

Senator  LOTT.  I  don’t  want  to  overdo  the  household-goods  en-
forcement area. I think that Senator Pryor made a good point. The 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

43

bigger,  more  traditional  carriers,  most  of  the  carriers,  do  a  very 
credible and reputable job. However, when you have examples like 
with—that  you  refer  to  and  what  he  referred  to,  the  extra  cost  for 
the  bubble-wrapping  or,  you  know,  jacking  up  the—that’s  out-
rageous. And it’s—you know, you can’t tolerate that. But it sounds 
like  there’s  a  little—there’s  a  gap  here,  and  I’m  not  sure  we  yet 
have figured out exactly how we’re going to be able to fix that prob-
lem. 

You have a limited number of people that are working on it. You 
try  to  work  in  your  office,  Mr.  Mead,  to  resolve  these  complaints. 
But  where  is  the  enforcement,  and  what  is  the  enforcement?  Are 
we  saying  that,  ‘‘Well,  the  attorneys  general  are  going  to  handle 
this? ’’  Well,  I  do  think  that  the  companies  that—reputable  compa-
nies have a response to that, a complaint about that, ‘‘Good gravy, 
we’re  going  to  have  to  comply  with  50  different  sets  of  regula-
tions? ’’ We need some sort of a universal—you know, it just sounds 
like  there’s  no  clear  place  where  you  go  to  get  a  remedy.  And  yet 
some  of  this  stuff,  where  they  say,  ‘‘OK,  we’re  going  to  charge  you 
$1,700,’’ then they say, ‘‘Oh, no, it’s going to be 10,000,’’ you know, 
somebody ought to be able to call them up and say, ‘‘No, you’re not 
going  to  do  that,  period.  Now  what’s  the  next  question?’’  Well,  but 
what’s the answer, for now. 

Ms. SANDBERG. If I may address a couple of issues. First, the Ad-
ministration’s proposal, I think, strikes a bit of a balance. We have 
been  working  with  the  American  Moving  and  Storage  Association 
in  trying  to  craft  something.  They  represent  the  good  movers,  the 
people  that  are  doing  business  right.  And  we  want  to  make  sure 
that  whatever  proposal  we  craft  doesn’t  penalize  good  movers,  as 
you  state,  Senator.  But  we  still  need  to  make  sure  that  we  have 
the ability to reach the bad ones. 

The  Administration’s  proposal  asks  that  state  attorneys  general 
only  be  able  to  enforce  the  federal  regulations.  And  that  prevents 
states  from  having  50  different  sets  of  regulations  that  they’re  out 
there enforcing, which is the point that General Mead made. 

Senator  LOTT.  Well,  we  are  working  on  this  language  right  now, 
and  we  are  going  to  have  some  by  next  week.  So,  any  input  that 
you’re going to make, you need to do it right away. 

Ms. SANDBERG. We’re more than——
Senator LOTT. Any further input. 
Ms. SANDBERG.—happy to work with your staff. 
Senator LOTT. Mr. Mead, did you want to add anything? 
Mr.  MEAD.  Yes,  I  think,  for  the  time  being,  for  the  foreseeable 
future, until we’re able to send a very clear, unambiguous message 
to  these  people  that  they’re  going  to  get  in  trouble  if  they  engage 
in  this  type  of  behavior,  that  Motor  Carriers  needs  to  have  some 
dedicated  people,  my  office  needs  to  have  some  dedicated  people, 
and  I  think  you  need  to  empower  the  state  attorneys  general  to 
take  action.  But  the  big  caveat  there  is,  the  states  have  to  be  cir-
cumscribed  so  they  can’t  come  up  with  their  individual  rules.  Oth-
erwise,  you’re  going  to  cut  into,  as  Ms.  Sandberg,  pointed  out,  the 
good—you’ll be catching the good companies along with the bad. 

Senator LOTT. Thank you very much. 
In my part of Mississippi, down on the Gulf Coast, we have a lot 

of ‘‘Jerards’’ and ‘‘Gerards.’’ Which are you? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

44

[Laughter.] 
Ms. GERARD. I’m ‘‘Jerard.’’
Senator  LOTT.  ‘‘Jerard,’’  OK,  good.  You’ve  been  Americanized 

completely in your pronunciation, then. 

Ms. GERARD. Unfortunately. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  LOTT.  Under  the  Norm  Mineta  Act  that  you  referred  to 
in  your  testimony  that  created,  I  guess—or  divided  PHMSA  into 
these—or  the  Act—set  up  two  different  things,  the  Pipeline  and 
Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Administration  and  the  Research  and 
Innovative Technology Administration. You know, obviously, this is 
an area we haven’t asked a lot of questions about today, but we’ve 
been  having  some  problems  in  this.  I’ve  worked  on  pipeline  safety 
in the past. Of course, we have hazardous-materials problems now. 
In fact, an incident just yesterday, I believe, in California, perhaps, 
a  train  derailment.  And  we’re  going  to  have  to  pay  attention  to 
this. And you’re—you know, your agency is going to be on the point 
of  this.  So  what  are  you  doing  to  get  a  better  focus  on  a  mission? 
And  it  sounded  to  me  like  an  awful  lot  of  people  have  an  oar  in 
your  water.  We’ve  got  a  lot  of  different  people  to  have  responsi-
bility,  and  maybe  we  need  to  get  a  little  bit  better  focus  about 
who’s actually in charge of this area. 

Ms.  GERARD.  Well,  I  think  the  Department  is  considering  what 
the  intent  of  Congress  was  in  establishing  the  new  agency,  and 
we’re  working  actively  within  the  Department  to  bring  a  tighter 
focus on the division of labor and what the agenda for the program 
should  be.  So  I  think  you’ll  see  some  progress  forthcoming  in  the 
very near future. 

Senator  LOTT.  The  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials  Adminis-
tration  administers  planning  and  training  grants.  Some  would 
argue  that  the  current  level  of  funding  for  planning  grants  is  re-
dundant, as the communities have long since developed plans, and 
what we need, in effect, is more emphasis on training to deal with 
these problems. How do you respond to that? 

Ms. GERARD. I believe that we’re satisfied with the level of fund-

ing that has been proposed. 

Senator  LOTT.  Do  you  propose  to  give—at  least  have  more  flexi-
bility  on  how  much  is  used  for  planning  and  how  much  is  actually 
used for training? 

Ms. GERARD. I think that we’re prepared to entertain concepts in 

that direction. 

Senator  LOTT.  Yes.  Well,  I’ve  seen,  over  the  years,  when  you’re 
dealing with the Federal Government and engineers and planners, 
that  they  plan  and  plan  and  plan  and  plan,  and  lots  of  money  is 
wasted on it, and we never get around to training or doing things. 
So I hope that we will look at some language that, maybe, will give 
a little more flexibility in that area. 

Ms.  GERARD.  All  right,  we’d  be  happy  to  work  with  you  on  that, 

Senator  LOTT.  Well,  thank  you  very  much  for  your  testimony. 
We’ll look forward to working with you as we develop the language 
that  we  will  bring  before  the  full  Committee  in  a  week  or  so,  and 
then put it in the SAFETEA bill, which may become the TEA–LOU 
bill. But, whatever it is, I hope we get it done soon. 

sir. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

45

Thank  you  very  much  for  your  testimony.  The  hearing  is  ad-

journed. 

[Whereupon, at 11:25 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

A P P E N D I X

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. CONRAD BURNS, U.S. SENATOR FROM MONTANA 
Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  today  to  discuss  important 
issues  of  safety  on  our  nation’s  roadways.  I  look  forward  to  hearing  about  the 
progress  our  federal  agencies  are  making  in  enhancing  the  safety  and  security  in 
transportation. Chairman Lott, congratulations on your new assignment. I look for-
ward  to  working  with  you  on  several  issues  under  this  Subcommittee’s  jurisdiction. 
Mr.  Chairman.  as  you  know,  travel  over  long  highways  is  a  way  of  life  in  Mon-
tana.  As  I  like  to  say,  we  have  a  lot  of  dirt  between  light  bulbs  in  Montana.  Pro-
tecting  and  strengthening  infrastructure  is  critical  to  economic  success,  and  I  look 
forward  to  Congress  delivering  the  President  a  highway  reauthorization  bill  this 
year. Today’s hearing is one important step in that process. 

There are a few priorities that I would like to highlight this morning. First, there 
are  two  grant  programs  under  the  National  Highway  Traffic  Safety  Administration 
that I am a strong supporter of: the Alcohol Impaired Driving Countermeasures Pro-
grams,  and  Occupant  Protection  Incentive  Grants.  Funding  from  both  of  these  pro-
grams, however, should be made available to all states. Many states, including Mon-
tana,  may  have  difficulty  qualifying  for  these  grants.  But  reducing  drunk  driving 
and  encouraging  seatbelt  use  is  a  national  priority,  so  I  believe  that  all  states 
should be able to participate in these programs. 

I  look  forward  to  reviewing  the  new  title  and  working  with  the  Chairman  and 
Ranking  Member  to  make  sure  it  provides  alternate  ways  for  states  to  qualify  for 
a  small  amount  of  these  funds.  States  should  be  incentivized  to  meet  performance 
criteria and show improvement over time, not excluded from the program. Ensuring 
that  states  like  Montana  can  have  access  to  minimal  funds  will  contribute  to  the 
priorities of reducing drunk driving and increasing seatbelt use. 

Second,  I  believe  it  should  be  the  policy  of  the  Department  of  Transportation  to 
promote the deployment and use of integrated, interoperable emergency communica-
tions  equipment  and  systems  to  enhance  hazardous  materials  transportation  and 
safety.  For  years.  public  safety  officials  have  been  calling  for  interoperable  commu-
nications.  With  thousands  of  hazardous  materials  shipments  occurring  each  day  in 
our  nation’s  transportation  system,  interoperable  emergency  communications  is 
critically important. I will work with Members of this Committee and my colleagues 
on  the  other  side  of  the  aisle  to  include  interoperable  emergency  communications 
systems  as  an  eligible  item  under  the  HazMat  safety  and  security  grant  program 
this Committee will fashion for highway reauthorization legislation. 

Finally,  I  remain  committed  to  some  common  sense,  reasonable  exemptions  from 
the  hours  of  service  regulations  for  agriculture  and  utility  workers.  In  1995,  Public 
Law  104–59  granted  farmers  and  retail  farm  suppliers  a  limited  exemption  from 
DOT limitations on maximum driving time in transporting agricultural commodities 
or farm supplies within a 100-mile radius of a final distribution point. This legisla-
tion  recognized  the  special  needs  of  rural  America,  understanding  that  drivers  em-
ployed  by  farm  retailers  generally  operate  locally,  delivering  and  applying  crop  in-
puts. Much of their time is spent waiting at the field or the farm store loading and 
unloading their trucks. In short, farm retail drivers stay in a local area and return 
to their homes each night to sleep. The work of these crop input suppliers is essen-
tial to the nation’s farmers, who often have short windows of time to plant and har-
vest  their  crop  around  changing  weather  patterns.  The  agricultural  exemption  is 
seasonal,  applying  only  during  designated  months  throughout  the  year  as  deter-
mined  by  each  state.  Every  state  has  now  taken  this  action,  and  to  my  knowledge 
this exemption has not had any impact on public safety. 

The  utility  service  workers  hours  of  service  exemption  ensures  all  utility  service 
vehicle activities qualify for the exemption, and prevents DOT from diminishing the 
exemption  in  the  future.  Investor-owned  utilities  and  cooperatives  also  qualify  for 
the  exemption.  Including  this  language  is  critical  to  keeping  the  nation’s  utility  in-
frastructure  safe,  secure  and  reliable,  especially  in  times  of  disaster.  Both  of  these 
hours  of  service  exemptions  were  accepted  during  Committee  consideration  last 

(47)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

48

year, and I look forward to working with the Chairman to see them included again 
this year. 

Again, Mr. Chairman. thank you for holding this hearing today, and for your work 

on this issue. I look forward to hearing from today’s witnesses. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CYNTHIA HILTON, EXECUTIVE VICE PRESIDENT, INSTITUTE 

OF MAKERS OF EXPLOSIVES 

Interest of the IME 

The IME is the safety and security association of the commercial explosives indus-
try.  Our  mission  is  to  promote  safety,  security  and  the  protection  of  employees, 
users,  the  public  and  the  environment;  and  to  encourage  the  adoption  of  uniform 
rules and regulations in the manufacture, transportation, storage, handling, use and 
disposal of explosive materials used in blasting and other essential operations. Com-
mercial  explosives  are  transported  and  used  in  every  state.  Additionally,  our  prod-
ucts  are  distributed  worldwide,  while  some  explosives,  like  TNT,  must  be  imported 
because  they  are  not  manufactured  in  the  United  States.  The  ability  to  transport 
and distribute these products safely and securely is critical to this industry. 
Background 

The  transportation  of  hazardous  materials  involves  producers  and  distributors  of 
chemical  and  petroleum  products  and  waste,  transporters  in  all  modes,  and  manu-
facturers of containers. The Department of Transportation (DOT) estimates that up-
ward of 800,000 shipments and as many as 1.2 million regulated movements of haz-
ardous  materials  occur  each  day  in  the  United  States.  This  represents  over  10  per-
cent of all freight tonnage transported. The production and distribution of hazardous 
materials is a trillion-dollar industry that employs millions of Americans. In the ex-
plosives industry alone, the value of our shipments is estimated in excess of $1 bil-
lion  annually. 1 As  a  major  export,  the  transportation  of  hazardous  materials  con-
tributes  positively  to  our  trade  balance.  These  products  are  pervasive  in  the  trans-
portation stream and in our society as a whole. 

While these materials contribute to America’s quality of life, unless handled prop-
erly,  personal  injury  or  death,  property  damage,  and  environmental  consequences 
can result. To protect against these outcomes, the Secretary of Transportation (Sec-
retary) is charged to ‘‘provide adequate protection against the risks to life and prop-
erty  inherent  in  the  transportation  of  hazardous  materials  in  commerce  by  improv-
ing’’  regulation  and  enforcement. 2 These  regulations  are  to  provide  for  the  ‘‘safe 
transportation,  including  security,’’  of  hazardous  materials  in  commerce. 3 The  Sec-
retary’s  authority  to  accomplish  this  mission  is  embodied  in  the  Hazardous  Mate-
rials Transportation Act (HMTA). 4 

In  1990,  the  HMTA  was  significantly  amended  for  the  first  time.  Subsequently, 
amendments  were  added  in  1992,  1994  and,  most  recently,  in  2002.  Among  other 
things,  this  hearing  proposes  to  look  at  the  Administration’s  most  recent  proposals 
to amend the HMTA. We are concerned that a number of the Administration’s pro-
posals will limit DOT’s ability to fulfill its mission to protect workers and the public. 
Additionally,  the  Administration  has  not  been  willing  to  address  issues  about  the 
continued  relevancy  of  its  Emergency  Preparedness  Grants  Program,  especially 
since the events of 9/11. These issues are the focus of this statement. 
Interested Parties for Hazardous Materials Transportation 

IME is a participant in the Interested Parties for Hazardous Materials Transpor-
tation  (Interested  Parties),  a  coalition  of  40  industry  and  safety  associations  rep-
resenting shippers of all hazard classes and carriers of all modes, as well as package 
manufacturers  and  public  safety  agencies.  The  mission  of  the  Interested  Parties  is 
to  advance  national,  uniform  standards  for  the  transportation  of  hazardous  mate-
rials that will support the safety, including security, and efficiency of this vital eco-
nomic activity. 

The  Interested  Parties  organized  in  1995  specifically  to  address  issues  related  to 
the  reauthorization  of  the  HMTA.  Based  on  our  expertise,  we  have  presented  rec-
ommendations to strengthen key provisions of the 1990 statute to Congress. Regret-
tably, a number of our recommendations have gone unheeded. Currently, the Inter-
ested Parties has identified five categories of concern which cover 11 issues. The Ad-

1 Explosives Manufacturing, 2002 Economic Census, U.S. Department of Commerce, December 

2004, ECO2–31I–325920 (RV). 

2 49 U.S.C. 5101. 
3 49 U.S.C. 5103(b)(1). 
4 49 U.S.C. Chapter 51. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

49

ministration’s  proposal,  as  reflected  in  ‘‘SAFETEA’’,  partially  addresses  only  one  of 
these issues. I am taking the liberty of attaching a white paper prepared by the In-
terested  Parties  which  addresses  these  issues  and  describes  the  current  position 
contained in the Administration’s proposals, the House’s H.R. 3, and last year’s Sen-
ate bill, S. 1072. 

The remainder of our comment will highlight a few of these critical issues. 

DOT Jurisdiction to Regulate the Transportation of Hazardous Materials 

The  HMTA  directs  the  Secretary  to  implement  the  law  through  the  hazardous 
materials regulations (HMR). In order to fulfill its regulatory mission to protect the 
public and the environment, DOT must have authority to regulate a diverse commu-
nity  of  interests  and  must  constantly  manage  the  tension  between  safety,  security 
and efficiency in the transport of these materials. Three issues should be addressed 
to restore and clarify DOT’s regulatory authority to that which was intended by the 
1990 amendments. 
§ 5107—DOT–OSHA Sharing Jurisdiction 

A formatting error was made in the 1990 amendments that inadvertently granted 
the Occupational Safety and Health Administration (OSHA) shared jurisdiction with 
DOT  over  hazardous  materials  ‘‘handling’’,  registration  and  motor  carrier  permit-
ting.  Concern  over  the  jurisdictional  sharing  of  these  regulatory  matters,  especially 
regulatory  authority  over  ‘‘handling’’,  has  repeatedly  frustrated  reauthorization  at-
tempts. (A history of this formatting error is attached.) Our concern over the shared 
handling  jurisdiction  is  driven  by  the  need  for  national  uniformity  to  ensure  safe, 
secure and efficient hazmat transportation. 

The  HMTA  has  no  preemptive  effect  over  other  federal  agency  authorities.  While 
‘‘handling’’ is not defined in the HMTA, a common sense reading of the word invokes 
a number of OSHA rules on the books today that if OSHA had the resources to en-
force  would  undermine  transportation  safety,  potentially  harming  workers  and  the 
public. These include, for example, requirements for:

recognized by DOT, or in the international community, since 1980;

• rectangular,  rather  than  point-on-point,  oriented  placards  which  have  not  been 
• approval of certain materials and containers prior to transportation by the Haz-
ardous  Materials  Regulations  Board,  an  entity  abolished  by  DOT  in  1975;  and
• cargo tank shut-off valves that were amended by DOT in 1999 creating substan-

tial differences with comparable OSHA rules issued in the early 1970s. 5 

The  point  is  that  OSHA  has  failed  to  update  any  transportation  requirements 
since  1990  except  emergency  response.  More  to  the  point,  in  all  these  years,  OSHA 
has not sought to exercise its newly endowed shared authority. 

Concern about these regulatory conflicts is compounded by the fact that the Occu-
pational Safety and Health Act allows states to issue rules that are ‘‘more stringent’’ 
than  OSHA  requirements.  This  possibility  so  concerned  DOT  that,  even  as  it  was 
supporting  OSHA’s  claim  to  shared  handling  authority  before  the  Occupational 
Safety  and  Health  Review  Commission,  the  Department  argued  that  the  sharing  of 
regulatory  authority  granted  by  the  formatting  error  ‘‘pertains  only  to  the  non-pre-
emptive effect of DOT requirements on OSHA’s regulations. Section 5125 of [HMTA] 
continues to define the preemptive effect of the HMR on state, local government and 
Indian tribe requirements.’’  6 

While we would hope that Congress would simply correct the formatting error, we 
recognize  that  such  a  solution  is  highly  unlikely.  In  an  effort  to  bring  this  matter 
to  a  close,  DOT  proposed,  in  2001,  language  to  eliminate  dual  jurisdiction  and  to 
clarify lines of regulatory authority by amending § 5107(f)(2) to establish OSHA reg-
ulatory and enforcement authority for hazmat employee training (never a matter in 
dispute)  and  the  occupational  safety  or  health  protection  of  employees  responding 
to  releases  of  hazardous  materials.  In  meetings  with  DOT  in  January  of  this  year, 
the  Department  still  professes  to  support  this  language  as  an  acceptable  solution. 
We hope the Subcommittee will accept DOT’s amendment to § 5107(f)(2) as well. 
§ § 5102–5103—DOT Retraction of Jurisdiction 

SAFETEA  introduced  a  new  issue  affecting  DOT’s  regulatory  jurisdiction—an 
issue  potentially  much  more  threatening  to  the  safety  of  workers  and  the  public 

5 It  is  also  worthy  to  note  that,  because  of  OSHA’s  shared  authority,  the  agency  was  invited 
by  DOT  to  participate  in  a  regulatory  negotiation  on  this  rule.  OSHA  declined.  This  alone 
speaks volumes to OSHA’s intent to effectively exercise its shared jurisdiction.

6 Reich v. Yellow Freight, OSHC Docket 93–3292. Brief of the U.S. DOT, March 15, 1996, page 

7, footnote 1. DOT’s interpretation has yet to be tested in a court of law. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

50

than the risks of shared jurisdiction previously described, given OSHA’s current en-
forcement  posture  and  its  lack  of  regulatory  initiatives.  The  §§ 5102–5103  issue  is 
about eliminating federal jurisdiction and oversight, with some exceptions, over the 
transportation of a number of hazardous materials while they are being loaded, un-
loaded  or  handled,  which  elimination  will  be  detrimental  to  the  safety  and  health 
of workers and the public. 

Since  the  HMTA  was  first  enacted  in  1971,  DOT  has  had  jurisdiction  over  the 
loading, unloading and handling of hazardous materials incidental to transportation. 
SAFETEA proposes to eliminate this language from § 5102 as it pertains to the reg-
ulation  of  persons  who  perform  these  functions.  DOT  argues  that  the  change  is 
merely  editorial  and  the  words  unnecessary  because  ‘‘transportation’’  is  defined  in 
the HMTA to include ‘‘loading, unloading or storage incidental to the movement’’ of 
hazardous  materials.  However,  these  words  appear  in  other  sections  of  the  HMTA 
and the ‘‘transportation’’ definition does not include ‘‘handling’’, undermining the ar-
gument that the proposed change is ‘‘editorial.’’ But, more importantly, DOT is pur-
suing a controversial rulemaking—HM–223—that would limit the applicability of its 
rules  concerning  loading,  unloading  and  temporary  storage  of  hazardous  materials 
to  these  activities  only  if  they  are  performed  by  a  carrier  or  in  the  presence  of  a 
carrier.  This  is  a  sea  change  from  current  regulatory  practice  in  which  the  applica-
bility  of  DOT’s  rules  is  determined  by  the  function  performed,  not  by  who  employs 
the person performing the function. We support the retention of the ‘‘loads, unloads, 
handles’’  language  of  current  law.  We  believe  that  this  language  is  more  appro-
priately  placed  under  DOT’s  regulatory  authority  in  § 5103,  as  DOT  proposed  to 
place other phrases from § 5102 describing its regulatory authority. We also support 
adding  the  word  ‘‘handling’’  to  the  definition  of  ‘‘transportation.’’  There  are  a  num-
ber of reasons the Subcommittee should consider and support our position. All have 
a root in worker safety. 

First,  we  think  DOT’s  determination  in  HM–223  not  to  regulate  certain  loading, 
unloading and handling activities is bad for worker safety. It creates voids in areas 
of  attendance,  blocking  and  bracing  freight,  proper  filing/closing  of  transportation 
containers, incident reporting, security requirements and training. The clearest evi-
dence  of  the  extent  of  the  safety  void  is  that  there  is  a  significant  difference  in  the 
number of chemicals covered by OSHA Process Safety Management (PSM), the En-
vironmental Protection Agency’s (EPA) Risk Management Plan (RMP) requirements 
and  those  covered  by  DOT’s  HMR  requirements.  In  addition,  the  threshold  quan-
tities for determining regulatory applicability often differ between these three regu-
latory  programs.  In  contrast  to  the  list  of  800  hazardous  chemicals  subject  to  the 
HMR,  there  are  only  137  chemicals  subject  to  the  PSM  requirements  and  only  77 
acutely  toxic  chemicals  and  63  flammable  gases  and  highly  volatile  flammable  liq-
uids  subject  to  the  RMP  requirements.  In  addition,  no  other  agency  has  the  man-
power  to  enforce  DOT’s  requirements.  Concern  about  worker  safety  is  what  has 
prompted the National Transportation Safety Board (NTSB) to object to HM–223 on 
a number of occasions, concerns that are now joined by the Small Business Adminis-
tration. 

Second,  DOT’s  own  data  shows  that  hazmat  loading,  unloading  and  handling 
present  safety  concerns.  Just  in  the  last  5  years,  over  one-fourth  (14  of  53)  of  all 
hazmat  transportation  fatalities  were  due  to  exposure  during  loading  or  unloading. 
Again, NTSB has repeatedly issued recommendations to DOT to address these safe-
ty issues, not to walk away from them. 

Third,  the  regulatory  void  DOT  has  created  does  not  expand  other  federal  agen-
cies’  ability  to  regulate.  However,  it  does  opens  the  floodgate  to  the  vast  array  of 
non-federal  entities,  localities,  fire  marshals  and  the  like,  that  are  anxious  to  move 
into  this  arena.  If  DOT’s  jurisdiction  is  vacated,  there  would  be  no  way  of  stopping 
any  local  authority  from  intervening  in  these  areas.  No  other  federal  agency  has 
DOT’s  preemptive  authority.  It  has  been  a  cornerstone  of  the  HMTA  that  lack  of 
national regulatory uniformity in transportation undermines safety. 

Fourth, the Subcommittee should consider the impact of striping ‘‘loading, unload-
ing  and  handling’’  authority  from  the  statute  on  its  own  jurisdiction.  If  hazmat 
worker  safety  issues  arise  because  of  the  gaps  or,  eventually,  multiple  inconsistent 
non-federal  rules,  created  by  the  loss  of  this  authority  from  the  statute,  we  believe 
this  Subcommittee  would  not  want  to  defer  action  to  others.  There  should  be  no 
question  that  you  would  want  to  retain  jurisdiction  over  aspects  of  transportation 
that have been in the Commerce Committee since the early 1970s. 

We  have  heard  that  those  opposed  to  our  recommendations  for  §§ 5102–5103  al-
lege that the language will overturn DOT’s HM–223 rulemaking, and will frustrate 
OSHA’s  ability  to  regulate  in  these  areas.  Our  recommendations  will  not  do  that. 
First, HM–223 was issued with the ‘‘load, unload, and handles’’ in the statute. Sec-
ond,  these  changes  do  not  alter  OSHA’s  ‘‘shared’’  authority  in  § 5107,  although  we 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

51

hope as previously noted that this issue be otherwise addressed. Third, even if Con-
gress  accepts  our  recommendation  for  the  addition  of  statutory  language  in  § 5103 
to the effect that DOT regulate persons who perform hazmat functions, HM–223 will 
not  be  overturned  because  the  Supreme  Court  reaffirmed  last  year  that  OSHA  is 
not  barred  from  regulating  worker  safety  in  areas  that  other  agencies  choose  not 
to  exercise  their  statutory  authority  to  regulate. 7 While  HM–223  remains  a  sen-
sitive  issue,  concern  for  worker  and  public  safety  should  dictate  the  legislative  re-
sponse  to  the  issue  of  DOT’s  continued  statutory  jurisdiction  over  hazardous  mate-
rials loading, unloading, temporary storage and handling. 
ATF–DOT Jurisdiction (S. 1072 Section 4463) 

One  other  issue  specific  to  the  transportation  of  commercial  explosives  deserves 
to be mentioned. In 2003, this Subcommittee became engaged in an attempt by the 
Department of Justice’s (DOJ) Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives 
(ATF) to use its Title 18 authority to regulate commercial explosives transportation. 
The  result  was  an  embargo  by  all  carriers  of  all  commercial  explosives.  Shortages 
of airbags threatened to shutdown automotive manufacturing and there existed the 
possibility  that  fireworks  would  not  be  available  for  4th  of  July  celebrations.  The 
DOJ/ATF  action  even  prompted  an  international  dispute  with  the  Government  of 
Canada.  DOT  and  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  invested  enormous 
resources  to  push  DOJ/ATF  back. 8 As  a  result,  DOT  proposed  an  amendment  to 
clarify 18 U.S.C. language that was used by ATF in its attempt to regulate commer-
cial explosives transportation. The Senate proposed a version of this language in S. 
1072,  highway  act  reauthorization  legislation  passed  last  year.  DOJ  was  furious 
about  DOT’s  proposal  and,  while  it  could  not  force  DOT  to  remove  the  provision, 
it did force DOT to send language to the Hill to narrow it. 9 We strongly recommend 
that the Subcommittee retain the Senate’s position on this issue to expand the Title 
18 exception to include and provide coverage for DHS authority and to resist efforts 
to restore the ‘‘regulated by’’ language as suggested by the Administration. This lan-
guage  is  problematic  because  DOJ/ATF  used  it  to  set  themselves  up  as  the  arbiter 
of whether DOT’s rules were ‘‘sufficient’’ to trigger the Title 18 exception. 
Preserve Regulatory Uniformity 

The 1990 reauthorization of the HMTA enhanced DOT’s ability to ensure uniform 
requirements  for  the  transportation  of  hazardous  materials  by  codifying  DOT’s  ad-
ministrative  interpretations  and  procedures  implementing  the  preemption  provi-
sions  of  the  law.  In  1996,  however,  the  U.S.  Court  of  Appeals  for  the  DC  Circuit 
overturned  a  DOT  preemption  determination  for  reasons  not  supported  by  legisla-
tive, judicial or administrative precedent. This legal action threatens to reverse dec-
ades  of  administrative  practice  and  undermine  the  vitally  important  authority  of 
DOT to promote safety and efficiency in hazardous materials transportation. 

The  DC  court  ruled  that  the  preemption  authorities  of  the  HMTA  could  not  be 
applied independently by DOT when making determinations of preemption. For ex-
ample,  the  court  was  considering  a  challenge  to  DOT’s  preemption  of  state  require-
ments  under  its  49  U.S.C.  5125(a)(2)  ‘‘obstacle’’  test  authority.  The  court  rejected 
DOT’s  use  of  this  authority,  noting  that  DOT  had  failed  to  exercise  its  authority 
under  49  U.S.C.  5119,  uniform  motor  carrier  permitting,  which  it  felt  was  a  more 
appropriate preemption test. SAFETEA proposes to rectify this aspect of the court’s 
decision  by  clarifying  that  each  preemption  authority  is  independent  in  its  applica-
tion.  Congress  should  support  these  aspects  of  the  Administration’s  proposal  that 
would reaffirm DOT’s historic authority to determine the preemption of non-federal 
requirements, in accordance with statutory criteria. 

Another aspect of the DC court’s decision, which is not addressed by the Adminis-
tration’s  proposals,  was  a  challenge  to  DOT’s  application  of  an  internal  consistency 
test that considered the burden on commerce if a particular non-federal requirement 
was replicated in other jurisdictions. The court found that DOT could not apply such 
an  analysis.  Again,  the  court’s  decision  was  contrary  to  legal  precedent.  The  Su-
preme  Court  has  ruled  that  ‘‘the  practical  effect  of  [a  state]  statute  must  be  evalu-
ated not only by considering the consequences of the statute itself, but also by con-

7 Chao v. Mallard Bay Drilling, Inc. (00–927) 534 U.S. 235 (2002). 
8 DOT/DHS rules to effect 18 U.S.C. 845(a)(1) were issued in February and May 2003. In the 
rush to address the international aspect of this issue, DOT/DHS failed to address the transpor-
tation of explosives by persons authorized by the Government of Canada from the United States 
to Canada. ATF still maintains that it is a violation of Title 18 if such drivers receive explosives 
in the United States unless permits have been obtained from ATF. (See letter to Cynthia Hilton, 
IME, from Mark Siebert. ATF, March 29, 2005.) 

9 Secretary Norman Mineta letter to conferees, enclosure, comments on H.R. 3550 and S. 1072 

as passed, June 22, 2004, page 10. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

52

sidering how the challenged statute may interact with the legitimate regulatory re-
gimes  of  other  states  and  what  effect  would  arise  if  not  one,  but  many  or  every, 
state  adopted  similar  legislation.’’ 10 Congress  should  further  strengthen  DOT’s  au-
thority to ensure uniform regulations of hazardous materials transportation by clari-
fying  that  DOT  is  authorized  to  consider  such  burdens  on  commerce  when  evalu-
ating applications for preemption determinations. 
Hazardous Materials Fee Issues 

The  1990  amendment  to  the  HMTA  instituted  a  fee  to  be  paid  by  shippers  and 
carriers  of  placarded  hazardous  materials  to  fund  the  Emergency  Preparedness 
Grants  Program  (EPGP).  The  purpose  of  the  EPGP  is  to  cover  the  ‘‘unfunded’’  fed-
eral  mandate  that  states  develop  emergency  response  plans  and  to  contribute  to-
ward  the  training  of  emergency  responders.  Industry  has  contributed,  through 
hazmat registration fees, over $155 million during the life of the grants program. 11 
Since  the  events  of  September  11,  2001,  we  question  whether  or  not  the  EPGP  is 
the most efficient way to plan for hazmat emergencies or to deliver hazmat training 
to the response community, especially in light of other viable alternatives to address 
these needs. 

We  have,  for  a  number  of  years,  called  for  more  accountability  in  the  EPGP  and 
more  evidence  of  coordination  among  all  federal  initiatives  to  ensure  that  all  re-
sources  are  used  as  efficiently  and  effectively  as  possible.  We  are  not  alone  in  our 
concern.  In  FY  2003,  DOT  conducted  a  Program  Assessment  Rating  Tool  (P.A.R.T.) 
evaluation  of  the  EPGP  for  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget  which  found  the 
program to be only moderately effective. 12 Even then, some of the data used to sup-
port the program evaluation is questionable. For example, the EPGP claimed at that 
time that it was the ‘‘only federal program that provides funds to assist communities 
in  planning  for  and  responding  to  hazardous  materials  incidents.’’  (Emphasis 
added.)  This  is  not  true.  In  documents  supporting  DOT’s  FY  2006  budget  request, 
the Department admits for the first time that this program, at most, provides ‘‘funds 
that  might  not  otherwise  be  available’’  to  localities  for  training  and  planning  for 
hazardous  materials  incidents. 13 Still,  DOT’s  characterization  of  the  EPGP  would 
have  one  believe  that  the  funds  are  limited  to  planning  and  training  for  transpor-
tation-related hazmat incidents only. There is no such limitation. 14 

The  EPGP  also  claims,  as  its  FY  2005  accomplishment,  that  it  will  provide  sup-
port  to  update  and  develop  at  least  3,000  emergency  plans. 15 This  claim  is  more 
realistic  than  EPGP’s  claim  to  support  the  completion  of  3,700  emergency  plans 
which it perpetuated in each of its budget requests between FY 2003 and FY 2005. 
The  incredulity  of  this  claim  still  warrants  oversight.  Congress  intended  that  the 
planning  grants  portion  of  the  EPGP  be  used  to  ‘‘develop,  improve,  and  carry  out 
emergency  plans  under  the  Emergency  Planning  and  Community  Right-To-Know 
Act’’  (EPCRA). 16 EPCRA  requires  state  coordinating  commissions  (SERC)  to  des-
ignate  Local  Emergency  Planning  Committees  (LEPC)  which  were  charged  to  de-
velop  localized  plans  for  chemical  emergencies.  So,  it  should  come  as  no  surprise 
that PHMSA sets as a measure of the impact of the EPGP a number of these emer-
gency  plans  to  be  developed  and  updated.  What  is  surprising  is  the  target  number 
of plans to be completed or updated. First, EPA estimates that the current number 
of  LEPCs  is  about  3,500. 17 Each  LEPC  prepares  one  plan,  so  at  most  3,500  plans 
would  need  support.  Second,  LEPCs  were  in  existence  before  the  inception  of  the 
EPGP.  EPCRA  was  enacted  in  1986  and  has  required  LEPCs  to  have  ‘‘complete’’ 
plans  in  place.  Once  an  LEPC’s  plan  is  ‘‘complete,’’  based  on  acceptance  by  the 
LEPC’s  SERC,  LEPCs  are  not  required  to  ‘‘re-complete’’  these  plans  each  year,  al-
though they are required to annually ‘‘review’’ their plans. Third, EPA last surveyed 
LEPC compliance in between October 1999 and February 2000. 18 At that time, the 
Agency  found  that  approximately  45  percent  of  responding  LEPCs  had  completed 
plans  and  another  10  percent  mostly  complete.  Furthermore,  24  percent  of  LEPCs 
had  incorporated  counter-terrorism  measures  into  their  emergency  response  plans. 

10 Healy v. the Beer Institute, 491 US 324 (1989). 
11 FY 1992–2004, HMRP, DOT, November 30, 2004. 
12 P.A.R.T.,  ID  10001123,  http://www.whitehouse.gov/omb/budget/fy2005/pma/transpor-

tation.pdf , page 56 and 62. 

13 FY 2006 PHMSA Budget Submission, page 80. 
14 49 U.S.C. 5116(a) 7(b). 
15 FY 2006 PHMSA Budget Submission, page 81. 
16 49 U.S.C. 5116(a)(1)(A). 
17 http://yosemite.epa.gov/oswer/ceppoweb.nsf/content/epcraOverview.htm 
18 1999  Nationwide  LEPC  Survey,  George  Washington  University  for  EPA.  May  17,  2000. 

http://yosemite.epa.gov/oswer/ceppoweb.nsf/vwResourcesByFilename/lepcsurv.pdf/$File/
lepcsurv.pdf

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

53

Using these percentages, it would appear that 1,600 would be a more accurate pro-
jection  of  the  number  of  emergency  plans  to  be  completed,  not  3,000. 19 Further-
more,  it  is  unlikely,  given  EPA’s  assessment  of  ‘‘completed’’  and  approved  plans, 
that any significant portion of these plans are being reopened and revised. 

Finally,  DOT  allows  EPGP  planning  grant  funds  to  be  used  to  reimburse  state/
territory/tribal  grantees  to  attend  semi-annual  workshops.  Allowable  expenses  in-
clude  travel,  hotel,  per  diem,  and  a  once  a  year  conference  registration  charge  of 
$300/attendee. The spring workshop is one week long. When queried, DOT could not 
account  for  what  portion  of  the  planning  grant  was  used  by  grantees  for  these  ex-
penses, nor exactly how many persons participated in these semi-annual workshops. 
If  just  one  individual  from  each  of  the  roughly  70  grantees  sought  total  reimburse-
ment for these two workshops, the cost could easily exceed 3 percent of the planning 
grant  for  these  events  alone.  Clearly,  the  continued  need  and  usefulness  of  the 
‘‘planning’’  portion  of  the  EPGP,  even  at  the  funding  level  provided  by  current  law, 
is extremely questionable. 

In its oversight capacity, the Senate Commerce Committee, as part of its highway 
act  reauthorization  legislation  last  Congress,  included  a  provision  that  would  have 
required DOT to exercise better technical oversight and evaluation of the EPGP, to 
gather information from grantees and subgrantees to gauge performance. and to re-
port  these  results  to  the  public. 20 We  are  encouraged  by  this  commitment  because 
our efforts in the past to address EPGP shortcomings with DOT have not been satis-
factory. We only hope that the level of oversight promised by the Senate will be in-
cluded in any highway act reauthorization legislation and that it will include a com-
plete accounting of EPGP funds distributed and their use, not the type of anecdotal 
‘‘successes’’  that  comprised  so  much  of  DOT’s  1998  report  to  Congress  on  this  pro-
gram. 

Despite  these  fundamental  flaws  and  questionable  value  of  the  EPGP,  we  have 
not  objected  to  full-funding  of  the  EPGP  at  the  statutory  cap  of  $12.8  million  plus 
administrative  expenses.  However,  we  are  opposed  to  increasing  outlays  from  the 
account  to  augment  current  grants.  The  hazmat  fee  program  was  never  intended 
nor  could  it  be  expected  to  generate  the  amount  of  funds  necessary  to  meet  the 
needs of communities or first responders for planning or training for transportation-
related chemical, biological or radiological incidents. DOT’s hazmat registration fees 
are  not  the  only  source  of  financial  assistance  available  to  states  to  support  emer-
gency  preparedness  and  response  and  the  safe  and  secure  transportation  of  haz-
ardous materials shipments. Congress has already provided more comprehensive, di-
rect sources of funding for emergency response planning and training. A report pre-
pared  by  the  staff  of  the  then  Select  Committee  on  Homeland  Security  shows  that 
the  Federal  Government  provided  $28.6  billion  from  2001  through  2005  to  enhance 
the  ability  of  state  and  local  governments  and  first  responder  to  prevent,  prepare 
for,  and  respond  to  acts  of  terrorism  and  other  emergencies. 21 While  these  funds 
are not dedicated to hazardous materials planning and training, these activities are 
an  allowable  use  of  the  assistance.  The  majority  of  these  funds  are  used  to  assist 
communities to address chemical, biological, and radioactive incidents. Planning and 
training  to  respond  and  recover  from  these  hazardous  materials  releases,  whether 
accidental  or  intentional,  is  the  same.  The  Select  Committee’s  evaluation  of  federal 
funding  sources  did  not  even  bother  to  include  the  $12.8  million  available  through 
the  EPGP,  a  mere  0.04  percent  of  available  funds.  Yet,  in  the  last  Congress,  the 
Senate Commerce Committee’s highway act reauthorization legislation included pro-
visions  that  increased  the  funding  of  the  EPGP,  and  thus  the  hazmat  fees,  by  70 
percent—from  $12.8  million  to  $21.8  million.  Even  if  DOT  charged  every  current 
registrant  the  maximum  currently  allowed  by  law,  $5,000,  the  hazmat  registration 
fee  program  would  provide  only  $196.5  million:  still,  less  than  1.0  percent  of  the 
monies  available  to  hazmat  planning  and  training  from  other  sources.  We  do  not 
believe  that  the  hazmat  registration  program  would  ever  generate  this  level  of  rev-
enue because smaller carriers would simply chose not to transport hazardous mate-
rials. Finally, many states assess their own hazardous materials transportation fees. 
States  garner  upwards  of  $20  million  a  year  from  these  fees. 22 For  these  reasons, 

19 Not  all  LEPCs  responded  to  the  latest  EPA  survey.  Even  assuming  that  every  one  of  the 
non-respondents had no plan, together with those known to have no plan or an incomplete plan, 
the number of plans needing completion would be 2,500, still significantly under the 3,700 esti-
mate provided for FY 2002–04. 

20 S. 1072 revision to 49 U.S.C. 5116(k). 108th Congress. 
21 An  Analysis  of  First  Responder  Grant  Funding,  Select  Committee  on  Homeland  Security, 

April 2004, Appendix 3. 

22 Biennial State Hazardous Materials Transportation Fees, DGAC, December 2000. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

54

it  is  important  that  the  Subcommittee  continue  to  cap  the  amount  of  hazmat  fees 
that can be transferred to the EPGP account at $12.8 million. 

The Senate Commerce Committee’s S. 1072 amendments raised a new issue with 
regard to the assessment of hazmat registration fees. The 1990 amendments to the 
HMTA added a program for training trainers of private sector hazmat employees. 23 
This program was not added at the behest of industry. The program was authorized 
to  be  funded  from  general  revenues  at  $3  million  per  year. 24 The  Committee’s 
amendments  to  S.  1072  included  provisions  to  increase  the  appropriation  for  this 
program from $3 million to $4 million per year, to expand the scope of this training 
program to include direct training of hazmat employees, and to change the funding 
source  from  general  revenues  to  the  hazmat  registration  fee.  These  changes  are 
without justification. The HMTA is clear that hazmat employers are responsible for 
the  training  of  hazmat  employees.  Yet,  this  program  is  of  no  benefit  because  the 
training provided is limited to that offered by non-profit hazmat employee organiza-
tions,  organizations  that  are  unlikely  to  be  relied  upon  to  provide  the  specific  and 
specialized  training  each  company  is  liable  to  provide  to  address  its  own  unique 
hazmat  environment.  Any  potential  hazmat  employee  who  availed  themselves  of 
such training from a third-party non-profit training organization would still have to 
be trained in his employer’s hazmat operations. As a result, industry has never ad-
vocated  for  a  federal  appropriation  for  this  training  option.  Furthermore,  these 
funds are not needed to spur interest in companies/organizations providing training. 
There  are  a  number  of  companies  that  engage  in  this  training  already.  The  real 
issue  with  private  sector  training  is  assessing  how  good  third-party  training  is. 
Rather, than throw money at ‘‘train the trainer’’ programs, the Subcommittee should 
consider rewriting this section of law to require commercial training programs to ob-
tain  some  form  of  accreditation.  There  are  accreditation  programs  in  existence.  At 
minimum,  the  Subcommittee  should  not  make  the  funding  of  this  program  an  au-
thorized use of hazmat fees. 

In  sum,  the  private  sector  has  accepted  its  obligation  to  provide  training  to  its 
hazmat employees, the EPGP should not be reauthorized without a serious reassess-
ment  to  the  need  to  continually  pour  millions  of  dollars  into  the  funding  of  EPA’s 
emergency  planning  programs,  and,  given  the  plethora  to  other  viable  alternatives 
to  address  the  needs  of  the  response  community,  the  EPGP  is  at  best  inconsequen-
tial, but more realistically, a program that has outlived its relevance and usefulness. 
Conclusion 

The  transport  of  hazardous  materials  is  a  multi-billion  dollar  industry  that  em-
ploys  millions  of  Americans.  This  commerce  has  been  accomplished  with  a  remark-
able  degree  of  safety,  in  large  part,  because  of  the  uniform  regulatory  framework 
authorized  and  demanded  by  the  HMTA.  Within  the  Federal  Government,  DOT  is 
the  competent  authority  for  matters  concerning  the  transportation  of  these  mate-
rials.  We,  therefore,  strongly  recommend  the  Congress  act  on  the  recommendations 
of the Interested Parties as it considers the reauthorization of the HMTA. 

Thank you for your attention to these issues. 

ATTACHMENTS 

HAZARDOUS MATERIALS TRANSPORTATION ACT REAUTHORIZATION 

49 U.S.C. CHAPTER 51

The transportation of hazardous materials is vital to the economy. Given the safe-
ty  and  security  issues  surrounding  these  activities,  hazmat  transportation  requires 
a strong federal presence to ensure uniformity of regulation which protects the pub-
lic, facilitates compliance, and provides for the efficient movement of these essential 
materials. 

As  Congress  considers  the  reauthorization  of  federal  hazardous  materials  trans-

portation law (FHMTL) the following issues should be addressed: 
Retain DOT Jurisdiction over Hazardous Materials 
Clarify DOT’s Jurisdiction to Regulate Hazardous Materials Transportation 

The  commercial  transportation  of  hazardous  materials  is  highly  regulated  under 
national  uniform  standards  which  account  for  a  commendable  safety  record  despite 
moving  millions  of  tons  of  material  over  1.2  million  times  a  day.  Statistics  show 
that,  of  the  estimated  5,900  deaths  and  about  5  million  injuries  to  workers  each 

23 49 U.S.C. 5107(e). 
24 49 U.S.C. 5127(b). 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

55

year  in  America,  on  average,  less  than  10  deaths  and  30  major  injuries  are  attrib-
utable  to  a  release  of  hazardous  materials  in  transportation.  A  formatting  error  in 
49  U.S.C.  § 5107  unintentionally  imposed  overlapping  jurisdiction  on  OSHA  and 
DOT with respect to hazardous materials transportation, undermining the statute’s 
goal  of  regulatory  uniformity.  The  erosion  of  a  single-source,  uniform  regulatory 
framework confounds industry efforts to comply and may be exacerbated by the fact 
that the Occupational Safety and Health Act allows differing state requirements. To 
rectify  this  problem,  DOT  has  proposed  a  compromise  whereby  it  would  retain  au-
thority  over  handling  criteria,  hazmat  registration  and  motor  carrier  safety,  and 
OSHA  would  regulate  the  protection  of  employees  responding  to  a  release  of  haz-
ardous materials. OSHA would continue to share jurisdiction with DOT for hazmat 
employee training, as was the original intent of Congress. Any additional expansion 
of  OSHA’s  overlapping  jurisdiction  must  be  resisted  because  it  would  greatly  com-
plicate industry’s ability to comply with different safety standards.
Source: IP recommendation.
Status:  SAFETEA—Administration  proposal  silent  on  this  issue.  Secretary’s  June 
2004  conference  letter  reproposes  its  compromise  from  the  Department’s  2001 
bill that we ‘‘can live with.’’ As a secondary issue, the Administration’s bill pro-
poses  language  to  clarify  jurisdiction  between  DOT  and  ATF.  Secretary’s  June 
2004 conference letter weakens that language, making DOT jurisdiction depend-
ant on regulatory exercise. Support SAFETEA provision.
H.R. 3—§ 5107(f)(2)—House bill eliminates the shared jurisdiction over hazmat 
registration  and  motor  carrier  permitting,  but  retains  shared  jurisdiction  over 
‘‘handling’’  which  disrupts  national  uniform  requirements  on  ‘‘handling’’  that 
OSHA, or OSHA-approved states would regulate. Does not go far enough.
S. 1072—§ 5107(f)(2)—Senate bill retains the clerical error. Oppose.

Preserve  DOT  Jurisdiction  to  Regulate  Loading,  Unloading  and  Handling  of  Haz-

ardous Materials Incidental to Transportation 

Current  law  at  § 5102  defines  ‘‘transportation’’  of  hazardous  materials  to  include 
‘‘loading,  unloading  or  storage’’  of  material  incidental  to  movement,  and  it  defines 
hazmat  employees  who  perform  regulated  functions  to  include  the  loading,  unload-
ing  and  handling  of  these  materials.  Despite  clear  statutory  authority  to  regulate 
hazardous  materials  loading  and  unloading,  the  Administration’s  hazmat  reauthor-
ization proposal struck DOT’s statutory authority to regulate hazmat employees who 
load, unload or handle hazardous materials when it transferred the list of functions 
that subject hazmat employees persons to the hazardous materials regulations from 
§ 5102  (Definitions)  to  § 5103  (Regulatory  Authority).  DOT  has  recently  finalized 
controversial  regulations  (judicial  and  administrative  appeals  are  pending)  stating 
that it chooses not to exercise its statutory authority to regulate certain loading, un-
loading  or  handling  functions  incidental  to  the  transportation  of  hazardous  mate-
rials. Now DOT is attempting to validate that regulatory action by striking its stat-
utory  authority.  Irrespective  of  the  disputed  merits  of  DOT’s  regulatory  action,  by 
striking  this  authority,  DOT  precludes  the  opportunity  to  regulate  if  circumstances 
warrant.  The  phrase  ‘‘loads,  unloads,  or  handles  hazardous  material  incidental  to 
transportation in commerce’’ should be preserved in § 5103.
Source: Administration proposal.
Status: SAFETEA—Administration proposal drops ‘‘load, unload, handle’’ language 
from § 5102(3) when it moves other text to § 5103. Oppose dropping of language 
but support moving entire § 5102(3) text to § 5103.
H.R. 3—§ 5102(3)—House bill does not change current law.
S.  1072—§ 5102(3)  &  § 5103(b)(1)(A)—Senate  bill  adopts  Administration  pro-
posal to strike ‘‘load, unload, handle’’ language from current law. Oppose.

Recognize Federal Hazardous Materials Transportation Law Security Authority 

Congress  recognized  that  hazardous  materials  transportation  safety  and  security 
cannot  be  separated  in  the  2002  amendments  to  FHMTL.  DOT  has  exercised  that 
authority  in  rules  requiring  security  plans  and  training.  The  2002  amendments, 
however,  missed  references  to  safety  and  security  that,  given  current  rules,  should 
be  added  to  the  statute.  These  references  would  clarify  current  security  authority 
under the law. (Sections 5101, 5103, 5106 and 5107.)
Source: IP recommendation.
Status: SAFETEA—Administration proposal is silent.

H.R. 3—House bill is silent.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

56

S. 1072—Senate bill is silent.

Preserve Regulatory Uniformity 
Reaffirm DOT’s Preemption Authority 

The 1990 reauthorization of the HMTA enhanced DOT’s ability to ensure uniform 
requirements  for  the  transportation  of  hazardous  materials  by  codifying  DOT’s  ad-
ministrative  interpretations  and  procedures  implementing  the  preemption  provi-
sions  of  the  law.  In  1996,  however,  the  U.S.  Court  of  Appeals  for  the  DC  Circuit 
overturned  a  DOT  preemption  determination  for  reasons  not  supported  by  legisla-
tive, judicial or administrative precedent. This legal action threatens to reverse dec-
ades  of  administrative  practice  and  undermine  the  vitally  important  authority  of 
DOT  to  promote  safety  and  efficiency  in  hazardous  materials  transportation.  Con-
gress should support those aspects of the Administration’s proposal that would reaf-
firm  DOT’s  historic  authority  to  determine  the  preemption  of  non-federal  require-
ments, in accordance with statutory criteria. 

An  aspect  of  the  court’s  decision,  which  is  not  addressed  by  the  Administration’s 
proposals, was a challenge to DOT’s application of an internal consistency test that 
considered the burden on commerce if a particular non-federal requirement was rep-
licated  in  other  jurisdictions.  The  DC  court  found  that  DOT  could  not  apply  such 
an  analysis.  Again,  the  court’s  decision  was  contrary  to  legal  precedent.  The  Su-
preme  Court  ruled  in  Healy  v.  Beer  Institute,  that  ‘‘the  practical  effect  of  [a  state] 
statute  must  be  evaluated  not  only  by  considering  the  consequences  of  the  statute 
itself,  but  also  by  considering  how  the  challenged  statute  may  interact  with  the  le-
gitimate  regulatory  regimes  of  other  states  and  what  effect  would  arise  if  not  one, 
but  many  or  every,  state  adopted  similar  legislation.’’  Congress  should  further 
strengthen  DOT’s  authority  to  ensure  uniform  regulations  of  hazardous  materials 
transportation  by  clarifying  that  DOT  is  authorized  to  consider  such  burdens  on 
commerce when evaluating applications for preemption determinations. 
Source: IP recommendation.
Status: SAFETEA—Administration proposal addresses the independent authorities 

issue, but is silent on the burden on commerce issue.
H.R. 3—House bill addresses the independent authorities issue, but is silent on 
the burden on commerce issue.
S.  1072—Senate  bill  addresses  the  independent  authorities  issue,  but  is  silent 
on the burden on commerce issue.

Support Uniform Registration/Permitting of Hazardous Materials Motor Carriers 

In  1990,  Congress  provided  authority  for  DOT  to  eliminate  the  burden  of  dis-
similar,  redundant,  non-federal  registration/permitting  programs  unilaterally  im-
posed  on  hazardous  materials  transporters.  DOT  has  not  utilized  this  authority. 
State and local representatives have developed a program to replace the more than 
40  existing  state  permitting  programs  with  the  ‘‘Uniform  Program’’,  similar  to  the 
SSRS  base  state  registration  program.  The  Uniform  Program  is  being  implemented 
in  7  states  and  is  endorsed  by  the  transportation  industry  and  the  CVSA.  States 
benefit  by  retaining  their  existing  fee  authority,  reducing  the  permit  processing 
workload,  ensuring  that  only  safe  carriers  transport  hazardous  materials,  pre-
serving  state  enforcement  authority,  and  providing  a  safe  harbor  from  preemption 
challenges.  Industry  benefits  from  a  significant  paperwork  reduction.  Congress 
should reaffirm its 1990 commitment to streamline state-based hazardous materials 
registration/permitting and establish a deadline by which DOT must implement the 
Uniform Program.
Source: IP recommendation.
Status: SAFETEA—Administration proposal silent on this issue.

H.R.  3—§ 5119,  new  § 5128(d)—House  bill  makes  § 5119  ‘‘mandatory’’,  but  re-
opens  to  debate  the  issue  of  what  would  be  an  appropriate  program  of  uniform 
forms and procedures and weakens existing preemption authority over non-par-
ticipating  state  permit  schemes.  DOT  already  convened  such  a  working  group, 
in  which  23  states  participated  and  industry  had  a  consultative  role—another 
working  group  is  not  necessary.  While  the  House  bill  provides  $1  million  per 
year to work on the Uniform Program, the funds are misdirected to the working 
group  instead  of  the  participating  states  to  cover  administrative  costs  until  the 
program is implemented nationally and as incentive grants to states to join the 
compact. Oppose.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

57

S.  1072—§ 5119  &  § 5109—Senate  bill  makes  no  change  to  § 5109  and  still 
leaves  § 5119  permissive.  Preemption  language  compromised.  Preferable  to  the 
House. Oppose.

Oppose Emergency Waiver of Preemption 

The  Administration’s  proposal  would  grant  DOT  new  authority  to  immediately 
waive  preemption  to  allow  ‘‘state,  local,  and  tribal  governments  to  regulate  haz-
ardous  material  transportation’’  in  the  event  of  a  ‘‘possible’’  terrorist  threat.  The 
consequences  for  safety  and  security  that  could  result  from  turning  over  hazardous 
materials transportation in a terrorist emergency to local hands is tremendous, not 
to mention the potential to wreak havoc in America’s economy. Given other author-
ity in HMTA to grant preemption waivers, issue exemptions and even impose emer-
gency  orders;  and  emergency  authority  in  other  federal  statutes,  most  notably,  the 
Transportation Security Administration’s § 101(a) ‘‘National Emergency Responsibil-
ities’’ authority under the Aviation and Transportation Security Act, this new ‘‘waiv-
er of preemption’’ authority is rendered unnecessary.
Source: Administration proposal.
Status: SAFETEA—Administration proposal. Oppose.

H.R. 3—House bill does not include. Support.
S. 1072—§ 5125(g)—Senate bill adds Administration proposal. Oppose.

Support Uniform Motor Carrier Credentialing 
Reform USA Patriot Act Background Check Procedures 

The  USA  PATRIOT  Act  requires  background  checks  of  drivers  transporting  haz-
ardous  materials.  TSA  has  begun  implementing  this  mandate  through  a  decentral-
ized fingerprint-based state licensing program that does not completely fulfill the se-
curity  mandate.  This  decentralized  implementation  is  inefficient,  time  consuming, 
and cost prohibitive for many drivers. Moreover, the failure to inform motor carriers 
as to the results of the background checks is an intolerable security breach that un-
dermines the security purpose of the entire program. Congress needs to:

ground check.

• Require  that  a  federal  entity,  not  the  States,  implement  a  name-based  back-
• Ensure  drivers  are  subject  to  only  one  federal  background  check.  Currently, 
drivers  may  be  subjected  to  multiple  separate  background  checks  administered 
by the Department of Defense, FAA, ATF, U.S. Postal Service, and other federal 
programs.  Federal  background  checks  should  be  harmonized  to  the  maximum 
extent possible and duplicative checks should be eliminated.
• Preempt separate state and local background checks. National security is a fed-
eral interest and the state issuance of CDLs already is subject to federal stand-
ards and oversight. Moreover, separate state background checks do not enhance 
security  as  drivers  from  other  states  may  operate  motor  vehicles  in  all  states.
• Ensure  that  DOT  (not  HHS  or  DOJ)  retains  exclusive  authority  to  designate 
hazardous  materials,  including  those  materials  that  trigger  the  background 
check requirements.
• Ensure that the motor carrier receives timely notice of a driver’s disqualification 

or HME revocation.

Source: IP recommendation.
Status:  SAFETEA—Administration  proposal  silent  on  this  issue.  Secretary’s  June 
2004 conference letter addresses only treatment of Mexican and Canadian driv-
ers.
H.R. 3—House bill silent.
S.  1072—§ 5103a(b)(c)—Senate  bill  adopts  DOT  authority  to  determine  list  of 
hazmats.

Recognize Appropriate Limits to Enforcement Authority 
Oppose Tripling of Civil Penalties 

We  oppose  a  provision  of  the  Administration’s  bill  that  would  nearly  triple  civil 
penalties  from  $32,500  to  $100,000  for  each  hazmat  violation.  DOT  currently  can 
levy the maximum civil penalty for each violation and each day the violation occurs, 
which  has  proven  to  be  sufficient  for  the  vast  majority  of  violations,  as  evidenced 
by  DOT’s  historic  penalty  actions.  If  the  maximum  civil  penalty  cap  is  raised,  the 
higher  penalty  should  be  imposed  only  in  cases  involving  egregious  violations  that 
cause death or grievous bodily injury from the release of hazardous material.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

58

Source: Administration proposal.
Status: SAFETEA—Administration proposal. Oppose.

H.R. 3—§ 5123(a)—House bill increases civil penalty ceiling to $50,000, but al-
lows  fines  up  to  $100,000  for  aggravated  causes.  While  we  can  live  with  the 
principle  of  a  tiered  penalty  for  egregious  violations,  we  still  believe  that  the 
penalty caps are too high.
S. 1072—§ 5123(a)—Senate bill adopts Administration proposal. Oppose.

Require  Rulemaking  for  Inspection,  Investigation,  and  Emergency  Orders  Authority 
In  the  past,  the  Administration  has  proposed  expanding  DOT’s  inspection,  inves-
tigation  and  emergency  orders  authority.  Industry  disagrees  that  expanded  emer-
gency  orders  authority  is  necessary.  Moreover,  industry  is  very  concerned  that  the 
likelihood  that  fully  compliant  packages  of  hazardous  materials  could  be  damaged 
during inspection. Industry also is concerned with undue delay of time-sensitive ma-
terials, and the potential for harm if packages are opened in an inappropriate man-
ner  or  location.  Initially,  DOT  agreed  to  address  these  issues  through  notice-and-
comment  rulemaking,  i.e.,  the  new  statutory  provisions  would  not  be  self-imple-
menting.  A  requirement  that  the  expanded  authorities  not  be  implemented  until 
DOT issues rules is crucial to industry.
Source: Administration proposal.
Status:  SAFETEA—Administration  proposal  removes  requirement  for  rulemaking 

that was in the 2001 bill. Oppose.
H.R.  3—§ 5121(e)—House  bill  includes  a  rulemaking,  but  also  allows  DOT  to 
issue ‘‘guidance’’ prior to completing the rulemaking. Oppose.
S. 1072—§ 5121(e)—Senate bill adopts industry proposal. Support.

Recognize Appropriate Limits to State Enforcement Authority 

Enforcement  of  hazardous  materials  regulations  for  motor  carriers  relies  in  part 
upon  state  participation.  Most  state  enforcement  actions  are  based  on  a  ‘‘strict  li-
ability’’  standard,  rather  than  the  existing  federal  ‘‘willfully’’  or  ‘‘knowingly’’  stand-
ards.  As  such,  the  strict  liability  standards  are  subject  to  preemption  under  the 
HMTA.  The  Administration’s  bill  removes  all  preemptive  limitations  to  state  en-
forcement  authority.  The  HMTA  should  be  amended  to  affirm  a  state’s  right  to  es-
tablish  enforcement  systems  based  on  strict  liability  standards  as  long  as  the  pen-
alties  do  not  exceed  reasonable  limits,  such  as  $1,000  per  violation.  States  estab-
lishing  penalties  that  exceed  such  limits  should  be  required  to  adopt  the  federal 
‘‘willfully’’  or  ‘‘knowingly’’  standards  to  impose  those  penalties.  This  accommodation 
appropriately balances the interests of States and the regulated community.
Source: Administration proposal.
Status: SAFETEA—§ 5125(j)—Administration proposal. Oppose.

H.R. 3—House bill does not address. Support.
S.  1072—§ 5125(j)—Senate  bill  overturns  any  limits  to  state  enforcement  au-
thority. Oppose.

Preserve Limits to Hazmat Fees 
Revise Hazmat Registration Fees 

Along with other funds now available to establish and maintain hazardous mate-
rials  response  capabilities  at  the  state  and  local  level,  a  registration  fee  capped  at 
a $750 level per annum would generate sufficient revenue to support the DOT grant 
program.  DOT  should  also  have  authority  to  waive  all  but  the  $25  administrative 
fee  for  small  businesses  that  would  otherwise  be  eliminated  from  the  hazmat  reg-
istration  program  because  the  current  statutory  registration  fee  floor  of  $250  pre-
sents  an  economic  hardship  for  small  businesses.  This  recommendation  does  not 
alter or otherwise affect separate authority for DOT to assess and collect an admin-
istrative fee that allows it to process registrations.
Source: IP recommendation.
Status:  SAFETEA—Administration  proposal  silent  on  this  issue.  Secretary’s  June 
2004 conference letter in opposition is not to the increased size of the grant pro-
gram  but  only  to  the  limitation  on  the  maximum  fee  that  can  be  charged  per 
registration. Oppose any increase in the size of the grant program.
H.R. 3—§ 5108 & § 5128—Except  for  lower  registration  fee  floor,  oppose  House 
provisions  to  double  amount  of  grants  and  to  set  statutory  maximum  fee  at 
$3,000 instead of $750.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

59

S.  1072—§ 5108,  § 5107,  § 5128  &  § 4428—Oppose  Senate  provisions.  The  Ad-
ministration opposes these changes.

Other Issues of Concern
Oppose Unnecessary Increased Record Keeping Requirements 

We  oppose  the  Administration’s  proposed  extension  from  1  to  3  years  of  the 
amount  of  time  that  copies  of  the  shipping  papers  must  be  retained.  There  is  no 
evidence  that  the  existing  1  year  record  retention  requirement  of  shipping  papers 
has been inadequate. This provision adds administrative expense without an associ-
ated safety or security benefit.
Source: Administration proposal.
Status: SAFETEA—Administration proposal. Oppose.

H.R. 3—§ 5110(d)—House bill adopts a 2- rather than a 3-year retention stand-
ard. Oppose.
S. 1072—§ 5110(c)—Senate bill adopts Administration proposal. Oppose.

Oppose  Limitless  Aggravated  Violation  Authority  and  Unnecessary  Addition  of 

‘‘Reckless’’/‘‘Recklessly’’ Liability Standard 

The  Administration’s  bill  would  establish  a  new  criminal  penalty  for  ‘‘aggravated 
violations,’’ which carries a 20-year maximum term of imprisonment. This new pen-
alty  would  apply  to  violations  that  result  in  a  ‘‘release’’  of  hazardous  material,  no 
matter  how  inconsequential.  The  Administration’s  definition  of  ‘‘aggravated  viola-
tion’’ is simply too broad. The charge of an ‘‘aggravated violation’’ should be limited 
to persons who in the commission of a separate felony also cause a hazardous mate-
rial release that results in death or grievous bodily injury. 

The  Administration’s  bill  also  proposes  to  apply  a  ‘‘reckless’’  liability  standard  to 
all  modes  of  hazmat  transportation.  A  ‘‘reckless’’  standard  is  recognized  by  courts 
as a state of mind more blameworthy than ‘‘negligence,’’ but substantially less than 
‘‘willful.’’ The HMTA already recognizes this standard in aviation where passengers 
ride  above  cargo.  However,  this  standard  should  not  be  used  to  lower  the  burden 
of proof for criminal cases for shippers and carriers and their employees in all other 
modes of cargo transportation.
Source: Administration proposal.
Status: SAFETEA—Administration proposals. Oppose.

H.R. 3—§ 5124(a) & (d)—House bill suggests a compromise to the Administra-
tion  proposal  for  aggravated  violations  that  would  allow  criminal  sentences  up 
to  10  years  in  cases  involving  a  release  that  results  in  death  or  bodily  injury. 
Preferred  to  the  Administration  proposal.  House  bill  includes  the  Administra-
tion’s ‘‘reckless’’ provisions. Oppose.
S.  1072—§ 5124(b)—Senate  bill  adopts  the  Administration  proposal  for  aggra-
vated  violations  with  20  year  sentences.  Oppose.  Senate  bill  does  not  include 
the ‘‘reckless’’ provisions. Support. 

Oppose  Expansion  of  the  Definition  of  Hazmat  Employee  to  Include  Employees  for 

Companies That Do Not Accept Hazmat Shipments 

The Administration’s proposal adds the term ‘‘rejects’’ as a hazmat function, effec-
tively  expanding  the  class  of  persons  subject  to  the  HMR  to  include  employees  of 
carriers  that  have  made  a  conscious  business  decision  not  to  transport  hazardous 
materials.  The  Administration  argues  that  this  expanded  authority  is  necessary  to 
identify  undeclared  hazmat  shipments;  however,  even  carriers  that  accept  haz-
ardous  materials  find  it  virtually  impossible  to  identify  undeclared  HM.  Hazmat 
awareness  training  will  not  assist  in  the  discovery  of  undeclared  hazmat.  At  best, 
training  allows  employees  to  identify  declared  shipments,  i.e.,  shipments  complying 
with  DOT’s  hazcom  requirements.  In  short,  this  policy  will  not  prevent  undeclared 
shipments from getting into the transportation stream and will impose an unreason-
able  burden  on  carriers  who  have  a  ‘‘will  not  carry’’  policy.  DOT  already  has  ade-
quate  authority  to  address  the  problem  of  undeclared  hazmat  shipments  (see  49 
U.S.C. § 5104 (prohibitions), § 5123 (civil penalties), and § 5124 (criminal penalties)).
Source: Administration proposal.
Status: SAFETEA—§ 5103(b)(1)(A)—Administration proposal. Oppose.

H.R. 3—House bill silent.
S. 1072—§ 4466—Report  on  applying  hazmat  regulations  to  persons  who  reject 
hazmat. Compromise. Prefer House.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

60

Clarify Security Sensitive Information 

The  Administration’s  bill  gives  the  Secretary  authority  to  withhold  security-sen-
sitive  information.  While  we  support  the  objective,  we  have  suggested  amendments 
to enhance the Administration’s proposal by clarifying the specific types of informa-
tion  intended  to  be  protected  by  this  provision;  and  aligning  the  Administration’s 
language with what is already in the Homeland Security Act preempting state law.
Source: Administration proposal.
Status:  SAFETEA—§ 5121(f)—Administration  proposal  needs  to  be  strengthened 

to preempt state law.
H.R. 3—House bill silent.
S.  1072  § 5121(i)—Administration  proposal  needs  to  be  strengthened  to  pre-
empt state law.

Restore Special Permit Authority 

Much  of  the  innovation  in  the  hazardous  materials  regulations  is  accomplished 
through  ‘‘exemptions.’’  The  term  ‘‘exemption’’  gives  an  erroneous  impression  that 
hazardous materials transportation under an exemption is being carried out without 
regulation,  and  the  term  ‘‘special  permit’’,  an  historic  term  used  to  describe  these 
variances,  will  appropriately  convey  that  such  transportation  is  required  to  be  con-
ducted  in  accordance  with  terms  and  conditions  set  by  DOT.  Also,  Congress  should 
change  the  maximum  effective  period  of  a  special  permit  from  2  years  to  4  years. 
This  change  would  eliminate  a  great  deal  of  unnecessary  industry  application  time 
and  Government  processing  time  involved  in  the  present  2-year  renewal  process. 
The increased maximum effective period of time will have a positive impact on safe-
ty. It will enable PHMSA staff to avoid time-consuming processing of routine renew-
als  and  instead  focus  attention  on  more  significant  special  permit  issues.  If  safety 
issues are subsequently identified, PHMSA has authority to revoke or modify special 
permits as needed.
Source: IP recommendation.
Status: SAFETEA—Administration proposal is silent.

H.R. 3—House bill addresses these issues, but allows for the 4-year term of the 
permit  only  on  renewal.  New  special  permits  would  have  to  be  limited  to  2 
years.
S.  1072—Senate  bill  addresses  these  issues,  but  allows  for  the  4-year  term  of 
the  permit  only  on  renewal.  New  special  permits  would  have  to  be  limited  to 
2 years. Prefer Senate to the House.

Clarify  Criteria  for  Hazmat  Planning  &  Training  Grant  Eligibility  and  Allocation 
49  U.S.C.  § 5125(g)  precludes  states  from  assessing  fees  on  the  transportation  of 
hazardous material unless the fees are ‘‘fair’’ and ‘‘used for a purpose related to the 
transportation of hazardous material.’’ While Congress requires states to certify that 
they  are  in  compliance  with  the  emergency  planning  provisions  of  the  Emergency 
Planning  and  Community  Right-To-Know  Act  of  1986  to  be  eligible  for  a  grant, 
there is no requirement that states certify their compliance with § 5125(g). Congress 
should  clarify  that  states  assessing  fees  in  violation  of  federal  hazmat  law  do  not 
qualify for a grant. 

In  1990,  Congress  instituted  a  federal  registration  fee  program,  the  proceeds  of 
which are used for grants to states to assist in hazmat planning and training. When 
evaluating state applications for grant moneys, and in allocating limited grant funds 
among  the  applicants  under  49  U.S.C.  5116(b)(4),  DOT  must  determine  a  state’s 
‘‘need’’  by  considering,  among  other  things,  ‘‘whether  the  state . . . imposes  and 
collects a fee on transporting hazardous material [and] whether the fee is used only 
to  carry  out  a  purpose  related  to  transporting  hazardous  material.’’  DOT  never  has 
implemented this statutory requirement, claiming that the intent of Congress is un-
clear.  Congress  should  clarify  that  DOT’s  determination  of  ‘‘need’’  for  purposes  of 
calculating  grant  awards  should  be  reduced  for  states  maintaining  a  fee  related  to 
transporting hazardous material.
Source: IP recommendation.
Status: SAFETEA—Administration proposal silent on these issues.

H.R. 3—The House bill addresses these issues.
S. 1072—The Senate bill is silent on these issues.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

61

HISTORICAL SUMMARY OF DOT/OSHA OVERLAP 

• 1970: To avoid duplicative regulations, Congress enacted the Occupational Safe-
ty and Health Act with a provision at section 4(b)(1) that allows OSHA regulations 
to be preempted when ‘‘other agencies issue regulations that affect the occupational 
safety and health of workers.’’
• 1975: Enactment of the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act (HMTA). Pub. 
L.  93–633,  the  first  statute  to  comprehensively  regulate  the  transportation  of  haz-
ardous  materials.  Section  106  of  this  public  law,  then  49  U.S.C.  1805,  was  entitled 
‘‘Handling  of  Hazardous  Materials’’  and  contained  subsections  (a)  ‘‘Criteria,’’  which 
authorized DOT to set criteria necessary for handling such materials including per-
sonnel training and qualifications, (b) ‘‘Registration,’’ an optional mandate for DOT, 
and (c) ‘‘Requirement,’’ a provision effective only if DOT implemented subsection (b). 
Section 106 made no mention of OSHA. 
• 1990:  First  substantive  amendments  to  the  HMTA,  Pub.  L.  101–615.  including 
revisions  to  49  U.S.C.  1805,  Section  7  of  this  public  law,  also  titled  ‘‘Handling  of 
Hazardous  Materials’’  repealed  subsections  (b)  and  (c)  of  Pub.  L.  93–633,  retained 
subsection  (a)  ‘‘Criteria,’’  with  no  change,  added  new  subsection  (b)  ‘‘Training  Cri-
teria  for  Safe  Handling  and  Transportation,’’  revised  subsection  (c)  ‘‘Registration,’’ 
which  mandates  registration,  and  added  new  subsection  (d)  ‘‘Motor  Carrier  Safety 
Permits.’’  Subsection  (b)(3),  entitled  ‘‘Coordination  of  Emergency  Response  Training 
Regulations,’’ called for coordination with OSHA ‘‘under this subsection.’’ Subsection 
(b)(3) closed by noting, ‘‘no action taken by the Secretary [of Transportation] pursu-
ant to this section’’ shall preclude OSHA regulation. All legislative history indicates 
that  both  italicized  words  were  meant  to  read  subsection.  In  short,  this  history 
makes  clear  that  the  term  ‘‘section’’  in  the  second  sentence  was  an  error.  There  is 
absolutely  no  reference  in  hearings,  floor  debate,  or  summaries  of  the  1990  amend-
ments  that  Congress  acted  with  knowledge  to  grant  OSHA  shared  jurisdiction  over 
the  entirety  of  hazardous  materials  ‘‘handling’’,  let  alone  ‘‘motor  carrier  permits’’ 
and  ‘‘hazardous  materials  registration.’’  Had  the  word  ‘‘subsection’’  been  used,  only 
the ‘‘training’’ of hazmat workers would have been open to ‘‘shared’’ duplicative reg-
ulations. 
• 1994: Congress recodified transportation law. Congress was explicit that the re-
codification should result in no substantive change in the law. The recodification of 
the HMTA split the 1990 version of U.S.C. 1805 into 49 U.S.C. Sections 5106 ‘‘Han-
dling  criteria,’’  5107  ‘‘Hazmat  employee  training  requirements  and  grants,’’  5108 
‘‘Registration,’’ and 5109 ‘‘Motor carrier safety permits.’’ Section 5107(f)(2) picked up 
the  second  reference  to  OSHA  from  the  former  Sec.  1805(b)(3),  but  now  referenced 
OSHA  regulation  with  respect  to  Sections  5106,  5107(a)–(d),  5108(a)–(g)(1)  and  (h), 
and 5109. While the scope of the error was now clear, its impact was not. 
• 1996: Secretary of Labor v. Yellow Freight Systems, Inc. OSHRC Docket No. 93–
3292,  July  31,  1996.  The  impact  of  the  error  was  first  felt  when  an  administrative 
law judge under the OSHA Review Commission, upon reading recodified Subsection 
5107(f)(2), concluded that virtually no hazardous materials regulation by DOT could 
be  deemed  an  ‘‘exercise’’  of  jurisdiction  over  occupational  safety  and  health  within 
the  meaning  of  4(b)(1)  of  the  OSH  Act,  thereby  allowing  duplicate  coverage  of  the 
same workplace hazards by both OSHA standards and DOT regulations. 
• 1997:  Original  DOT  proposal  to  reauthorize  the  HMTA.  The  1990  Act  expired 
in 1998. The original Administration bill, that passed the Senate, corrected the error 
in § 5107(f)(2) by striking the referenced provisions of §§ 5106, 5108, and 5109. Sub-
sequently,  the  Administration,  bowing  to  pressure  from  DOL/OSHA/Labor,  tried  to 
amend  the  Senate-passed  bill  to  retain  the  error.  The  legislation  died  at  the  end  of 
the 105th Congress. 
• 2001:  DOT  proposes  a  different  approach  to  resolve  the  jurisdictional  overlap 
created by the error in § 5107 by acknowledging that in addition to training, OSHA 
shares  jurisdiction  over  hazmat  employees  that  engage  in  emergency  response. 
While this approach does not ‘‘correct’’ the error, it narrows OSHA’s virtually unre-
strained  ‘‘handling’’  authority,  to  a  defined  area  of  ‘‘emergency  response.’’  DOT  and 
DOL endorsed this compromise. Industry was willing to accept it as a way to move 
beyond  this  issue  and  to  fully  address  HMTA  reauthorization.  The  legislation  died 
at the end of the 107th Congress. 
• 2003:  In  the  context  of  TEA–21  reauthorization,  Congress  included  provisions 
to  reauthorize  the  HMTA  although  the  Administration  had  not  submitted  a  reau-
thorization proposal. DOT’s position on the reauthorization was to support the com-
promise presented in 2001. In the meantime, DOT has issued a final rule, HM–223 
‘‘Applicability  of  the  Hazardous  Materials  Regulations.’’  HM–223  was  intended  to 
clarify  the  regulatory  jurisdiction  of  various  federal  agencies  with  respect  to  DOT. 
The rule addresses the ‘‘typographical’’ error by stating that DOT was choosing not 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

62

to regulate in areas that OSHA had regulated irrespective of whether there was lan-
guage  in  the  law  or  not.  In  short,  the  section  4(b)(1)  preemption  is  never  triggered. 
It  remains  to  be  seen  how  OSHA  authorized  states  may  take  advantage  of  the 
shared jurisdiction authority to impose requirements that are different or additional 
to federal requirements frustrating national and international regulatory uniformity 
and  undermining  hazardous  materials  transportation  safety  and  security.  Neither 
the  Senate  nor  the  House  have  held  hearings  to  allow  these  facts  to  come  forward 
or  to  receive  testimony  on  the  nearly  dozen  other  new  issues  that  have  arisen  over 
HMTA reauthorization in this Congress. 
• 2004:  DOT  issues  the  Administration’s  views  on  the  TEA–21  reauthorization 
bill specifically addressing the ‘‘long-standing error’’ in § 5107. The Administration’s 
position continues to support the compromise articulated in 2001. The House passes 
legislation,  H.R.  3550,  that  partially  addresses  the  1990  error.  The  legislation  dies 
at the end of the 108th Congress. 
• 2005:  As  TEA–21  reauthorization  gets  underway  in  the  109th  Congress,  DOT 
declines  to  submit  revised  reauthorization  proposals  citing  concern  that  new  pro-
posals  would  duly  delay  congressional  action.  DOT  maintains  that  its  position  on 
the error is the compromise articulated in 2001. The House passes legislation, H.R. 
3, that partially addresses the 1990 error. 

CORPORATE TRANSPORTATION COALITION 

Bowie, MD, April 4, 2005

Hon. TED STEVENS, 
Chairman; 
Hon. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 
Co-Chairman; and 
Hon. TRENT LOTT, Chairman of the Senate Subcommittee on Surface Transportation 
and Merchant Marine, 
Senate Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee, 
Washington, DC.
Dear Chairman Stevens, Co-Chairman Inouye and Chairman Lott:

On  behalf  of  the  Corporate  Transportation  Coalition  (CTC),  I  am  writing  to  ex-
press  our  views  on  several  issues  before  the  Committee  and  the  Subcommittee  as 
you address reauthorization of federal motor carrier programs. 

The  Corporate  Transportation  Coalition  is  an  alliance  of  associations  and  compa-
nies  representing  the  transportation  interests  of  the  food,  manufacturing,  distribu-
tion,  construction,  retail,  and  service  industries.  CTC’s  members  utilize  truck  fleets 
and drivers as an integral part of their business operations. Collectively, CTC mem-
bers’  companies  employ  tens  of  thousands  of  drivers  and  operate  commercial  vehi-
cles in a wide range of operations. These encompass virtually every type of fleet and 
vehicles of every size. 
Driver Hours of Service 

Since January 2004, the rules under which interstate motor carriers operate per-
mit 11 hours of driving time within a 14-hour period from the time a driver begins 
work, after the driver has been off-duty for a period of at least 10 consecutive hours. 
Unlike  the  ‘‘old’’  rules,  however,  taking  off-duty  time  during  the  course  of  the  day 
does  not  extend  the  daily  tour  of  duty  period.  In  other  words,  under  the  current 
rules,  a  driver  may  not  drive  after  the  14th  hour  from  clocking  in,  until  he  or  she 
has  had  at  least  10  consecutive  hours  off-duty.  It  does  not  matter  how  much  off-
duty time may have been taken during the course of the 14-hour period. 

We  believe  this  inflexible  14  hour  tour  of  duty  has  a  detrimental  effect  on  high-
way  safety  and  drivers’  health  and  wellbeing  in  that  it  provides  a  disincentive  for 
drivers to take lunch and other needed rest breaks during the course of their work-
day.  The  14-hour  rule  also  has  the  unintended  consequence  of  increasing  the  num-
ber of driver layovers, meaning that drivers more frequently sleep away from home. 
Studies cited by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration suggest that driv-
ers  who  return  home  every  day  experience  fewer  fatigue  related  serious  crashes 
than those who sleep on the road. 

In  addition,  the  reduction  in  operational  flexibility  occasioned  by  the  consecutive 
14-hour rule has resulted in some companies being forced to hire additional drivers. 
Again,  based  on  data  cited  by  the  agency,  this  would  appear  to  have  the  effect  of 
increasing  rather  than  reducing  crashes,  due  both  to  the  increase  in  inexperienced 
new drivers and additional trucks on the highways. 

The  14-hour  rule  also  has  productivity  and  cost  impacts.  Many  CTC  companies 
engage  in  short-haul  operations.  It  is  interesting,  to  say  the  least,  that  FMCSA’s 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

63

own  research  associates  driver  fatigue  problems  with  the  long-haul  operation  of 
tractor-trailers.  Yet  the  cost  burden  of  the  consecutive  14-hour  rule  falls  not  on 
these  higher-risk  operators,  but  on  short-haul  fleets,  for  whom  no  significant  risk 
has been identified. 

Moreover, unlike some other segments of the ‘‘trucking industry’’, most CTC com-
panies  derive  little  or  no  offsetting  economic  benefit  from  the  additional  hour  of 
driving time provided in the new rules. The increase in allowable driving time from 
10  to  11  hours  generally  provides  an  economic  benefit  to  long-haul  carriers  only. 
There  is  no  corresponding  offset  for  short-haul  operations  in  which  drivers  spend 
considerable time in non-driving tasks. 

For  these  reasons,  CTC  urges  the  Committee  to  seek  to  amend  the  consecutive 
14-hour  rule  to  permit  a  driver  to  ‘‘extend’’  his  or  her  14-hour  tour  of  duty  by  up 
to two hours by taking off-duty rest breaks during the course of the workday. 
Fuel Surcharges 

Section  4139  of  H.R.  3  as  passed  by  the  House  on  March  10  would  require  that 
shippers, carriers and intermediaries pay fuel surcharges to the motor carriers they 
use.  Purchasers  of  transportation  services  would  be  required  to  utilize  a  minimum 
fuel surcharge standard established in law. 

CTC believes Section 4139 represents government intervention into motor carrier 
pricing  not  seen  since  the  days  of  comprehensive  economic  regulation  of  trucking 
under the old Interstate Commerce Commission. The provision would, in effect, im-
pose price setting, and control over private contracting, through congressional edict. 
Moreover,  Congress  previously  eliminated  tariffs  and  undercharge  claims  based 
on  those  tariffs,  yet  Section  4139  establishes  a  similar  legal  trap  for  shippers,  car-
riers  and  brokers.  The  surcharges  would  be  based  on  a  complicated  formula  for  de-
termining  fuel  costs  and  mileage  for  each  shipment,  and  would  vary  depending  on 
where the freight is tendered. 

This opens up nearly unlimited opportunities for lawsuits alleging underpayment 

Section  4139  repudiates  25  years  of  motor  carrier  deregulation  and  the  need  to 

of surcharges. 

limit frivolous lawsuits. 

We  urge  the  Committee  to  work  toward  passage  of  a  highway  bill  that  supports 
private  enterprise  and  the  free  market  and  rejects  government  regulation  of  prices 
and interference in private contracting. 
Single State Registration System 

The  Single  State  Registration  System  (SSRS)  is  a  means  by  which  38  partici-
pating  states  collect  fees,  ostensibly  for  ‘‘registration  of  insurance’’  from  for-hire 
motor  carriers.  This  program,  which  is  a  holdover  from  the  days  of  intrusive  eco-
nomic regulation under the Interstate Commerce Commission, has long since ceased 
to serve any public policy purpose and has become merely a means for states to col-
lect fees. The program should be repealed. Moreover, it should not be replaced with 
any system requiring motor carriers to file proof of financial responsibility with any 
state or pay fees in connection with such filings. 

In particular, CTC is opposed to any ‘‘replacement system’’ that would include pri-
vate  motor  carriers,  or  require  private  motor  carriers  to  file  proof  of  financial  re-
sponsibility  in  any  state  or  with  the  federal  government,  or  pay  any  fee  in  connec-
tion with such filings. 

Such a provision, were it to become law, would amount to significant new tax and 
regulatory  burden  on  private  carriers,  many  of  which  are  small  businesses.  We 
would further note that Congress has conducted no hearings or debate on proposals 
to replace the SSRS with a system that would extend these tax and regulatory bur-
dens to private carriers or others. 

Thank  you  for  this  opportunity  to  express  our  views  on  these  issues  before  the 

We  request  that  this  letter  be  included  in  the  record  of  the  hearing  titled  ‘‘High-
way, Motor Carrier, and Hazardous Materials Transportation Safety, and Transpor-
tation of Household Goods’’ before the Subcommittee on Surface Transportation and 
Merchant Marine, April 5, 2005. 

Committee. 

Sincerely, 

EARL EISENHART, 

Executive Director 

Signatories 

Air Conditioning Contractors of America 
American Bakers Association 
American Beverage Association 
American Frozen Food Institute 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

64

Food Marketing Institute 
Grocery Manufacturers Association 
Independent Bakers Association 
International Foodservice Distributors Association 
National Association of Wholesaler-Distributors 
National Beer Wholesalers Association 
National Potato Council 
National Ready Mixed Concrete Association 
National Retail Federation 
Retail Industry Leaders Association 
Snack Food Association 

Hon. TED STEVENS, 
Chairman, 
Senate Commerce, Science, and Transportation Committee, 
Washington, DC.
Dear Senator Stevens:

April 5, 2005

We would like to extend our congratulations to you on becoming Chair of the Sen-
ate  Commerce,  Science  and  Transportation  Committee.  As  leaders  of  public  health, 
safety,  and  child  advocacy  groups,  and  medical  organizations,  we  look  forward  to 
working with you on legislative initiatives in the 109th Congress to address the per-
sonal  and  financial  losses  resulting  from  motor  vehicle  crashes.  Annually,  nearly 
43,000 people are killed and 3 million more are injured nationwide at a cost of more 
than  $230  Billion.  Motor  vehicle  crashes  continue  to  be  the  leading  cause  of  death 
for children, teens and adults up to age 33 as well as traumatic brain injury result-
ing in death or permanent disability for thousands of Americans each year. A study 
by  the  Alaska  Injury  Prevention  Center  showed  that  more  than  39,000  Alaska  resi-
dents, on average, are involved in motor vehicle crashes each year. 

The Senate Commerce Science and Transportation Committee has a long, success-
ful history of initiating and passing bi-partisan legislation that has saved thousands 
of  lives,  prevented  millions  of  injuries  and  avoided  the  loss  of  billions  of  dollars  in 
health  care  and  economic  costs  due  to  highway  crashes.  Last  year,  Republican  and 
Democratic  Members  of  this  Committee  supported  enactment  of  comprehensive 
highway  and  auto  safety  legislation  that  was  included  as  Title  IV  of  S.  1072,  the 
Safe,  Accountable,  Flexible,  and  Efficient  Transportation  Act  of  2003  (SAFETEA). 
In  fact,  it  was  largely  the  important  work  of  the  Senate  Commerce,  Science  and 
Transportation Committee that put the ‘‘safety’’ into the SAFETEA legislation. 

This common sense, life-saving legislation directed the U.S. Department of Trans-
portation  to  move  forward  on  long-overdue  or  delayed  safety  standards  and  pro-
grams to improve passenger car and truck safety, address impaired driving, protect 
children, and encourage seat belt use. The safety provisions in S. 1072 were the re-
sult  of  a  lengthy,  bipartisan  process  that  included  Committee  hearings  and  input 
from  all  interested  parties.  Furthermore,  44  Republican  and  Democratic  Senators 
sent  a  letter  on  September  13,  2004  to  the  Senate  conferees  endorsing  adoption  of 
Title IV of S. 1072. 

These  safety  measures  have  been  under  consideration  by  the  U.S.  DOT  for  years 
and  in  some  cases  decades,  but  have  not  been  implemented.  Title  IV  of  S.  1072  set 
goals  for  government  action  over  the  next  few  years  and  gave  safety  agencies  max-
imum flexibility in developing safety standards and other life-saving programs. 

The failure to enact Title IV in the last Congress was a major setback to highway 
and  auto  safety.  We  urge  you,  as  the  new  leader  of  the  Senate  Commerce,  Science 
and Transportation Committee, to reprise the safety provisions in Title IV of S. 1072 
adopted  by  the  Senate  in  the  last  Congress  and  to  make  enactment  a  top  priority 
as part of the surface transportation reauthorization legislation. 

On  behalf  of  our  organizations,  we  look  forward  to  working  with  you  to  advance 
highway and auto safety legislation in the coming months that will protect our fami-
lies, reduce the devastating human and financial toll of highway crashes, and make 
our  roads  and  highways  safer  to  travel.  Your  leadership  and  support  for  enacting 
the  same  safety  provisions  in  Title  IV  of  S.  1072  will  have  a  profound  effect  on  the 
health and safety of our nation’s children, teens and adults for years to come. 

Sincerely,

Jacqueline Gillan, Vice President, Advocates for Highway and Auto Safety
Georges C. Benjamin, MD, FACP, Executive Director, American Public Health 
Association

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

65

Carol Berkowitz, MD, FAAP, President, American Academy of Pediatrics
Joan Claybrook, President, Public Citizen
Howard  R.  Champion,  MD,  President,  Coalition  for  American  Trauma  Care
Jack Gillis, Director of Public Affairs, Consumer Federation of America
Robert DeMichelis II, Legislative Liaison, Brain Injury Association of America
Stephen W. Hargarten, MD, MPH, American College of Emergency Physicians
Sally Greenberg, Senior Product Safety Counsel, Consumers Union
Janette E. Fennell, Founder, KIDS AND CARS
Andrew McGuire, Executive Director, Trauma Foundation
Mary Jagim, RN BSN, CEN, Emergency Nurses Association
Clarence M. Ditlow, Executive Director, Center for Auto Safety
Rosemary Shahan, Founder, Consumers for Auto Reliability and Safety
Ralf Hotchkiss, Technical Consultant, Whirlwind Wheelchair International
Anne Canby, President, Surface Transportation Policy Project
William  Speedy  Bailey,  Keiko  Injury  Prevention  Coalition,  Safe  Kids  Hawaii
Jim Sellers, Executive Director, Akeela, Inc., Anchorage, Alaska
Britt E. Gates, Co-Founder/Chair, The Zoie Foundation 

Advocates  for  Highway  and  Auto  Safety  (April  2005)  List  of  41  U.S.  Senators  Support 
for  Including  Motor  Vehicle  Safety  Provisions  in  the  Safe,  Accountable,  Flexible  and 
Efficient Transportation Equity Act (SAFETEA) 

Joseph R. Biden, Jr. (D–DE) 
Jeff Bingaman (D–NM) 
Barbara Boxer (D–CA) 
Sam Brownback (R–KS) 
Maria Cantwell (D–WA) 
Thomas R. Carper (D–DE) 
Lincoln Chafee (R–RI) 
Hillary Rodham Clinton (D–NY) 
Norm Coleman (R–MN) 
Susan M. Collins (R–ME) 
Jon S. Corzine (D–NJ) 
Mark Dayton (D–MN) 
Mike DeWine (R–OH) 
Christopher J. Dodd (D–CT) 
Elizabeth Dole (R–NC) 
Byron L. Dorgan (D–ND) 
Richard Durbin (D–IL) 
Russell D. Feingold (D–WI) 
Dianne Feinstein (D–CA) 
Tom Harkin (D–IA) 
Tim Johnson (D–SD) 

Edward M. Kennedy (D–MA) 
Herb Kohl (D–WI) 
Mary L. Landrieu (D–LA) 
Frank R. Lautenberg (D–NJ) 
Patrick J. Leahy (D–VT) 
Joseph I. Lieberman (D–CT) 
Richard G. Lugar (R–IN) 
Barbara A. Mikulski (D–MD) 
Patty Murray (D–WA) 
Bill Nelson (D–FL) 
Mark L. Pryor (D–AR) 
Jack Reed (D–RI) 
John D. Rockefeller IV (D–WV) 
Paul S. Sarbanes (D–MD) 
Charles E. Schumer (D–NY) 
Olympia J. Snowe (R–ME) 
Arlen Specter (R–PA) 
George V. Voinovich (R–OH) 
John Warner (R–VA) 
Ron Wyden (D–OR) 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK LAUTENBERG TO

HON. ANNETTE SANDBERG 

Question  1.  Did  your  agency  contribute  to  the  Department  of  Transportation’s 
(DOT)  2004  Report  on  ‘‘the  Western  Uniformity  Scenario  Analysis?’’  Do  you  agree 
with the findings? 

Answer.  The  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  (FMCSA)  contributed 
information used in Chapter VII of the Western Uniformity Scenario Analysis, enti-
tled ‘‘Safety.’’

The  Executive  Summary  to  the  report  states  in  part,  ‘‘the  Department  believes 
that an appropriate balance has been struck on truck size and weight. . . . The De-
partment  does  not  support  [a]  piecemeal  approach  to  truck  size  and  weight  pol-
icy. . . .  A  regional  approach  such  as  the  Western  Uniformity  Scenario  could  have 
greater benefits than a series of individual exemptions, but it also could have much 
more serious adverse consequences unless closely monitored. Unless there were very 
strong  support  from  state  elected  officials  for  a  carefully  controlled  and  monitored 
evaluation  of  changes  in  truck  size  and  weight  limits  such  as  those  in  the  Western 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

66

Uniformity  Scenario,  the  risks  of  adverse  impacts  from  the  unmonitored  use  of 
LCVs,  the  divisiveness  that  might  ensue  as  the  current  balance  in  truck  size  and 
weight  policy  is  upset,  and  the  further  polarization  of  this  very  contentious  issue 
would outweigh the benefits that might be realized. Strong support from elected offi-
cials  of  states  within  the  region  for  a  change  in  truck  size  and  weight  limits  has 
not  been  evident  to  date,  and  there  is  no  compelling  federal  interest  in  promoting 
changes that are not strongly supported by the affected states.’’ FMCSA agrees with 
this statement.

Question  2.  Why  does  the  Administration  continue  to  pursue  its  new  hours  of 
service  rule,  when  a  court  has  already  struck  it  down  and  called  into  question  the 
safety  basis  for  the  rule?  Is  it  the  Administration’s  contention  that  this  rule  is  the 
best possible way to improve motor carrier driver fatigue? 

Answer.  The  United  States  Court  of  Appeals  for  the  District  of  Columbia  Circuit 
vacated  the  2003  Hours  of  Service  (HOS)  rule  on  procedural  grounds,  directing 
FMCSA  to  more  specifically  address  the  effects  on  driver  health.  FMCSA  is  com-
plying  fully  with  the  court’s  decision  and  has  established  a  dedicated  agency  team 
to reexamine the 2003 rule in order to address the court’s conclusion. As you know, 
Congress  (in  the  Surface  Transportation  Extension  Act  of  2004,  Part  V),  provided 
that  the  2003  rule  will  remain  in  place  until  September  30,  2005,  or  the  effective 
date of a new final rule addressing the issues raised by the court, whichever is ear-
lier. 

On  January  24,  2005,  FMCSA  published  a  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  an-
nouncing that it is reviewing and reconsidering the 2003 rule, and requesting public 
comment  on  what  changes,  if  any,  to  the  rule  are  necessary  to  respond  to  the  con-
cerns  raised  by  the  court.  The  deadline  for  public  comments  was  March  10,  2005, 
and FMCSA is reviewing the comments. FMCSA is committed to issuing a final rule 
by September 30, 2005.

Question 3. In 2003, the Inspector General pointed out serious problems with the 
accuracy  and  maintenance  of  safety  data  collected  by  your  agency.  When  will  the 
agency  have  these  problems  permanently  corrected  and  when  will  you  post  this  in-
formation again on your website? 

Answer. In August 2004, FMCSA restricted public access temporarily to the Anal-
ysis  and  Information  (A&I)  Online  SafeStat  Module’s  Accident  Safety  Evaluation 
Area  (SEA)  and  overall  SafeStat  score.  This  action  was  taken  because  these  scores 
rely  on  state-provided  crash  reports  that  are  sometimes  of  inadequate  quality  be-
cause  of  the  timeliness.  completeness,  or  accuracy  of  the  data.  The  Accident  SEA 
and the overall SafeStat score will return to the public A&I website when the infor-
mation provided is deemed to be more reliable. It is important to note that this data 
was  never  intended  to  be  relied  upon  by  the  public  in  the  manner  in  which  it  has 
been  used.  The  information  was  designed  to  be  one  of  many  tools  FMCSA  uses  to 
identify potentially high-risk carriers. 

In  June  2004,  FMCSA  developed  a  methodology  to  evaluate  quarterly  the  com-
pleteness, timeliness, accuracy, and consistency of state-reported crash and roadside 
inspection  data.  The  methodology  compares  the  quality  of  state-reported  crash  and 
roadside inspection data to standards set by FMCSA. Consisting of five performance 
measures  and  one  overriding  performance  indicator,  the  new  methodology  assigns 
each state and the nation a rating of good, fair, or poor for each measure, indicator, 
and  overall  rating.  For  each  data  quality  measure,  FMCSA  is  monitoring  the  eval-
uation  results  to  determine  when  to  lift  the  public  access  restriction  imposed  last 
year. 

FMCSA’s  goal  is  simple.  We  must  ensure  that  our  data  is  accurate,  timely,  and 
complete  and  to  that  end  we  are  working  diligently  with  our  state  partners  to  en-
sure the success of this review. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO

STACEY L. GERARD 

Question 1. The Administration has recommended increasing civil penalties to up 
to $100,000 for serious violations of HAZMAT regulations in SAFETEA. Can you ex-
plain the justification for this increase? 

Answer.  At  present,  the  maximum  civil  penalty  for  a  violation  of  Federal  haz-
ardous material transportation law or the regulations issued there under is $32,500 
per  violation.  The  Department  considers  that  an  increase  to  $100,000  per  violation 
is  warranted  to  give  the  Department  additional  flexibility  to  assess  high  civil  pen-
alties  in  those  unusual  cases  involving  significant  noncompliance  with  the  law  and 
regulations,  especially  those  violations  which  have  the  potential  to  result  in  death, 
serious  injury,  or  significant  property  damage  (including  damage  to  the  environ-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

67

ment). This increase would make the maximum civil penalty for a hazardous mate-
rial  violation  consistent  with  DOT’s  civil  penalty  for  violations  of  federal  pipeline 
safety law, which contains a $100,000 civil penalty provision.

Question  2.  Has  your  agency  and  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  estab-
lished an annex to the DHS–DOT Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) character-
izing the agencies’ working relationship for HAZMAT security? 

Answer.  On  September  28,  2004,  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS) 
and  the  Department  of  Transportation  (DOT)  signed  an  annex  to  the  DHS–DOT 
MOU  implementing  Homeland  Security  Council  (HSC)  recommendations  on  the 
transportation of toxic inhalation hazard (TIH) materials. The purpose of the annex 
is to delineate clear lines of authority and responsibility and to specify the commit-
ments  to  carry  out  various  aspect  of  the  HSC’s  plan  for  enhancing  the  security  of 
TIH  shipments  by  rail.  Within  DOT,  the  agencies  with  primary  responsibility  for 
carrying  out  the  annex  are  the  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Adminis-
tration (PHMSA); the Office of Intelligence, Security, and Emergency Response; and 
the Federal Railroad Administration. The annex is considered Sensitive Security In-
formation.  A  more  general  annex  between  DHS  and  DOT  addressing  broader  as-
pects of hazardous materials transportation may be considered after we gain experi-
ence working with the TIH annex.

Question 3. Has your agency been reviewing HAZMAT security plans or taken any 
enforcement  action  against  any  HAZMAT  shipper  or  carriers  for  insufficient  plans? 
Answer.  The  Research  and  Special  Programs  Administration  (RSPA)  and,  since 
February  20,  2005,  the  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Administration 
(PHMSA)  began  monitoring  for  compliance  with  the  security  requirements  in  Title 
49, Code of Federal Regulations, § 172.800 et seq., on October 1, 2003. The require-
ments became final on March 25, 2003 with permissive compliance until September 
25,  2003,  when  compliance  became  mandatory.  The  regulations  require  entities 
meeting  the  applicability  provisions  in  § 172.800(b)  to  have  a  written  security  plan, 
including a written risk assessment. The plan must cover the areas of personnel se-
curity, unauthorized access, and en route security. Entities are also required to pro-
vide awareness and in-depth security training. 

Since  the  regulations  were  new,  RSPA/PHMSA  decided  to  allow  a  period  of  time 
for  entities  to  gear  up  for  compliance.  For  inspections  conducted  from  October  1, 
2003  through  June  30,  2004,  inspectors  reviewed  the  steps  taken,  if  any,  to  comply 
with  the  security  regulations,  documented  and  discussed  non-compliance,  but  did 
not  recommend  that  any  enforcement  action  be  taken.  During  this  time  period,  the 
inspectors conducted 1,241 inspections, of which 748 (60.3 percent) required a secu-
rity  plan  to  be  in  place.  The  inspectors  determined  that  only  320  entities  (43  per-
cent) were in full compliance. 

On  July  1,  2004,  RSPA/PHMSA  inspectors  began  enforcing  the  requirements  to 
have  a  security  plan.  Through  April  8,  2005,  the  inspectors  have  conducted  1,290 
inspections.  The  total  number  requiring  a  security  plan  was  749  (58  percent).  The 
inspectors  determined  that  423  (56.5  percent)  were  in  full  compliance.  This  rep-
resents an increase in compliance of 13.5 percent. 

From  July  1,  2004  through  April  8,  2005,  RSPA/PHMSA  has  initiated  129  civil 
penalty  cases  that  include  at  least  one  violation  for  failure  to  develop  and  adhere 
to a security plan, and 54 ticket penalty actions for lesser violations involving secu-
rity training or incomplete security plans. 

To  our  knowledge,  all  the  modes  with  hazmat  responsibility  are  currently  enforc-

ing the HAZMAT security plan requirements. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. TED STEVENS TO

HON. JEFFREY W. RUNGE 

Roof Crush 

Question  1.  NHTSA’s  ‘‘Vehicle  Safety  Rulemaking  Priorities  and  Supporting  Re-
search: 2003–2006’’ indicated publication of a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking to up-
grade FMVSS No. 216, ‘‘Roof crush,’’ in 2004. Why has the schedule slipped consid-
ering the importance of upgrading FMVSS No. 216? 

Answer. As the agency was developing a proposal to upgrade the standard, we de-
cided  it  was  important  to  consider  a  range  of  options  and  tests  in  order  to  achieve 
the  most  feasible,  effective  and  economical  solution.  Evaluation  of  additional  pos-
sible  tests  required  further  research  on  our  part  that  was  not  originally  scheduled. 
The  NPRM  was  transmitted  on  April  25,  2005  to  OMB  for  review.  NHTSA  expects 
to publish the NPRM in Summer 2005.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

68

Question  2.  Also.  why  is  NHTSA  working  to  improve  this  standard  in  light  of  re-
cent  agency  statements  that  the  new  standard  would  only  save  about  40  lives  each 
year? 

Answer.  A  proposal  to  upgrade  roof  crush  resistance  is  one  part  of  a  comprehen-
sive  agency  plan  for  reducing  the  serious  risk  of  rollover  crashes  and  the  risk  of 
death and serious injury when rollover crashes do occur. All countermeasures must 
work together to help create a driving environment in which rollovers can be avoid-
ed and rollover-related fatalities and injuries minimized. 

The most effective approach to reduce rollover fatal and serious injuries is to pre-
vent  rollover  crashes,  but  when  rollover  crashes  do  occur,  roof  structural  integrity 
is  important  to  ensure  that  the  other  safety  features,  such  as  ejection  mitigation 
through side curtains, strengthened door latches. and restraint systems all work to-
gether to provide optimal occupant protection. 

We  also  believe  that  future  NHTSA  work  to  improve  restraints  in  rollovers  and 
ejection  mitigation  will  work  in  tandem  with  this  roof  crush  rulemaking  to  save 
more lives.

Question  3.  Why  would  NHTSA  not  attempt  to  implement  a  more  effective  roof 

crush standard that saves more lives? 

Answer.  The  agency  believes  that  its  proposal  will  be  a  most  cost  effective  im-
provement  to  roof  crush  strength.  We  examined  other  approaches  and  found  that 
they weren’t more effective, presented technical barriers, and/or were too costly rel-
ative  to  the  benefits.  In  addition,  there  are  other  cost-effective  countermeasures 
such  as  ejection  mitigation  and  advanced  restraint  systems  that  could  prevent  and 
reduce even more rollover fatalities and serious injuries. 
Vehicle Compatibility 

Question  4.  Has  NHTSA  monitored  the  Alliance’s  adherence  to  the  Agreement  to 

Answer.  Annual  submissions  are  provided  to  the  agency  by  participating  vehicle 
manufacturers  regarding  the  vehicle  make/models  that  meet  their  commitments. 
These submissions have been placed in the public docket.

Question 5. Does NHTSA believe that the Alliance is adhering to the terms of the 

date? 

Agreement? 

are not being met. 

Answer.  The  agency  has  no  evidence  to  indicate  that  the  terms  of  the  agreement 

For  enhanced  front-to-side  self-protection,  the  agreement  requires  that  by  Sep-
tember  1,  2007,  at  least  50  percent  of  the  participating  manufacturers’  production 
will provide improved head protection. 

For front-to-front crashes, the agreement requires that by September 1, 2009, 100 
percent  of  the  participating  manufacturers’  light  truck  production  will  have  geo-
metric alignment.

Question  6.  Has  the  Agreement  had  the  effect  of  slowing  down  or  stopping 

NHTSA’s rulemaking efforts in the area of crash compatibility? 

Answer.  No.  industry’s  voluntary  agreement  has  had  no  effect  on  NHTSA’s  rule-

making and research in this area. 

NHTSA  published  an  upgrade  to  FMVSS  No.  214  ‘‘Side  impact  protection,’’  as  a 
first  initiative  in  its  approach  to  compatibility,  and  plans  to  have  a  final  rule  pub-
lished in 2006. 

The  agency  is  continuing  research  to  establish  quantifiable,  partner  protection 
compatibility  metrics  for  the  vehicle  front-structure  and  the  potential  associated 
benefits.

Question  7.  If  implemented  as  described,  will  the  Agreement  result  in  significant 

reduction in the number of lives lost in motor vehicle accidents? 

Answer.  Yes.  NHTSA  estimates  that  700  to  1,000  lives  will  be  saved  each  year 
by  the  agency’s  upgrade  to  FMVSS  No.  214.  While  industry’s  voluntary  agreement 
is  not  as  extensive  as  the  proposed  upgrade  to  FMVSS  No.  214.  it  is  an  important 
first  step  that  will  incorporate  some  of  the  same  life-saving  countermeasures  into 
the vehicle fleet on a shorter schedule than the mandatory changes to Standard No. 
214. 

For front-to-front compatibility, agency research has not yet progressed to a stage 

that potential benefit estimates for various countermeasures can be established. 
Ejection Mitigation 

Question 8. Why does NHTSA assert that the upgrade of FMVSS No. 214 is part 
of  its  plan  to  address  passenger  ejections  when,  in  fact,  side  air  bags  that  will  be 
installed to comply with the upgrade will not be required to deploy during rollovers? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

69

Answer.  The  upgrade  of  FMVSS  No.  214  is  the  first  phase  of  NHTSA’s  three-
phase  plan  to  address  passenger  ejections.  The  first  phase  is  expected  to  result  in 
the  installation  of  side  curtain  air  bags  in  most  light  vehicles.  The  second  phase 
would provide containment requirements for those side curtain air bags to mitigate 
ejections,  and  provide  protection  for  all  occupants,  particularly  for  partial  ejections 
of belted occupants. A third phase would establish performance requirements for the 
rollover sensors. 

Also, it is important to note that not all ejections are due to rollover.
Question  9.  Will  the  rule  upgrade  require  rear-seat  occupant  head  protection?  If 
not, what would prevent rear-seat occupants from being ejected in rollovers or from 
being severely injured in a side-impact accident? 

Answer.  FMVSS  No.  214  will  require  rear-seat  occupant  head  protection,  if  the 
final  rule  is  adopted  as  proposed.  Head  protection  will  have  to  be  met  in  the  rear 
seat  using  two  different  sized  dummies  representing  a  5th  percentile  female  and  a 
50th percentile male. 

The  agency  is  currently  conducting  research  for  rear-seat  ejection  mitigation  con-

tainment requirements. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO

HON. JEFFREY W. RUNGE 

Question  1.  How  important  is  it  to  have  states  enact  laws  that  effectively  deal 
with  a  ‘‘higher-risk’’  or  ‘‘hard-core’’  drunk  driver,  who  is  a  first-time  offender  with 
a blood alcohol level of .15 percent, almost twice the legal limit? 

Answer. High blood alcohol content (BAC) laws are promising, particularly as part 
of a comprehensive package of state impaired-driving laws. More than 30 states now 
have  this  type  of  law  in  place,  providing  increased  sanctions  for  drivers  convicted 
at  BAC  levels  that  are  well  above  the  state’s  per  se  impairment  level.  These  laws 
vary  considerably  according  to  the  specific  BAC  threshold  at  which  they  apply  and 
in terms of the severity of the enhanced sanctions. This variation, and the fact that 
most  of  these  laws  are  relatively  recent,  makes  generalization  of  their  impact  dif-
ficult.  However,  a  NHTSA  evaluation  indicates  that  high  BAC  laws  can  contribute 
to a strong overall state impaired-driving legislative package.

Question  2.  As  a  doctor,  are  you  familiar  with  the  effects  of  alcohol  on  people? 
How  can  a  person  drive  with  a  .15  percent  blood  alcohol  level  and  think  that  they 
are not a danger to the traveling public? Are they likely to become repeat offenders? 
Answer.  Yes,  I  worked  in  an  emergency  department  for  20  years  and  have  seen 
the results of impaired driving. At the .15 blood alcohol content (BAC) level, people 
typically  suffer  a  loss  of  muscle  control  and  balance,  and  may  become  sick  and 
vomit.  For  drivers,  this  translates  to  substantial  impairment  in  vehicle  control,  a 
reduction in necessary visual and auditory information processing, and a loss of at-
tention to the driving task. 

In  2003,  the  median  BAC  among  alcohol-involved  drivers  who  were  killed  in 
crashes was .16 percent, a level unchanged since 2002. This level constitutes serious 
impairment  and  it  is  very  likely  that  a  person  driving  at  this  level  has  done  so  on 
more than one occasion.

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:05 Dec 05, 2005 Jkt 023943 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\23943.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

